I did like the food BUT the pirce  was over pricey on few items! I went with a ex-gf and at the time she was working on her 14th husband and later kick him to the curb. That marraged last 16 months and he change his sex to a female. Long story to get into! Me and SJ (ex-gf) love everything they have excipted the price! We had differen bills mine was CHEAP cost me $60.00 hers was $3,000.
We had our evening spoiled by this restaurant. For a place of this class you would think they have reasonable management sense. We MADE A RESERVATION for 8:30 and arrived on time, and had to wait until 9:10pm! And still we COULDN'T GET A TABLE! When you reserve a table for this place they request your credit card information, and if you don't show up they charge you $100 each seat ($75 for lunch). If they think their food and services are so freaking good to demand such outrageous fees, we diners should be able to charge them for making us wait, and for spoiling our date EVEN WHEN WE HAVE MADE A RESERVATION! I would give 0 star if possible. We ended up going to Subway to fill our empty stomachs. It's nothing fancy, but at least we got fed.
Came here with my wife and her parents. Her dad had read about it and wanted to take us there. My wife and I had been curious about coming here for quite some time. Food was really delicious -- standouts were the filet mignon (which typically I'm not a fan of due to lack of flavor), the lobster in one course, and the well-known 62 degree egg. Wine pairings were high quality, though overall I didn't find them particularly creative or pleasingly well-paired. Service was good though not without faults (accidental knock-over of water glass, eek). Overall, it's not a place I would go again -- especially if I were paying for it myself -- since in particular for the price it's in the same category as area restaurants that are far better in our opinion (French Laundry, Coi, Cyrus). Giving it three stars for the same reason.
As with all of my reviews, I won't factor in "value."  While Chicago School economists may not believe in wealth effects, I do.  Needless to say, this place is expensive.  WIthout wine pairings but with a couple drinks apiece, it'll run you $600.  I'll compare it to other places in this price range. Another thing I don't really think factors into my overall opinion: service.  Or I should say it only factors in when it is noticeably bad.  In this case, it was actually quite good.  Dishes were paced well, the staff was attentive and informative, and everyone was quite friendly. Finally, the last non-food-related element that DOES affect my opinion, the space.  It's really tough to have a conversation in there.  Actually, it's too easy to have a conversation--each of the four tables in our area could hear exactly what we were saying, and vice-versa.  The crowd is very Palo Alto: mixed race couples in their mid-to-late 40's.  Lounge versions of classical pops playing ever so softly throughout.  The decor is not to my liking.  If the color orange is your thing, though, you'll love it. Anyway, the food.  The more "progressive" courses (radish/avocado/puffed rice, 62 degree egg with, basically, Golden Crisp) were very underwhelming.  I won't go through the whole parade of those, but suffice it to say, we had a "chilled watercress soup" that tasted exactly like it sounds.  For all the technique, each of these came off as bland and insubstantial, both in terms of the ideas presented and the food itself. One thing that did stand out was the "salade ete," which consisted of delicate cubes of heirloom tomato with various accoutrement.  This is when the dinner started getting really good.  The ingredients spoke, the flourishes sang, and the whole thing was a beautiful chorus of ete, indeed. This place can really handle its proteins.  There was a turbot dish, a lobster dish, squab, and filet mignon.  The turbot was the best of the bunch.  It was some of the best-cooked fish I've ever had, succulent and just on the delicious side of rare.  In that particular dish, it was the protein itself that stood out.  What made the lobster (and truffle) dish was the delicious smoked bechamel and fresh summer corn.  So much so that I couldn't really taste either the lobster or the truffles, but I could tell that the lobster's texture was perfect.  The honey-glazed squab with (poached?) fennel and turmeric cardamom sauce was another huge hit, tender and juicy but with a delicious charred flavor on the skin.  A filet with beets (roasted beets, beet sauce, beet chip, golden beet noodle) was competently cooked and generally well paired. The composed cheese course was interesting (yuzu jelly) and the cheeses themselves were good.  Desserts were good, but nothing to write home (or Yelp) about.  The meal ended in about the same tone as these last couple sentences.  After some great savory courses, it seems that the food jus ran out of steam. If you want a haute cuisine experience that showcases some culinary tricks and departs from the Bay Area's current rustic-chic trends, but you really don't want to leave the Valley, I think this is probably the best place to do it.  But the sorta lame atmosphere and the number of missteps leaves me feeling less than excited about the prospect of returning.
Been twice: great but not exceptional. Execution of food is very good. Inventive, but not over the top. There are a few misses here and there which can be forgiven, but good lord, can I get some more food?? I'm petite with a small appetite and was still hungry at the end of each meal. I always go for the premium wine pairing, which is great with generous pours, but that makes the miniscule portion sizes all the more dangerous. First time I had exceptional service, but the second time was lame. If you live around here, you should definitely go -- it's a local joint that we should support. I hope they bump up the portion sizes and tighten up the service.
Solid, but not quite as good as it was when it opened. Don't get me wrong - the current menu is very, very good.  But it's not nearly as creative and exciting as it was when they first opened.  Gone are the choices, but gone also are a lot of the molecular gastronomy tricks that set this place apart from other fine dining in the bay area. The menu last Wednesday was seasonally appropriate and the platings were intricate.  A truffle supplement offered on the menu was not available for reasons that varied depending on who you asked, but some rather indifferent truffles did make their appearance shaved onto the top of one of the later dishes. Dishes were generally well-conceived and creatively plated, though a few were shockingly over-salted.  Favorites included a beautiful turbot presentation and a chunk of maine lobster hidden under cucumber.  Individual dishes were small, but with such a long menu and frequent bread service ( including some of the best French butter we've had recently ), we left perfectly satisfied and not uncomfortably full. Two wine pairings were offered - the more expensive pairing generally having nicer versions of the same varietals.  The table next to us got two wine pairings and began to fear for their consciousness at some point in the evening.  We shared a single pairing, and were perfectly happy. Service was not the most attentive I've ever seen - it seemed rushed on occasion, and despite our attempts to solicit somewhat more details of the pairings and the dishes, we found ourselves receiving abrupt descriptions most of the time. It's a small restaurant, and there are some acoustic issues.  They seated a business group of six ( apparently reluctantly ) across the dining room, and I was located in a node where I could hear their conversation as distinctly as I could my companion. Overall - it's a very good effort, and among the best fine dining in the South Bay.  We were disappointed to see the more pedestrian direction the menu has now taken, but it is still very solid food with decent service.
The Worst Michelin Rated Restaurant Experience Ever. Besides finding a live worm in our first course (yes, a still living, breathing, squirming worm) and lack of customer service after, I was extremely disappointed with the food. I've been raving about Baume for quite some time and my bf finally surprised me by taking us here for our 4 year anniversary. We opted for the 12 course tasting menu + wine pairings. We ordered a bottle of sparkling water. We had the table in the corner. They gave us a card that said Happy Anniversary Mr. & Mrs. Lu (We are not married, so this was cute). It looked to be a delightful evening. Until we got the first course. Organic Shiitake Mushrooms. My BF's mushroom had a wiggling worm still inside. We were MORTIFIED. We quickly told our server who took it away. The server came back and sheepishly apologized, "sorry about that, that's what happens when you have an organic garden." Really?!?! For a restaurant who meticulously picks and combs their ingredients, they did a horrific job on this one. What were we offered for the mishap? The same plate, redone. Pass. We tried to laugh it off and we honestly tried to enjoy the rest of the night, forgetting that we found a live bug in their food. But the food did not live up to my expectations of a 2 michelin star restaurant. The food was so uninspiring and our 12 course menu was uneventful. NONE of the dishes stood out. Talk about small portions. These were offensively small. I've been to enough restaurants to know the difference between clean, simple presentation to skimpy plates. I usually get full after 5 plates so when 12 plates passed and I was still hungry, I knew something was wrong. A few of our courses: Flower Salad - pretty plate of colorful petals, which were then sprayed with lavender. You were supposed to enjoy this dish through smell as well, but honestly, it smelled like a really clean bathroom. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Squab / Quail (forgot which one) - when we found out we were finally getting some meat, we were so excited. Until I saw the plate. These cubes were as big as dice. Good but not enough. http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... http://www.yelp.com/biz_... Again, nothing stood out. I would imagine you visit Baume to experience the science between the food, the molecular gastronomy experience. I can tell you that the dehydrated piece of cauliflower was very good and the flavors burst in my mouth. I can tell you that the 62 degree egg was cooked perfectly and the runny yolk was delicious. The dessert thrust in the middle of the tasting was odd but refreshing (it reminded me of a snow cone). The point is how the food is prepared and created but as a guest, I'm not watching you prepare it. I'm simply eating it. And the whole gastronomic process did very little to heighten any flavors or create any lasting memory of my dining experience. I was unmoved by everything - from the food, to the service, to the decor (seriously, WHAT decor?). I really did not appreciate the "sweep under the rug" attitude about the worm (not to mention they didn't comp us on anything - not even that $10 bottle of sparkling water), My BF paid $700 for our meal and he still complains that it was the worst $700 he's ever spent. I really don't blame him. Baume is just not worth it.
***Baume combines the contemporary French fine dining cuisine of Melisse with the molecular gastronomy artistry of The Bazaar to make it a truly exceptional restaurant (though the portions are small and the prices are high)*** My first trip to Baume was the first time I had a truly exceptional tasting menu.  There was just one great dish after another and the only subpar dish was one of their desserts (a sad looking chocolate tart).  Baume has earned a lot more accolades since then and they have gotten more expensive (the portions have gotten smaller as well).  Still, Baume features a very nice lunch tasting menu with excellent food. The bread at Baume was just okay--a pretty good and hearty walnut bread but a boring French country bread.  Their Echire butter was rich and good.  I miss the parsley tofu spread (2 stars for the bread). The amuses were nice to look at, but they were just good and not great.  There was a light parsley sponge filled with a flavorful and creamy mushroom mousse.  There was also a cucumber sorbet, which was a little too icy (3 stars). The first course was a cauliflower panna cotta, which was garnished with great ingredients including nicely charred cauliflower, briny caviar, watercress, and lemon zest (4 stars). This was followed by a fresh salad of spring vegetables and flowers.  There was a good gelee as well as a nice pesto and lavender essence (4 stars). One of Baume's signature courses came next and it was exceptional.  It was a 62-degree egg.  The cooking process kept the egg yolk nice and runny while it turned the egg white part into a custard-like texture.  There were great puffed grains as well as a creamy artichoke puree (5 stars). I added a supplemental course of sweet corn risotto with freshly shaved black truffles.  The sweet corn risotto was very good--nicely sweet and the right texture on the corn (tender but still with a defined bite); the dish was creamy and rich.  The fragrance from the shaved black truffle was very strong and inviting.  The black truffle was soft and had a great flavor (5 stars). I think a lot of truffle dishes can be disappointing.  The truffle they use can be too mild in flavor and they have to resort to a pungent truffle oil.  This truffle dish was very good and would be one of the best truffles dishes I've ever had. There were two seafood courses.  There was a small Maine lobster course, which came with cucumber espuma and vanilla cocoa.  There was definitely a strong vanilla flavor and the lobster was tender and sweet.  This dish was too small though to have much impact (3 stars). The next seafood course was light and moist turbot with came with great sides--a spicy paprika bisque, briny olive tapenade and tender bok choy (4 stars). The main course was grass fed beef filet with a red wine sauce, potatoes, baby leeks, morels, and summer truffles.  They put a salt crust on the filet, which gave the meat a lot of flavor (though it might be too salty for some).  The meat was very tender and relatively juicy for a filet.  I really liked the earthy morels (4 stars). The palate cleanser was green plum sorbet with strawberry granita--nothing too memorable but cool and refreshing (3 stars). Desserts were very good.  There was a light chocolate sponge cake and apricot parfait.  This was a good mix of chocolate and apricot.  The dessert was moist and had a combination of sweet and tart flavors (4 stars). There was also nougat glace with cherry, sesame and raspberry.  The nougat glace was kind of like a coarse ice cream or semifreddo.  I liked the texture; it looked icy, but it was not.  I really liked the flavor; both the fruit flavor and the sesame flavor came across very well (5 stars). Service was good--very polished, professional and polite but also personable. Prices are high.  Given the small portions, it is an expensive tasting menu though Baume does feature a wide variety of ingredients (as well as several premium ingredients). The space is nice.  Baume is located along a non-descript street with several other businesses, but the inside is quite pleasing.  Very contemporary with great decoration and lighting--dark but there is great stark lighting overheard, which really highlights the beautiful food presentations. I really like how Baume mixes French cuisine with molecular gastronomy.  It is kind of a mix of Melisse and The Bazaar.  The food is good-to-very-good and is very nicely plated.  I did not think the food was as good as my first visit, which had great foie gras with almonds and strawberries as well as beef filet with peas and salsify, but Baume is still one of the best restaurants I've tried in the Bay Area though I would probably put it a notch below Saison, Manresa and Benu. Free street parking is available.
***Baume combines molecular gastronomy and French cuisine to make food that is fun and inventive but... Read more 
I enjoyed a ridiculously fabulous lunch here this week.  Wow.  I felt like a judge on Iron Chef America.  My head spun.  9 courses.   Special treatment galore.   Glad someone else paid! In an otherwise unassuming location on Palo Alto's California Avenue there sits Baume, hiding quietly behind darkened windows.  The place is decorated by someone who clearly paid attention in class.  Very chic mixture of NYC fancy joint and, oh, let's say the restaurant in Ratatouille. Fortunately the courses were all chosen for me.  It is not clear that my advanced degrees have prepared me sufficiently for ordering properly.  Frankly I cannot remember the names of everything, but the food is amazing. If you just made millions from the Facebook IPO, bring one or two over here, order some amazing food and great wine, and dig in.  Great for the price-is-no-object crowd.
I've been to many Michelin starred restaurants, but this is the first time I've been to a restaurant with two Michelin stars! With that in mind, this was a bit of an experience unto itself, and Baume certainly didn't disappoint. Ambiance is very nice. It's dimly lit and romantic. Really a very pretty restaurant, and a nice place to spend an evening. Service is extremely friendly, attentive, and knowledgeable. Our bread basket and water glasses were constantly filled, and the waiter could answer any question about Chef Bruno Chemel's menu. The only option at Baume is to order the chef's tasting menu, which comes with 12 courses and three amuse bouches/palate cleansers, for 15 total dishes: The first were two small amuse bouches. One was an herbed sponge and the other was a radish on top of crostini with a pea sauce. The sponge was very mild and nuanced, but the radish had an excellent bold flavor to it. I loved it. The second was a celery sorbet served with a zabaione (custard). It had a good, sweet flavor to it. It also came with a shot of cucumber juice, which I really liked. It was shockingly good, much better than the cucumber itself! Following that was a cauliflower panna cotta topped with American paddlefish caviar and small cauliflower leaves. I'll admit that this, while good, wasn't my favorite caviar in the world. The American paddlefish had a more aggressive flavor than I was used to. Our fourth dish, though, was exceptional. It was a 62 degree egg topped with artichoke and puffed grains. Wow was this amazing! It was so perfectly seasoned, and the egg's consistency was just perfect, melting in your mouth. Amazing! Next was a salade printemps (spring salad), with mixed spring greens, a lavender pesto, and a mist of lavender. The lavender fragrance was amazing, and you could smell it well before you tasted the dish. The salad was very good, and had a nice vinegary flavored complemented by the lavender. The sixth came out in a bowl with nothing more than a couple of frozen carrot sponges and a couple of green peas; the waiter then poured over it an English pea soup. It was quite good, and had a nice, mild flavor to it. After that, though, was an exceptional dish: it was a gently cooked halibut topped with olive and served with a vegetable consomme. The consomme especially was just exceptional; it had an amazing savory flavor to it that really brought out the flavors of the halibut. Just an exceptional dish. Following that was a Maine lobster served with cucumber and vanilla cacao; it was wrapped in cucumber as well. It had a very mild flavor to it, and it was pretty good overall. The ninth was a palate cleanser, which consisted of a green strawberry sorbet served over a red strawberry granite (shaved ice). The green strawberry sorbet was quite sour and provided a tartness that complemented the sweetness of the strawberry granite. It was a good way to move into the meat that would soon follow. The first meat to come out was a squab breast served with fennel, ginger, and a balsamic reduction. The fennel was a really nice touch and added an amazing flavor to the dish. The ginger also complemented it quite well, and the sweetness of the balsamic brought it altogether. Following that was what I considered the highlight of the meal. It was a grass fed filet mignon, which was perhaps the best preparation of filet mignon I've ever had anywhere. They served it with ramps and black morel mushrooms. The mushrooms provided a really nice, almost peppery flavor to the steak. It was perfectly seasoned and just tasted amazing. So tender, so juicy, so tasty. A truly exemplary dish. Next came the cheese course, which consisted of two cheese (both of which came from France), one cow and one goat cheese. The cow's milk cheese was a L'affine au Chablis that came from the Chancey region of France; it was served with a marmalade. The cheese was creamy and mild, a great flavor. My favorite, though, was their goat cheese which was a Delice au Poitou served that came from the Poitou region of France; it was served with grapes. The characteristic bold flavor of goat cheese really came out in this one, and was just amazing. The 13th dish was our first bite of dessert, which was a sparkling cherry. It looked like an ordinary sliced cherry, but when you bit into it, it tasted bubbly and sparkly. It was a good start to the dessert. Number 14, then, was a raspberry glace served with nougats and sesame. It had a good, mild sweet flavor. Served alongside it, though, was a coconut chocolate parfait. This one had a deep chocolate flavor that was amazing, and came together just perfectly. At the end, we got one last bite-sized treat, which was a strawberry and lime ice cream on top of a cookie, topped with a frozen strawberry sorbet. Yum! With the check came one last treat: a passionfruit marshmallow with caramel on the inside. Delicious! Overall, Baume is an amazing restaurant; I recommend checking it out!
Molecular gastronomy meets modern french cuisine using seasonal fare. Came here on a double date last year (yes very late review). Each course was presented so beautifully making it a feast not only for your taste buds but also for the eyes. I wouldn't mind coming back here.
I would rank Baume to be the best French restaurant in the South Bay/Peninsula BY FAR!  In general, it is on the more expensive side, but it's worth it and pretty comparable to restaurants in its class.  I would rather spend more for a quality dine than less at a restaurant that leaves me unsatisfied. We had the nine course tasting menu with wine pairing at lunch and it was divine!  The flavors were complex.  The food was cooked and seasoned perfectly.  The dishes were very creative and beautifully presented.  Food was served promptly and we never felt rushed.  Ambiance was perfect - modern, quiet enough to have a conversation, soft music and lighting. The service was very good, though I would not say perfect (so the five stars is actually 4.5 stars) - our water glasses were empty most of the time and it would have been nice to have more walnut bread, especially since the french butter was so yummy.  Yes, we could have asked, but I think at a two Michelin-starred restaurant, you shouldn't have to.  I will say that the servers were friendly and were able to answer all my questions when asked about various ingredients. We will definitely be back.  Next time it will be for the 12 course dinner.
I agree with some of the others that it deserves a three because of the expensive menu and in comparison to other 2 Michelin star restaurants I have visited, it just doesn't compare. If you're spending about $200/pp for a meal, you better be wowed by the service AND by the food, and here I experienced neither. The bread service is probably the most disappointing I have had at a restaurant of this caliber. Here, have three 2" slices of a cold baguette. I realize the point of this restaurant is not the bread, but if this restaurant was in NYC it would not fly. And Michelin stars are supposed to be rewarded with the same standards, regardless of locale. The 12 course tasting menu was good, and I appreciated the freshness and balance of delicate flavors, but at the same time I kept waiting for the gastronomic surprises I experienced over and over at Alinea. It never came. My husband did adore the egg dish and now he's going to try to recreate it with our sous vide machine at home. I'd much rather have had spent my money at Cyrus in Healdsburg. Or two meals at Gary Danko in SF.
I have been to various Michelin star restaurants throughout the world.    My feeling for Baume is mixed.  The food was creative.   The ambiance was also good.  The service and their attention to detail were not up to par and did not live up to the Michelin star standard.   Our water glass and bread basket were left empty.   We did not bother to ask but for a restaurant of this calibre, should we need to?  The first amuse bouche came with the food fallen apart.   Even though it is just the amuse bouche, I still expected someone to fix it before bringing to the table. The food was very good.   62degree egg was amazing .   The filet mignon was cooked perfectly.   The only thing is that some of the dishes feel like they were over-seasoned.
I was excited to try a 2 Michelin Star restaurant in PA as it was my 3rd restaurant of a Michelin rating adventure. As the price of $178 pp and 2 star rating was comparable to that of COI in SF, I was looking forward to it immensely. I researched that the ingredients were touted as fresh prior to my arrival. From to start to finish it was a very anticlimactic experience. Our server was an animatronic android whose rise and fall voice became nothing short of a joke with every  course delivery and description ending with "cheers."  I didn't think I was dining at a pub! I was seated in the main dining room which was lit by bright white lights and accompanied to music by Enya. Very hokey indeed. I didn't know if I was in a massage waiting room. I thought at least then the food would more than make up for these peripherals. Touted as "fresh," ingredients, I was simply amazed how many dishes were presented as frozen 4 out of 12 courses; grape glacee, deconstructed vacherin (I couldn't even bite into the square!), strawberry brulee, melon sorbet. The fromage salad and the beef were the only dishes that I would have been very pleased to have large portions of.  I was pleased they had the half bottle of Kosta Browne to stifle my laughs.  I left with a $580 tab for 2 people and very hungry. I was truly expecting to well leave satiated as I have with my experience at COI and Benu. No "cheers" for Baume.
I was fluctuating between two and three stars with this review.  I decided on two because of the definition of a yelp two star. "Meh. I've experienced better" definitely fits with my experience here. The space is beautiful, sleek and warm in decor, however the dining room is eerily quite which quite frankly set the tone for the entire evening. I have been to four of the six two Michelin star restaurants in the Bay Area and when comparing Baume to the other restaurants, I would have to say the Baume underwhelms in comparison. Baume lacked the suave and personality of a place like Cyrus and lacked the ingenuity and technique of Benu and Baume lacked the finesse in service of Manresa. Many have touted Baume and Chef Bruno Chamel as revolutionary in the world of haute cuisine but what I saw were smoke and mirrors, gimmicks and techniques that are rampant in todays dining realm.  His signature dish, the 62 degree egg was tepid and bland, the dessert was three times the size of every other dish of the evening (I noticed they switched out desserts towards the end of the evening) and everything was just good, nothing was special or something that I haven't seen before. I had a huge issue with service.  Our server seemed downright scared and was so introverted that it made me uncomfortable.  There was no charm or personality and everything he said sounded scripted and mundane that I eventually stopped listening to him and made up my own descriptions.  The servers never smiled, never tried to connect with us, or showed any sign of passion whatsoever.  I also did not appreciate the chef lambasting the server in the lobby.  If you need to have a discussion, take it off the floor. I understand why Michelin bestowed two stars to Baume, it's exactly what they look for.  It's pretty, with small dishes, tasting menu only, and uses liquid nitrogen.  Where I come from, two Michelin stars represents one of the best restaurants in the world and is "worth the detour." Baume, sadly was not any of those and it's too bad. I really wanted to like this place. 2 stars.
With one of my spontaneous thoughts, I found myself seated in the dining room of Baume, with... Read more 
12 dishes, 4 small bites, 2 glasses of champagne and 3 hours later, I left the restaurant happy but a little puzzled. Baume is worthy of its 2 Michelin stars status. However, there are still some elements missing. My dining experience was good but not exceptional. For a restaurant in this class I found the service to be just average. Descriptions of the dishes sounded robotic and simply boring. Most of the time all I heard was just a list of ingredients used. Some enthusiasm, or explanation of the technique would certainly have made things more interesting. I definitely enjoyed the showiness and dramatic presentation. (Don't worry, I won't spoil it for you) The "white tablet" made a great first impression. The kabocha soup with "pumpkin seeds" ice cream and the mandarin tree were both lovely surprises. I think they could go even further and put on more dazzling shows. There are quite a few memorable dishes. I could understand why the 62.5C egg is the chef's signature dish. The texture was unreal and I think it might just be the best egg I have had. Both salad courses were wonderful. There were so much that went on in just one bite. Noirmoutier Turbot fish course was the highlight of my meal. The texture was uniform, juicy and bouncy. The sous-vide petite filet was tender and passed the 'cutting with your fork' test with ease. Desserts were beyond spectacular. There are a few dishes that made me wonder. Caviar Parfait is one. Creme fraiche, carrot puree and apple have a suppressing rather than enhancing effect on the caviar. Maine Lobster with the split pea puree, anise and hibiscus gelee seemed too sweet and lacked balance. Baume would be an interesting experience if it is your first molecular gastronomy encounter. Whether it is worthy of a return visit for a special occasion? I am still unsure.
I'm not quite sure how this got a Michelin Star, let alone two.  I mean, it's good, and fancy, and they do some pretty cool tricks with food, but it is in a strip mall and smelled a bit like a dentist's office.  Previous tenant? We ate things like pretty flowers, and there were some cool gelatins.  They did the gastro thing, but no tricks with fire or liquid nitrogen.  There were 12 courses, but most would be considered a bite.  The wine parings were good enough, but nothing surprising. The service was excellent, except when they tried to do 'round-the-clock' for three of us with only two servers.  It didn't work.  I don't know...it just felt flat. There's no bar, and no margaritas.  The price was very high, but again, not deservingly so...for a strip mall.  A meal that fancy and that expensive often has a view, a journey, or a coffee table book.  This has none of those.
To be fair, I ate here in June of 2010 and from what I recall Baume was only open for a few months. From what I can remember, I opted for the 8 course menu. The service was great, the dishes were creative (a few notable ones: Lavender air, the 63 degree egg, and lemon bubbles with italian summer truffles), ingredients were incredibly fresh and the textures were interesting.  The flavors just weren't pronounced, nothing blew me away and the atmosphere was a bit stuffy for my taste. Perhaps I should give them a try now that they have probably had some more time to perfect their dishes.
Came here last night for my birthday and was very much impressed. However, I did not see the bill. i was impressed by the quality of service and the use of so many ingredients in so many ways completely unknown to me. When I go out to dinner I need to be impressed and I want to try things that I know I cannot do myself. What a treat. I was able to get so many ideas from them, yet impossible to recreate anything! Loved it!
Overall 3.5 stars. The reason so low (3.5 stars) is because I am basing my score on the expectations of a 2 Michelin star restaurant and a price tag that is comparable to the French Laundry. Food 4.5 stars : I enjoyed each course. Taste was there, creativity certainly was and so was execution. Baume introduced new flavor profiles and textures to my brain and palate. If everything else was up to this level, it'd be 4.5-5 stars. I would have enjoyed a beef course though. Bread service (2 stars) sucked though for a 2 Michelin star restaurant. Just some cold,  normal seeming bread. Not one special thing about it. Sort of crazy when you think about it. Wine pairings 3.5 stars: too many whites! Service 3 stars: Noting wrong, they were nice, didn't really mess-up, sort of knowledgeable, didn't forget about us, however, it was just come, give a brief description of the course and off. Nothing special to make it a memorable experience. Same token, I do enjoy this approach sometimes as I want to just enjoy my meal and company without being bothered. Still 2 Michelin stars? Atmosphere 2-2.5 stars: This was the most disappointing aspect of Baume IMO. Just seemed a bit half-assed, generic and not too buttoned up. Really odd. I would recommend Baume if you're okay dropping $400 a person, and want to introduce something new and good to your palate. Though I don't think it's a good place to go and celebrate a special event.
Baume has a warm feeling once you enter the venue.  I loved the colored walls and simplistic decor and furniture.  Very classy and not overwhelming at all.  The outside of the restaurant may give you a first bad impression but do not worry, once you go inside, the staff caters to you like royalty.  Our waiter definitely was on point with his descriptions and wine pairings.  We tried to make a few jokes out of it but he was so solid to his job description that he didn't seem too amused. Cheer up buddy! It'll make our experience even better if you did!  Don't be too serious haha! For my uncle's birthday, we each decided to get the Molecular Gastronomique with wine pairings.  It was my first wine pairing experience and I thoroughly enjoyed every moment of it with each dish.  If only I can afford it everytime I eat, I would be in heaven! Our menu of the night: ++Watermelon Glace, Cucumber Yogurt- good for cleansing our palates ++Olive- Boquerones ++Heirloom Tomato Salade, Leek Ashe Sponge: not a big fan of veggies but I still ate it.. not too shabby since it was just tomato slices :/ ++ 62 egg, ratatouille:  my favorite! It was my first 62 degree egg dish and I loved it.  I love runny eggs so its obvious that I would like this dish. ++Cherry Deguisse- Foie Gras brioche: also my favorite. so original!  They notify you to break the cherry apart and not eat the skin.  Foie gras is hidden inside which was delicious! ++Yellow Corn Soup- Piquillo Ice Cream ++Loup De Mer, English Pea Hummus, Heirlooms Carrot: my least favorite but the wine made up for it! ++Grass Fed Beef, A La Nicoise,  Tarragon Jus ++Cheese Composition ++Nectarine Port Syrup- too sweet for my taste even though I know it is a type of port ++Coupe Spumoni- Berry Tarte: they used liquid nitrogen where they poured the sauce over the dessert.  This was alright.. not the greatest... ++Macadamia Mochi, Pineapple Tarte: These mochis were better than the main dessert dish sadly.... In conclusion, it was definitely a great first food and wine pairing at Baume.  It was also my first Molecular Gastronomique tasting, which was very different and I loved it.  As for food, I think it would be better for a 1 star michelin star rated restaurant.  It doesn't make me feel like I want to come back though... Good experience but maybe next time on someone! :)
Did the 12-course with truffles - the highlight was the roots vegetable garden (ripped the title from another review....pretty sure it's the same one) but some dishes like the egg left me perplexed. This is a great quiet place for a snack preceding a more substantial dinner!
Don't get me wrong...the food here is really good and the stuff that they do is super creative. I just can't justify the price...I walked away from Michael Mina in SF spending $600 also for two people and I felt much better about it than this place.
Ok...I admit it. The orange decor is not my thing. It looks like it's from the late 70's. So you gotta get past that. Once you do... The food is fantastic. We had the 12 course dinner with wine pairing, it being our second anniversary-of-dating. The Sommelier who attended our table, Matthew, was AMAZING. He was extremely attentive, answered all our questions, (well, my questions), and took his time out to ensure a fantastic evening. If I had his e-mail address I would send him a huge thank you note, as some of the information he gave me helped me with answering questions about my wine knowledge just a few days later! The restaurant was able to handle my request of no mushrooms (something most high end restaurants love to put on the food) with ease. I'm a picky eater, and the food was delightful. I have to admit, my favorite dish was the melt in your mouth lobster. Oh my goodness, talk about a mouthgasm! That alone was well worth the price. Chef Bruno Chemel (who has a gorgeous food blog at: http://www.brunochemel.c... ) was very nice, and came out to meet us when we left the restaurant. Possibly because we were the last ones to leave after our four hour meal... :). It added to the wonderful evening, and made the ending just perfect. For special occasions, I highly recommend. It's well worth it's two Michelin stars.
I took my husband here for his birthday. He loved it. The restaurant was more down to earth than Manresa. The food was interesting and tasty. My husband used to work for Nathan Myhrvold and we had gotten his books on molecular gastronomy and while it was more complicated than we wanted to try at home, it was fun to eat things sous vide, frozen into beads with liquid nitrogen, turned into tiny flavor sprinkles (by magic?) etc etc. I think to appreciate these tiny dishes with each little fancily prepared component, you have to have some knowledge of the amount of work it takes to make. Everyone around us was laughing about the size of the dishes (teeny tiny, not just tiny) and the waiters were jocular about it. A very relaxed and happy dinner.
First I should say that I am WAY behind in my Yelp reviews, but somehow after this dinner I felt the need to sit down and write. Wow - what can I say that will allow you to experience what I experienced this evening?!?!  I've been trying to get to Baume for close to a year now and due to extraneous circumstances have been unable.  Tonight was the night. First - the vibe of the place is wonderful - you feel relaxed and very welcome.  We did the 12 course premium wine pairing dinner.  Yes, we were celebrating - this does not come cheap.  Let me just say - that every single course was like a symphony in my mouth.  There was the perfect mix of creative flavor combinations with just the right touch of molecular gastronomy. I think that everyone has a different perception of what is perfection for them.  The chef and sommelier here have similar tastes to my own and it led to one of the most perfect nights I have had out in a restaurant. The added bonus - the music mix that the kitchen staff put together was perfect - I heard some old Portishead, Beck, etc. (but it did not interfere with the beautiful and delicious food)!  We will be back - thank you SO much for a great night!
It pains me to write this review. There is no restaurant I would like to see succeed more than Baume. I love molecular gastronomy; I love Palo Alto. I would love nothing more than to have a Mecca for this cuisine in my home town succeed, but alas... The set menu price is $168 per person... this means that Baume has establish themselves in a peer group of Gary Danko, Manressa, Michael Mina, Jean Georges (NYC), Daniel's (NYC), etc., so I am rating them vis a vis the peer group they have priced themselves into. Simply put, they are at the very bottom of this peer group. We have dined there 3 times now, each time thinking the night we were there was just a "bad night." Each visit has been consistently mediocre in terms of food and service. I expect at least one dish (of the ~12) to be spectacular; only 1 was (the beef course), with the remaining mediocre. I find this odd since it is usually the beef course that is least remarkable when I dine. All the dishes had a lot of thought put into them... great ingredients... just poor execution. The flavors simply weren't there, or the mix of flavors were off. The wine program is a mixed bag. I love the attitude, candor, and knowledge of the Sommelier, but the wine list itself leaves much to be desired (perhaps his hands are tied? - this is usually the case when you have a disconnect between the quality of the Sommelier and the list itself). The list is minimalist, so I would encourage you to bring something from your own cellar. Just be prepared to pay the $45 corkage fee. Yes, that is not a typo... $45... I would expect this if the wine list weren't as mediocre as it is... but oh well. The nice thing is that for your $45 you get nice stemware, the wine is served with care (proper temperature) and with grace (i.e. no guff for bringing something special from your own cellar). Bottom line is that I will likely not return to Baume unless I hear outstanding things from another foodie that I know/trust. I hope they are able to turn things around... or that I was just unlucky 3 times.
Baume gets a strong 4-star rating from me.  I was most impressed by the fun, whimsical creations that came out of the kitchen.  None of the dishes made me want to lick my plate clean, but nothing was bad, my servers were knowledgeable, and service was fine.  One aspect worth noting was that this was the quickest tasting meal I have ever had.  In my experience, tasting menus usually last around four hours.  I was in and out of Baume in just about two hours.  That may be a selling feature for people who don't want to devote so much time for their dining experience. I was surprised to find I actually liked the dark chocolate brown and orange color scheme.  The restaurant had very clean, minimalistic decor, and was divided into intimate sections (my area had 5 tables), divided by floor to ceiling length curtains. One thing I noticed throughout my dinner was I was given instructions on how to eat the dishes.  I've had servers suggest the best way to enjoy a dish before, but I was given instructions for several courses at my Baume meal.  Of course, the first item needed directions, as I was brought out a compressed towel and told not to eat it.  Highly necessary, thank you. The first official dish was a "Root Vegetable Garden" served with a beet and celery shot.  That beet/celery juice was bright and refreshing.  Bread service was forgettable.  The next dish was a caviar parfait with smoked creme fraiche, carrot puree, chives, and diced green apples.  The creme fraiche had just a hint of smoke, and all of the textures and flavors went well together. I was told the next dish was the chef's "signature dish," a soft boiled egg with lentils, and Vermouth sabayon.  I love me a good soft-cooked egg, but I don't know that I'd want this to be the dish I'm famous for. I was most surprised by the Kabocha squash soup with "pumpkin seeds" ice cream.    The hot soup was finished at the table by having frozen pumpkin seed-shaped ice cream transferred from some dry ice into the soup bowl.  I enjoyed the contrast of the cold ice cream melding with the hot soup.  In addition, I detected bursts of citrus, almost as if there were individual cells of grapefruit inside.  It turns out that Baume makes a "lemon explosion" using liquid nitrogen to create the effect. Another dish worth mentioning was the lobster.  I never would've paired lemon, coffee, and lobster, but they went well together.  I liked the crispy skin on the suckling pig, but the meat reminded me of drained kaula pig instead of a rich, pork belly.  Maybe that was what the chef was going for, but it just surprised me. The other dish I was intrigued by was the rocky road ice cream.  It was almost like frozen meringue.  The server explained they put the ice cream base through a whip cream maker and discharge it into liquid nitrogen.  The end result was light and airy, very cool. Baume tickled my curiosity and surprised me, but I did not leave with a feeling of deep satisfaction.  My taste buds did not have any moan-worthy moments, and I had already forgotten several dishes by the time I got home.  If you enjoy the "How did they do that?" type of moments, you should definitely try Baume.
For what it's worth Baume delivers amazing dishes in a stylish and enjoyable manner. The atmosphere has a nice sense of both privacy and coziness with no wailing noises or flashing lights. For the food, each dish feels varied and is never oversaturated with a single heavy taste. For example, the lobster with cucumber puree has crunchy lobster meat that never feels too salty and nicely compliments the smooth cucumber cream. My only gripe is that the food is a bit too expensive at $128 for a 9 course lunch. Still it's a wonderful place and is perfect for couples and personal family outings.
We did lunch here at Baume.   My wife and I try to get out for a bi-weekly lunch date, just the two of us, away from our 1.5 and 3.5 year children.  While they are quite lovely children and both incredibly fun to be around, we still need an occasional break.  They both are at day care on Fridays, so I block off a chunk of time in my calendar and take my wife out for a lunch date.  It doesn't have to be somewhere really nice, rather we vary from trying places that we would otherwise not make it to.  This last friday, I decided I wanted to try something a little nicer, so we went to Baume. Lots has been said about Molecular gastronomy and I'm all for it, provided it gives an interesting experience, usually focusing flavors or changing textures through various techniques.  I really enjoy a creative frozen sauce or something that adds to both the presentation and taste sensations of a dish.  Unfortunately, it really annoys me when something is randomly manipulated just to be different. The bread service started out with a small chunk of bread with flash frozen olive oil.  It tasted like cold olive oil.  Nothing interesting or amazing about it.  The bread was fairly stiff and lifeless as well.  The rest of the bread was ok, the nut bread was relatively fresh but our baguette was terrible, stale and hard.  The french butter they provide is very nice, but without a good medium to enjoy it.  (to Baume's credit, the 3rd basket of bread that they brought out was fairly tasty and a clear and marked improvement over the previous 2...) The heirloom tomato salad was ok, and the reduced balsamic vinegar was nice, but the tomato itself had little flavor and it sort of tasted like someone had already chewed it a little.  All the texture had been beaten out of it.  There was a foam and a sponge served on top... and they tasted like exactly that, foam and a sponge. The 62 degree egg was very nice, but it was very typical of what sous vide can do.  It's a marvelous kitchen tool and was used very effectively, if not in an innovative fashion for this dish.  There was a sauce over it and it all came together in a nice way.  Still, not amazing but tasty.  I'm a sucker for a well prepared egg, though. The fish course was also nicely prepared.  It tasted as if it was either sous vide or poached, but the fish had clearly been cooked gently and retained much of it's texture and was very fresh.  I was disappointed in the carrots that accompanied them, because like the tomato in the salad, they tasted as if someone had blanched all the flavor right out of them.  Beautiful presentation and great fish, but the puree and the shaved carrots on top were not very exciting, especially since it was a visually arresting dish.  (bright orange and yellow carrot shavings over a pure white fish filet)   I'm not a huge fan of fish, and would have liked to have more than the 4-5 bites that I had. Our filet mignon tasted sous vide as well.  It was cooked very mildly and gently, with the consistency only sous vide can provide.  It was extremely mild and lacked impact, even though it was done well.  Literally 2 bites of steak, with a block of potatoes and 3 green beans.  It was a nice amuse bouche sized portion but very very small.  And, it didn't stand out as amazing beef, rather just competent.   However, again, the portions that would fit on your average teaspoon. The complimentary cheese course was again tiny, but especially the soft cheese, was intensely flavorful and good. The dessert was billed as a Neapolitan, and indeed had all the ingredients - pistachios, cherries and vanilla.    I honestly wanted to like this, but it was a jumble of random textures that had concentrations of each of the 3 primary flavors alternatively mixed with extremely sweet and extremely salty bits.  I kept getting shocked in a bad way, with each bite.  Maybe I just didn't get it, but I didn't find it enjoyable to eat, in the slightest, and gave up about 2/3rds of the way through after slogging down that far, determined that it had to get better... it didn't.  Reminded me of cheap ice cream that is mostly air whipped in, after it had been left to melt in a hot car and then refrozen. The other dessert, the peach tart was really tasty, with a buttery crust and a dollop of very flavorful strawberry sorbet.  However, I don't think that the miniscule slice was nearly enough and easily could have eaten my portion as well as my wife's. Both the small mochi and the chocolate we were given to go were both fantastic and tasty.  I think the pastry chef is pretty darn good. Overall, I was just extremely unimpressed.  Had the bill been further from $200, I probably would've given it 3 stars, but it wasn't and 2 is where it came to from me.  Maybe lunch is just not the time to go.  Or maybe I am just not for this style, I didn't like Benu either.  For perspective, I loved Chez Panisse, Bottega and ad hoc)
This place is for people who are excited by new and different food, by chemistry and food, and by spending 3.5 hours or more eating a 12-course meal featuring small plates with tiny (like, cute-tiny) vegetables and interesting/tasty flavor combinations. This place is NOT for people who like straight-forward, simple food in hearty portions. It's worth the price if you accept that you're paying for an experience with your food, and enjoy that experience accordingly. Take some foodie friends (ones that aren't too snobby), get an apertif off the menu (I recommend the Kir Royale) and/or the to-die-for yuzu-ade (like lemonade, but with yuzu), and have fun examining and eating the interesting dishes the chef has to offer. We enjoyed the atmosphere of a semi-private, curtain-enclosed table for 6, and since the rest of the place is pretty small and similarly enclosed, the rest of the restaurant clientele seemed to be having a good time as well. Service is fine - nothing bad to say, but also nothing remarkable either. We dined in January 2012, and our party included 30-somethings from the Midwest as well as San Francisco, Oakland, and Boston.
An exceptional lunch, with excellent service by the entire staff! We went with Le Neuf (9 course) and were delighted by every course: visual, taste and aroma, and even texture.  Most of them were a complex combination of flavors.  I imagined them choosing a variety of top ingredients, distilling them down to small tasting items, only to have them explode back into an array of flavor and texture in your mouth! The wine list was excellent and we tried four different reds and whites by the glass. I was a bit put off by the table next to me that was busy photographing every course, but the staff were gracious about it, and anyway it was lunch time, and we are in Silicon Valley! A wonderful experience and we can't wait to return.
Coming to Baume made me pist off at all the other restaurants where I spent over $120 a head.  Why?  Because those restaurants were no where near Baume in creativity, presentation, and level of service.  Their 8 course for around $120/$130 or so is a bargain.  There have been a handful of restaurants I've gone to in my life where the experience was on par with Baume... and they were all WAY over in price for an equivalent tasting menu. I don't think I can add anything more than what other reviewers have said, so I'll just point out that this is one of the most thoughtful and detail oriented restaurants I've ever been to.  It shows in everything, from the careful presentation of every course, to the way the vent is covered so that no one feels a draft, to the elegant surrounding where nothing is out of place. Oh, one last thing.  They have a 1 star Michelin rating.  In my mind, that does not do them justice.  I think my husband and I have dined at just about every 1 star Michelin restaurant in the entire Bay Area.  Baume is, in my opinion, is not in the same class as those restaurants - it's WAY superior.  This place is awesome, and I can't wait to go back!
Minus 1 for price (better bang for buck at Benu or Joel Robuchon in LV) Minus 1 for yucky decor and ok service. The food was great! no complaints. But my palate did not appreciate the extra $55/person for LOTS of white truffle on tapioca cauliflower "risotto" It tasted good but not enough to justify 30% increase in my total bill? impressive start - a towel that pops open with hot water. i am not a fan of institutional orange. The logo and all the drapes that separated the various eating areas are orange. The artwork that I saw was either squid shaped in O or ??? Not impressive. the lights were track lighting and the fixtures were like glass embedded with square glass things.  The music they played had words - I don't think that is appropriate for this kind of restaurant. Not classy. the service: the server was nice, but he didn't give me enough information about my food. he would say blah, blah, blah, and I would say what was ?? and he would say, oh, that's vanilla and X in french. but often he just told me the protein and not the details that would make me appreciate it more? after asking him 2 times for more info, I gave up. wasn't going to keep that up for the 12 courses... was told there were 3 types of bread in the basket, I opened it up, there were only 2! uh, perhaps check before you tell me something is there? little things like this kept coming up... small little details that you don't expect for $$$ that you are paying... Bathroom was freezing cold! Delicious food, gotta re-do the decor/ambiance and improve education/service of servers. After I got the bill, ack. was shocked and felt not worth it. should be tried, but I won't be coming back at this price, ambiance and service.
So you know my perspective: My all-time favorite restaurant experience was Alinea.  I have been to many other top molecular/modern restaurants around the world.  I have easily been to dozens of Michelin-starred restaurants throughout the US and Europe.  We made a special trip to Baume from Los Angeles for SO's birthday. Baume was by far the worst experience we have ever had at a restaurant of this caliber. We were taken aback by the attitude of the server.  It was not even the arrogance, but the apathy that surprised me. He became visibly agitated when I refused to let him put our food order in without first being allowed to view the wine list and choose the wine (I wanted to view the menu in conjunction with the wine list to ensure sure I was choosing good pairings and making sure they had the bottles in stock . as well as getting them decanted so the reds were ready. ) He literally came back three different times trying to put the food in and 3 times I kept asking for the wine list.  It was very rushed and non-Michelin-ey.  I made a point of saying that our guests (a second couple) have never experienced molecular gastronomy dining before and could he explain the technique and ingredients behind the dishes a little more (in this case the 63 degree egg) but except for the one time I pushed him, each description was quite minimalist and robotic.  Plus, the wine list itself was not very good - very little decent french wine for a supposedly french-styled restaurant.  Very little Burgundy options under $200; most in that price range were Village items that were overly marked up. With a wine list this unapproachable they should not be charging $68 corkage.  Plus, they were very slow to refill glasses.  In a restaurant that seats 22, you would think they would be able to perform simple tasks like refilling wine, clearing crumbs between courses, etc. The food was also incredibly disappointing.  There was nothing I could call "delicious." No, lobster does not pair well with thick pea puree.  No, caviar does not work with thick carrot puree.  And no, not all proteins should be done sous vide.  It was like a dinner of baby food. Plus, a big deal was made out of the Echire butter.  It was presented with a foil pack with the paper top removed but intact (sitting on the butter.)  The container was not even completely full; I think they served us a used butter.  It was also unsalted and there was no salt at the table.  We toyed with creating a scene and requesting salt, but decided against it. The whole thing felt very factory-like.  I could picture all the sous-chefs and assistants pureeing and sous-viding everything much earlier in the day then just executing with a simple assembly-line approach. In conclusion, We paid $170 per person for baby food in a very cold, unwelcoming setting.  I feel incredibly ripped off.
Heaven on a plate and then some. As the Hubster and I were trying to figure out what to do for our 1st wedding anniversary we thought, "It should be French, if we don't go anywhere."  A little tired of going the city we thought let's try to find something closer to what I call home now.  At first we thought of a spot in San Jose but eventually I yelped around and Palo Alto and Baume came up. Two words popped up on their website and I was sold:  French and Gastronomy! Yes, Chef Chemel and company are amazing.  We had course after course and each dish was flavorful and light and just plain delightful.  What also drew me in was that that you really have no choice in picking from the menu.  Baume gives you a list of ingredients that they would be using and asks you for any food allergies and what you'd like to drink and away we go! Out of the 12 dishes, the Hubster and I really thought the first course salad, the caviar parfait, the mushroom consume, suckling pig, root salad, perfectly cooked venison and the nitrogen-ed rocky road ice cream were the most memorable. Overall I felt like I was at Gordon Ramsay's restaurant in Versailles, and oh it cost almost as much!  LOL.
Three stars on Yelp means "A-OK"...that doesn't cut it when the cost per person hovers around $200 (before any wine).  Perhaps, with the newly granted "Two Michelin Stars," Chef Chemel felt that he could charge such a rate.  In a nutshell, it was an experience in molecular gastronomy...but for the cost, you don't get much. On the positive side, the space is pleasant; Baume is small, but the spacing and table arrangement is pretty good as it's not too crammed.  The environment was a bit stuffy though.  The overall noise level was quite low. Service was alright...our waiter was professional, but the "friendliness" factor wasn't completely there.  I also wish that he provided more information on each of the items served; with so many ingredients used here and there, we were left wondering what was this and what was that. Beautifully presented offerings overall.  And everything was prepared and cooked very well.  But still, at the end, nothing particularly stood out.  Baume goes with the multiple (I think it was 10-12) MINI offerings, but unless something was soooo great, you're just not going to remember.  And though I didn't leave hungry, I definitely didn't leave full.  Basically, at the end of the meal, it was more of a feast for the eyes than the stomach. I did order the Baumetini, a sparkling sake, to start off the meal and it was probably the highlight...but it was ho-hum from there...with a hefty price tag.  You'll see many other reviewers of Baume voicing the same opinion.  I wish I had paid more attention to them.
Maybe it's silly of me to write an update when I haven't been back to the restaurant. Instead, I went to WD-50 in Manhattan, and am more disappointed in my experience at Baume now that I know how good molecular gastronomy can be. Here's my take. In a food comparison, WD-50 wins hands down. The textures and flavors were amazing. The presentation was thoughtful and playful, including a fantastic foie-lafel, i.e. foie that had been shaped into a ball and then crusted and fried as if a falafel, paired with amazing sauce, lettuce and pita bread. The texture of the foie was still creamy and soft, and the flavors went so well together despite the crazy combination. WD-50 was everything I thought molecular gastronomy could offer plus more. Let's compare that against Baume. At Baume, I had a foie "grape" dish made to look like a bunch of grapes with all of the grapes plucked off save two. Those two were made with foie that I think maybe should have had the same texture as the foie-lafel I had at WD-50, i.e. creamy and smooth like foie should be but crusted with something resembling a grape peel. Instead, the foie-grape was completely frozen and chalky, making it both unpleasant to eat and to taste. What makes it even odder is that I missed the connection between the foie and the grapes -- why would you want to make foie look like a grape??? Not only does it look and taste terrible, it doesn't make sense. And the kicker: WD-50, despite being in Manhattan, was priced less than Baume.
I love interesting textures and was so excited to try molecular gastronomy at Baume. Unfortunately,... Read more 
Baume is an enchanting restaurant in Palo Alto that focuses on molecular gastronomy French cuisine. Chef Bruno Chemel creates a dazzling menu with a brilliant succession of flavors in seemingly incongruous technique combinations. What is molecular gastronomy? It is the innovative field of science behind food and cooking. In other words, it is the use of science in creation of food. Chemistry and physics are the core of this discipline. Some call this food trend chemistry art because of the alterations made to its natural physical properties. - Pretty cool, dontcha think? While some believe it may be a threat to our eco-system, others simply view it as a form of culinary art. Whether you're for it or against it,  and whether it's a temporary trend or a permanent fixture in the restaurant industry, it is a matter of debate. Though a lot of people do not realize that many casual to fine dining restaurants have tapped into molecular cooking for some time now...I'd say its been around for the past decade in SF and possibly longer (the appearance of foam certainly helped increased interest in molecular gastronomy). This discipline is developed furthest in France and most cosmopolitan cities in the U.S. are slowly catching up to this practice. I predict that in a few years the trend will grow and will be seeing a lot more restaurants in SF Bay Area aiming its concentration on molecular cooking and food. Menu Expectation: Baume offers Menu Gastronomique $118, with Drinks and Wines Pairing at $188 and Menu Decouverte $168, with Drinks and Wines Pairing at $248. Diners will not know what they're going to get but  will be given a sheet listing the ingredients that will be used. So if you see an ingredient listed on the side of the menu that you're allergic to, tell them. This post will cover the Menu Decouverte with beverage pairing Believe it or not, that Altoid looking thing below actually blooms into a wet towel. [pic] Left: Baumetini, Right: Kir Tres Royal [pic] Baumetini: sparkling sake with mini burst of passion fruit caviar. Kir Tres Royal: solidified cylinder of cassis melting into the champagne to create this luminous lava lamp effect. Amuse bouce #1: Avocado Glace, Cilantro, Masa, Smoked corn flour [pic] Amuse bouche #2: Broccoli Parmesan [pic] Amuse bouche #3: Carrot - Cardamon, Wasabi Puff [pic] The liquid nitrogen and foam added a heavenly effect to the carrot cardamon. Taste-wise: it was my least favorite dish as it left a chalky finish to my palate. Caviar, Radish - Salt with Bruno Paillard Brut (Reims) N.V. [pic] 62 Egg, Prosciutto, Artichoke Puree with Jazz Cellards Viognier (Russian River Valley) 2008 [pic] I had high expectation of this dish and it did not disappoint one bit. One of Chemel's signature dishes. I broke the egg; tasted it on its own, mixed it with other components and it was divine all around. It had an ethereal airiness to it. Continue review at http://bexbites.com/2011...
You were my first molecular gastronomy experience, and I guess that would make it worth the approx $450 for two because I shared that experience with my dear friend. However, I am saddened that I was not able to try the 62 degree egg. Also,I hope they didn't discriminate my friend and I, because honestly some of the dishes were ???? (don't even have a word for it) (I'm reading the reviews here and people didn't get the dishes I disliked) Will edit this and post photo links. So when I come back in the future, can you please not treat us any differently. Onto the food, +1 for the foie gras ice cream. I ADORE foie gras, and have tried foie gras at every place IF they have it. I wasn't particularly a fan of the ice cream, BUT it was interesting to try it in that way. Seared foie gras was delicious. The dessert was splendid because I had 3 different kinds and all were very, very nice.
BF took me there for my birthday.  Nice looking restaurant, not too fancy but neat and cozy, feels very comfortable. Service was very good, as expected~ We ordered 2 of the menu gastronomique (8 Courses), one with wine pairing, since I don't think either of us can handle one glass of wine for each course, so we order one to share the wine. Overall I think the food is pretty awesome, and it's always fun to see different creative cooking techniques. Baume seems to like using foam and liquid nitrogen :) --------------------------------------------------------- The dish I like the MOST: I LOVE the first starter: avocado glace and broccoli parmesan. I really don't like avocado in general, but the avocado glace was so perfectly made, it took away that taste i don't like about avocado and made it really tasty. The broccoli parmesan is the best bread I had ever!!!So nice and soft,and the sauce with carrot mouse was super delicious! First course: Haricot vert salade with curry! Very interesting dish...I heard the sound when the server brought the dish,I thought it was hot,then when I ate it, realized it's the curry cooled with liquid nitrogen made the sound. Never seen anywhere use curry to make salad and as the first course even. And it is really tasty! The wine pairing with sauvignon blanc was very good too. Love it!! 3rd course: Fois gras with strawberry composition & foam. Honestly I tend not to order cooked fois gras if I have a choice, since it's really easy to screw up and taste really oily and fatty. I don't know what the chef has done, it is so perfect!!! Kept the nice smell of fois gras, but doesn't taste "gras" at all, especially with the foam, and it's crispy outside and really tender inside! It was nicely paired with a sweet German Riesling wine! ------------------------------------------------------------------ I like the corn soup too, and cleaned up my bowl with bread (I used to call this French licking,lol) as if there were no soup poured at all, haha! Nicely done, but I don't quite understand why it came with a Muscadet, esp. a quite sour Muscadet...with sweet corn soup...I don't quite like this combination, I'd keep that Muscadet for oysters ^^ The 2 main dish, Orade Royale & Zucchini Flan, and Grass Fed Beef, Paella Cubes, Red Wine Jus, Summer Truffle, are pretty good. But I think as main dish, it is really TOO little, seems even less than appetizer dishes! I think for a $100+ 8 course dinner, the main dish should at least have a bit more volume.  The Orade Royale was paired with a Chablis 1er Cru, which is nice, I wish it could be a better bottle for the real quality of Chablis 1er Cru though. For dessert, I like the one with foam and pudding, the blueberry chocolate tart I don't like it that much, it's a bit too sweet for me. -------------------------------------------------------------------- They gave me a plate with nicely written "Joyeux Anniversaire" and more dessert treats for my birthday, which is really cute and nice, I almost want to bring the plate home!!! -------------------------------------------------------------------- I enjoyed the experience at Baume--nice ambiance, friendly staff, delicious and creative food...I would not say it is the same level as French Laundry, it could be better, but it worth the price for the experience. P.S. The bathroom looks really nice--neat and very zen, but I think they could have use better toilette seat paper...:P
As I will once again give this review on a scale of 1-10 10 being the best, 1 being the worst. The 'Nine" course experience: Course #1 = 1  (palate cleanser/toilette cleanser, S'il vous plait prononcer correctement) Course#2  = 3 Course#3  = 7 Course#4  = 7 Course#5  = 8 Course#6  = 8 Course#7  =9 Course#8  =7 Course#9  =3 Champagne = 10  Can not remember the name,  just ask the wine sommelier you want the bottle with the cork that has been hand tied by the same gentleman from South of France for the past 120 years. :)  Talk about carpal tunnel. ;) Service = 10  all the way... The laughter through out the night absolutely Priceless......
Good food.  The truffles was orgasmic.    The egg was amazing.  It is quite expensive.
Second time around, our dining experience was even more impressive. In the 6 months since I've been here, the chef has gone beyond just flavor spheres and mousses to create adventerous dishes that involve more of the senses. With each course, you're amazed that the base ingredients are from the local farmers market because each dish is transformed into such a unique experience. Service has definitely become more polished with the setting silverware, removal if dishes, introductions to the courses, etc. We also really appreciated that they were so accommodating to dietary restrictions, since most tasting menus don't do substitutions. We really appreciated the extra thought put into each substituted course, as the alternative did not pale to the original menu item. Definitely go all out for the molecular gastronomy option, which ends up being 15 or 16 courses. The other option is more traditional French fare. Highlights this night included the sponge carrot bread service, the signature 62 degree egg, the prawn custard with a piquillo pepper center, the bacon wrapped pork with apple foam, sous vid quail, and the dessert of rum spheres in a citrusy foamed frozen concoction, topped with pop rocks. Even if you opt out of the wine pairings, consider a cocktail, like the baumetini with lilikoi pearls or the razzetini with liquid nitrogen frozen raspberry puree. It's definitely not a cheap meal but is one of the most unique dining experiences you can find in the bay area, conveniently located on the peninsula.
I brought my best friend here for his birthday, since he just finished culinary school and I knew he... Read more 
Came here to celebrate my husband's birthday.  After eating at Alinea in Chicago and experiencing molecular gastronomy cooking, I had high expectations of this place, but it wasn't too over-the-top.  Not every dish was using molecular gastronomy, but every dish was simple, refined food. We had an earlier seating at 6PM.  The menu consisted of main ingredients used on the left page, with the type of courses on the right.  All 4 of us opted for the Menu Gastronomique, which was like a 10 course meal.  I added the wine pairing. Even the cocktails were pretty unique with flavors that were freeze dried.  Each course was carefully put together and presented with excellence.  The experience was different than Alinea as here, the servers tell you what the dish is and what the flavors are, but it was fun to try the flavors in unique forms such as broccoli bread, parsley tofu spread, foie gras made to look like a cherry with a real stem, popcorn in corn soup, etc.  All the dishes were pretty good and the desserts were the most memorable.  I liked that the dishes were paired with wines mostly from local wineries.  Service was excellent. I think I had a better dining experience with a multi-course meal here than I did at Manresa and Plumed Horse.  The environment here is not as uptight and intimidating either.  Unfortunately, I wasn't "wowed" enough to give 5 stars.  I wish they would have given away the menus to keep so I can remember what I ate to go with the photos we took.
Went here a whiles back and tried the 10 course meal (middle offering).  They offered 3 prix fixe options at the time and if I could do it again I might just go ahead and splurge on the 15 course meal for the full experience.  My 10 course experience rated 4 stars. It's located way at the end of Cali Street in Palo Alto.  You'll have to find street parking which isn't too bad since that end isn't quite as busy as the El Camino side.  The entrance just has a small sign, but the interior is nice.  It's private, quiet, and lush feeling.  Service was awesome.  They made sure we were always well taken care of.  The food was also quite good.  They do the molecular gastronomy thing here and the food is as good as it is interesting. Now if everything is so good, why only 4 stars you ask me?  I don't feel like you quite get your money's worth here.  The food was good, but some of the courses were so small I feel like it's hard to call them courses.  One of the courses consisted of something that was frozen in nitro so we had to pop it in right away since it had a shelf life of about 10 seconds.  I feel that a course like that is more food science fluff than substance and didn't quite appreciate it being a course on its own.  So that's kinda where the star knock off came. Of course it wasn't all bad.  There were some wonderful plays on food.  They did the caviar thing in the beginning as well as the end.  Visually the 2 courses looked the same, but the first one was savory while the 2nd one at the end of the course was a sweet introduction to dessert. All in all it's a very nice restaurant and you will feel taken care of here.  It's  a great place to try and get your food geek on.
Well this place sure was different. Since its considered one of those fancy pants molecular gastronomy places; the menu is of course very small and just basically one page. Actually, it wasnt a menu at all...it was just list of ingredients that they had back in their kitchen and they ask you if you are allergic to anything...its basically like eating at home...where you look into the fridge to see what to make for dinner out of the stuff you have. Except instead of week old chinese food and rotten tomatoes sitting in the back, this place has the creme de la creme of ingredients and freshes of foods. Everything from duck to filet to some type of special fish i have never had before. So when when i went in (got here late because totally forgot what time i made the reservation for) our table wasnt quite ready so they had us sit down and wait a bit. It was very interesting ambiance; a very small room with curtains dividing it up and acting as walls. The wait for our table ended up being a bit long ~ which was a down side (but i think i was partly at fault because of our tardiness). However, as we were waiting the host comes over and offers my girlfriend and i a glass of champagne while we wait. My girlfriend (being the alcohol engorger she is) quickly complies to a glass of champagne, I on the other hand, politley decline because i didnt want to get a slight buzz of anything that would take away from the magical explosions of juicy tastiness that was waiting for mouth (hmm...maybe not the best way to describe my excitement for the food i was about to eat). We then are taken to our seats and a small white tablet is brought before us. Our waiter politely tells me, as i look with mouth watering at this first dish brought to us, to please not eat this little white tablet because it is a compressed hand towel and will exponentially expand when in contact with water. My intial thoughts were of bewilderment and amazement... it was going to be a wonderful dinner ANND contain a magic show...it was pretty much like going to vegas at that point for me. So he then comes over pours boiling water (from a sake bottle, so classy eh?) over the tablet and it expands from a tablet to a long slightly curved tube shaped object...it just...umm ...grew...kinda like...ya noe.... But after that wonderful intiial display of science, it was on to the food. And, as i may say. it was great food indeed. As many of you may know, this place has garnered TWO michelin stars; which is a very high honor. And to tell you the truth...i dont think i can tell the difference from one star to two stars to even three stars. BUT i will say that the way foods are "made" here is very interesting and the textures are just the best that can be. The vegetables are fresh and taste even better than anything you can get at the store (even their simple boiled bok choy...just tasted out of this world). Every dish looked amazing and seemed to do something even better than just taste good. It was as if every time a new course, out of the multiple 12 course meal, came a new act in a show started and it would just amaze not just your mouth (gots to really lay back on using words such as amazment and explosions and wonderful with..mouth) but your eyes and your ears. Why ears you say? WELL there are just so many different sounds during dinner. Whether its the crackling of nitrogen frozen ice cream or the soothing sounds of the waiter describing the dishes in spectacular detail with the type of ambiance and voice you would find on a late night radio show playing 80s and 90s love mix; everything was just done with the upmost class and pinache. So...if everything was such a wonderful mixture of sounds, sights, and taste...what did i give this wonderful concoction of a night only 4 stars? This shit was expensive son! Yes, you want to make your wallet lighter by iunno...a lot...you come here! I usually over order at a restaurant and order a whole bunch of crap not needed because im an inner fatty and glutton at heart...but this time i just literally stayed within the confines of what the chef laid out and it was already a very expensive bill. BUT as i say this, you cant put a price on happiness (or those magical explosions in your mouth....ok that was the last explosion in your mouth i will put in here) and for the dining experience you want to have on that special occasion, this is the place to come. Because just as with everything, the price is part of the experience and i think if you dont feel like you lost an arm and a leg while eating here...you wont be able to justify just how wonderful the experience was. (i have no idea if that last sentence made sense....i feel i have to say something like that to justify the price of this restaurant....EXPLOSIONS IN THE MOUTH SIR!)
The ambiance was modern and chic, but the staff was overly pretentious. When asked what kind of water I would like, I responded "tap" and the waiter didn't hesitate to say (in a rather condescending tone) , "City water it is." At least he didn't say "sewer water"!  The presentation was lovely and the food was good, but after dining at Chez TJ just a few weeks prior, for me, Baume just didn't measure up. The Chef is much more excited about freezing virtually everything in liquid nitrogen than we were.  The wine selections were nice, but we felt that we left with more wine in our stomach than food. Further, we would have given up a little of the presentation for a tad more substance to the flavors and selections. Don't waste your money. Opt for Chez TJ in Mountain View. It has a quaint ambiance, less pretentious staff, and delicious food, with similar thoughtfully chosen wine pairings.
an evening of molecular gastronomical experiments done right. two michelin stars. great flavors. playful textures. artistic presentation. service needs a little warmth but adequate. just don't eat the hand towel.
Baume is a restaurant you come to for the EXPERIENCE. Their food is also delicious, but not in the classic French style with delicate but intricate sauces. Baume is where you'll see and taste dishes you'll probably never get to try again (unless you come back, that is). I opted to come for their lunch, Fridays only, from 11:00am - 1:00pm, and selected the 9 course tasting menu for $128. The 5 course tasting is definitely more wallet friendly at $78/person, but you won't regret the 9 course experience. We saw a nearby table that got the 5 course and it didn't seem nearly as awesome. The service here is impeccable, and the staff is very courteous without being too stiff. I don't remember all my courses anymore, but I remember that their signature dish, the 62 degree farm egg, was amazing! Chef Chemel does an excellent job overall of weaving in molecular gastronomy techniques, but not overpowering the freshness of the ingredients. Baume is a must try for any foodie!
Once or twice a year hubby and I go out for a ridiculously overpriced dinner to celebrate a birthday or anniversary or something. So this time we chose Baume. I was really torn on where to rate Baume because part of the experience is fabulous. Service and presentation are just perfect. Everyone was warm and welcoming and the dining room is lovely. Presentation is also very nice, including the little towel that looks like a pill and then they put a little hot water on it and it "blooms" into a towel. Here is the my problem. For what you pay ( and this  is take a second mortage on your house pricing) the food was good but not mind blowingly fabulous. Not like Manresa where I did not begrudge a penny. So that is why I gave them 3 stars. The food did not match up to the pricing. If the price was 15% lower, I would have given them another star.
Heard good reviews about this place and we came on Friday night for a birthday celebration.  The place is easy to find on a less foot traffic area.  It has nice and comfortable ambience inside and we love the fact that the place is not too big (fits 8 tables total) and they don't pack a ton of tables (like Gary Danko), we feel comfortable with spacing and the opportunity of people watching. The restaurant strikes us as French, creative and most importantly striking to trigger all our senses for a dining experience.  The dishes aren't necessarily very molecular gastronomic, but the lemon scent spray on a salad dish, the vanilla scent box with dry ice, the water ignited pill looking wet towel, these are all examples of how we were encouraged to use our nose, our eyes to enjoy a beautiful dinner in addition to our taste buds. I gave it a four star only because I wish the staff can spend a little bit more time on explaining each dish and maybe some stories about how the chef creates them.
Hubs decided to treat the both of us to an out of this world dining experience.  So glad we went!  We had a wonderful time. It was definitely a splurge, but we both enjoyed ourselves and everything that Baume had to offer.  I was a bit intimidated by the staff coming over everytime to clear the table and set up new silverware, but they were always very sweet. Service, presentation, taste-all A+ in my book!
I'm SOOO in love with their food!! Great tasty food!! It's great for a couple's date night!
In a nutshell: Food: 4 stars Service: 4 stars Performance/Cost (bang for the buck): 2 stars I feel as if all the highly rated restaurants, whether those ratings came from Zagat, Michelin or whatever else are ultimately classified into two different types - 1) those that are great and you feel that you got your money's worth and 2) those that are great and you feel that they cost an arm and a leg. Baume was the latter, but the experience was pretty decent. We dined here on an early Saturday for to early celebrate my birthday.  The outside of the restaurant was very unassuming - it had this comforting bistro look and you couldn't really peek in at all.  When we walk in, the decor is dark and orange, and there are two different dining rooms.  We were seated immediately and was given our menu/wine list. The genesis of this restaurant is so that the chef uses whatever is the most fresh that week and lists out about 20 different ingredients that he's going to make - but the menu doesn't actually tell you exactly what dishes you will have - which is tons of fun and mysterious.  Two different kinds of menus exist - menu gatronomie (8 courses) and the menu decouverte (12 courses).  We opted for the menu decouverte with the wine pairing. I don't think that I have the greatest of memories to list out all dishes including the amuses-bouche and palate cleansers, but let me just enumerate some of the highlights and...ahem...not-so-highlights. Highlights: 1. Black truffles - awesome.  The generous grating  of the fragrant black truffle really uplifted the potato rissotto. 2. the 62 degree eggs - plane delicious.  It was unctious, creamy and warm - made me feel at home. 3. The pork - perfectly cooked and well seasoned. 4. The BREADS - I could have just had the bread and be happy all the way. 5. The wine paring was nicely done - they really crossed borders and showed us dexterity with their wine selection, we went all over france, spain, oregon and california with our pairings - nice job. Not-so-highlights: 1. I felt that toward the end, they were trying to hurry up so that we could leave - ALL desserts came out at once which was a nono.  They were individually very good but i was baffled that they were trying to shove all three desserts at us once. 2. I made it clear that I couldn't eat any game meats but my friend LOVES the game meat - but we both ended up being served beef - they missed what we were trying to get to... 3. No coffee/tea service???  What's up with that? The food was inventive and well executed, the service for the most part was pretty flawless.  When we got the bill, however, I really had to think whether this was a $400 experience.  You spend half of that at some of my other favorite one-Michelin star restaurants such as Madrona Manor and Gary Danko and experience great food and service.  I had a hard time justifying spending that much at this place.  Don't get me wrong - the food was very good and a one of a kind experience, but...$400?  I could buy a nice pair of Canali shoes with those...and they would have lasted me longer :) In conclusion: I feel tentative about coming back because of its low performance/cost ratio (at least if my book), but if I strike it rich, maybe a $400 meal wouldn't mean anything but just a casual dining experience :)
Congratulations to California Avenue's first Michelin Starred restaurant. If you're looking for fantastically inventive molecular gastronomy in the line of el Bulli (now closing/closed!) this is your best bet in the entirety of the Bay Area. The dishes will surprise and startle you with a course selection that brilliantly "bookends" the eight-course meal with *tiny* carrots (yuzu-soured at the start to "awaken the palate" and sweetened at the end to wrap things up). The mushroom-scallop entree is a true work of genius that demands acclaim. The wait staff performs a meticulous ballet in presentation that I've only seen equaled at French Laundry. The only caveat I would apply here is that most truly world-class restaurants tend to focus on either Execution or Innovation. French Laundry is the chief example of the former - where a meal is extraordinarily executed to be more DELICIOUS than SURPRISING (and does this so well that it brought me to tears). el Bulli is the ultimate example of the latter case - where you are eating "impossible space food" that you've never seen or tasted before, that shocks and startles and amazes with every course. Baume is an example of the latter - the quality ("deliciousness") of the courses sometimes falls short in its attempt to wow you with its innovative approach. (As an example, the dessert course featured lovely but mealy cubic brownie bites.) But it is truly a gem - if you're willing to pay the price of admission, no other restaurant in the Bay Area serves food as genuinely novel as Baume.
Liked it alot - it's not very often you find quaint, super friendly french cuisine in the south bay.  They were also very accommodating to our 6-yr old daughter.  Even though they don't have a kids menu (as you would expect for a nice restaurant), they made special courses just for her.  And when she didn't like the fish, they brought out another flower salad for her. The signature 62 degree egg was to die for and the presentation of the strawberry soup was wonderful.  I took off one star only because the wine/drink pairing was not always timed well or explained.  Some courses had pairings and some didn't, or they came late (or early), not sure so I had to ask a couple times.  Other than that, I definitely would come back and recommend everyone to try.
Molecular gastronomy at its best.  Baume gets 4.5 stars. Bf and I came here for our birthdays and were both delighted with service, flavor, quantity, and ambiance.  Many people warn you against molecular gastronomy because of all the foam but we thought that it was done in a very pleasant fashion.  Baume did not over do it and we were definitely full at the end of the meal. We had the 12 course tasting with wine pairing.  Everything tasted spot on and paired great with the wine.   We even had the opportunity to tour their small kitchen at the end of the night. I would  definitely recommend Baume for any special occasion.  It's tough on the wallet but worth every penny. Minus 0.5 stars as there were only 3 meat courses.  We saw grass-fed beef in the ingredients but turns out that was only for the 8 course tasting, not the 12.  I'm still boggled by this.. shouldn't the 12 course tasting include everything in the 8 plus more?
Took my wife there for special occasion. It was overall a great experience. Some dishes were outstanding as some other were ok. We did enjoy the all experience to go through so many dishes. The asparagus caviar and the beef were so good. Another highlight was the wine pairing. I usually never get it, but i tried this time. It was fabulous. Service was great. Not too many people on the floor and the food as well as the wine always came at the right moment. I would definitely recommend this place, but be aware that it is expensive.
Oh my...Bruno Chemel is a rock star!  But then again, maybe it was the wine! Or was it?  We had a 2006 Clos de la Roche Armand Rousseau, the premium wine pairings and two glasses of champagne...not in that order.  Oh what a night!  Tab around $1500, worth every penny.  Chef Chemel is inventive, creative, and a force to be reckoned with.  12 beautiful courses served in an intimate and comfortable setting with approximately 12 tables. Coincidence?  Perhaps. Chef Chemel loves toying with citrus (and other mediums) with liquid nitrogen creating what my dining companion coined as the most amazing flavor packed little frozen "drooplets".  Every course was unique and a delight.  We look forward to returning in the very near future.  Kudo's Chef Chemel, well done!
It's good, but it's not as good as it wants to be. We had a nice meal at Baume for our anniversary. We chose the larger number of courses, but didn't do a wine pairing (I did have two glasses of wine selected to go with my meal, but can't handle a glass per course. :) The food was good. The service was a little stuffy, but fine. It just wasn't amazing, and for the pricetag, it should be amazing. We celebrate our anniversary every year by going out to fabulous restaurants, and this one didn't measure up in comparison.
This is my first molecular gastronomy restaurant. Which i find exciting and intriguing. I came here with my husband and another couple and we decided to go for menu gastronomique which is an 8 course meal. There is no menu with the dinner. There is only 2 choices. It's either you do 12 course or 8. Each dish was a surprise. I was impressed with the presentation of each dish. Very unique and delicious. they have interesting cocktails as well and that sparkling sake is yummy. The restaurant is small yet comfortable. modern and romantic. Not loud. Perfect for date night and just enjoy good food while having a nice conversation. The service is amazing. You can ask to have a sneak peak in the kitchen and meet chef bruno chemel because we did!
Haha glad to see that the Michelin guide did finally catch up - Baume received one Michelin star in January of this year.
Move aside, Michelin guide! Who needs the little red book when you have good local Yelp friends who... Read more 
(See pics for the experience and ingredients) When you go to a restaurant and realized you can't comprehend how they make the dishes and you have an extraordinary tasting that you can't quite describe, you have an experience. Baume is definitely an experience. What they present you is a list of ingredients, not a menu of dishes. Without a written menu, it allows the chef to be creative without being bound to the printed paper. The more popular liquid nitrogen, the multiple sophisticated preparation with interesting ingredients that are even more intriguing in the taste and presentation. This was for every dish, from the amuse bouche on hand painted glass plates brought from NY, to the gelatin style / sweet bubble (literally) presentation. A few dishes and ingredients that I remember: ricotta strawberry, oyster with beet, celery sorbet with kiva, venison cous with kumquat and a bit of cranberry, coconut olive, lobster with uni on cous cous and foie gras, beef and Catalina beans with citrus, 3 days sous-vide, coconut tapioca foam with lychee jelly, goat cheese, chocolate gelato, passion seed. Need I say more? Each dish was almost inexplicably on how they prepared it. You can taste different pieces but you don't quite know how they did it. The 8 wine pairings were impeccable Out of all 8 wines, 2 were staff picked. Each wine was perfectly and creatively done. It's inventive and imaginative that you did not know what to expect. You anticipated for each course's delight and wanted more. I particularly loved how they had multi-level shelves of wine glasses right next to the tables and served each one based on the dish. It heightened the wine pairing experience to a very different level! The time we visited it was also when they just opened up the new section and we were the first guests to dine in that new section. Service was absolutely fantastic as the dinner was paced in perfect timing. We also got to meet with the chef before the dinner as well as a tour to their kitchen, the behind the scene. Beautiful and professional kitchen! This can easily be the next shining star. They opened up just beginning of the year for its innovation, creativity, freshness of ingredients. Big thanks to Julie K for bringing us to this restaurant and with fantastic friends Kevin and Yee Gan!
An exotic but oddly paced meal with a strange mix of unforgettable, innovative cuisine and dishes that left me feeling "outsmarted." I came here on a special date with a fellow foodie, for their "le douze" tasting menu, which as you might guess, has 12 courses.  Desiring to maximize our exploration, we split a wine pairing and a truffle supplement. Of the 12 courses, we were in agreement that about 5 were home runs: - "Roots vegetable garden" which sounds simple but included about a dozen ingredients including a wonderful sweet and savory onion that tasted non-vegetarian.  It was painfully small but this served to make even more impressive the range of flavors that was successfully blended. - Kabocha Squash Soup with "Pumpkin Seeds Ice Cream": Perhaps the highlight of the entire evening, this was effectively served as two parts: tiny dippin-dots-esque mini pieces of ice cream shaped into pumpkin seeds, and a warm soup. The waiter dropped the mini ice cream pieces in for us. The melting made for a magic in-mouth experience the likes of which I had never experienced.  The closest would be like a bite of ice cream swimming in hot fudge, but this was a more restrained, savory version. The wine pairing here was home run too, a 2010 Viognier from Katie's Vinyard (Jazz Cellars). - Lobster - served with a variety of complimentary side items - but only about one bite.  Again the wine pairing was exceptional, a "Robert Traverso Chardonnay" that smelled of sea foam. - Grass-fed beef.  They used a sous-vide to make the filet mignon (even) more tender and the result was life changing.  Again, only one bite here. - Egg nog served in a lasered-open egg.  In addition to being cute, it was delicious. The other dishes were often more "impressive" for what they attempted rather than how they tasted: freeze dried (yet chilled) rocky road ice cream, Apple "sand" made out of crushed, freeze dried Apple, a carefully heated egg dish that had too much bland accompanying vegetables, transparent, variously flavored foams, handcrafted jellies, various miniature vegetables, etc etc.  During and after each of these, I often felt like I was experiencing the culinary equivalent of Schoenberg's twelve tone works: I understood what they were going for and how difficult it was to achieve, but I couldn't honestly say I loved the result. Many places that serve tasting menus follow the idea, attributed to Thomas Keller, that two bites (and about 6 courses) is a sort of optimum.  By going with 12 courses of one bite each, Baume is taking a risk, as it's a different, less tested formula.   While I salute their courage and innovation, I can't say it worked out well for me; with 10-15 minutes between single-bite courses, I found myself feeling more hungry than filled with anticipation, possibly because many of the less successful dishes were offered earlier in the meal. The tasting menu price was in line with what you'd expect for exotic offerings in a Michelin starred establishment, but the wine pairing, truffle supplement, and non-included gratuity shot us past French Laundry territory very quickly.  In the future, I'd skip the truffles and ask for just the two most successful wine pairings... (if only they could predict what I'd like!) It may seem like such an experience deserves fewer than 4 stars, but the home runs listed above were so far out of the ballpark they went into the 6 star range.  Also, I view their "portion size versus number of courses balance" to be more of a challenge for the fine dining industry than for this business in particular; some day in the future, great chefs will figure out that it makes little sense to serve the same 1- to 2-bite dishes over 3 hours to both a 185 pound man and a 110 pound woman.  But until then, I'll recommend checking up on Yelp reviews before booking, to see how many of their tasting menu dishes are home runs.
Bruno & Christie, Congrats on your Michelin Star! Having been back with several friends at this point, and being thoroughly enjoyed by all....very well deserved
Out of the ashes of the Bistro Basia and before that Nora's Cafe is Baume. Chef Bruno Chemel has... Read more 
Baume - Oui, Oui!! Came here with a special friend when we could not get reservations at the French Laundry.  The reviews looked great and our expectation was high, and while the overall experience was nice and interesting it was not inspiring. We selected the 10 course menu and I think it was the right choice.  15 courses would have been too much.  We brought our own wine and did not select the wine pairing but had their champagne at the start. The molecular gastronomy had some unique presentations (like food frozen in liquid nitrogen) , and many of the dishes--and some of the amuse bouche--were very inventive and tasty. The service was generally quite good although a few times we were left unattended for longish periods.  Our attendant had a quirky habit of replying to our questions with a "Oui" or sometime with a "Oui Oui" which was ok and made us smile a bit.  But when my friend asked him a question in French, which she speaks fluently, he was taken aback and acknowledged that he speaks only one word of French!! The quality of the food was generally very good, nothing to criticize about, but there was no "wow" factor.  I expected the Elysian Lamb to be "out of this world" but it was just OK.  All in all a good dining experience, deserving of their one Michelin star and more or less the cost.
Molecular gastronomic delights abound at newly opened Baume (named for French chemist Antoine Baume), opened by Michelin starred Chef Bruno Chemel. While I never got a chance to dine at Chez TJ, where he earned the Michelin star, I had the pleasure of coming here with some fellow foodie friends on Day 4. The menu is prix fixe only with five courses offered for $78.00, drinks and wine paring for $50 more. The contemporary French food blends both Californian and Asian influences and is made with seasonal and often locally sourced organic ingredients. I, too, had the same tasting menu as Kim N did (which I will copy and paste - thanks, Kim!): -Seaweed Flat Bread with parsnip tofu spread -Amuse Bouche of Scallop, various spices -Red and Orange Beets, Goat Cheese, Espelette -Pumpkin Soup, Pumpkin Seeds, Vadovan, Nutmeg Foam -Poached Striped Bass, Yuzu Miso and Dashi Broth, Toasted Rice, Daikon Panna Cotta -Amuse Bouche of Lychee, Chocolate Crisps -Filet of Beef, Black Truffles, Maitaki Mushrooms, Button/Maitaki Mushroom Tart, Truffle Puree -Chocolate Sponge Cake, Liquid Chocolate Pebble, Orange Granita, Vanilla Foam -Orange Soda with Chocolate Sorbet -Green Tea Eclairs -Wine Pairings: Vouvray (100%Chenin Blanc I do remember), Beauregard (Santa Cruz Mtns) Chardonnay, Pinot Noir Every dish was beautifully presented, full of flavors and textures. It was so much fun eating everything. The fish and beef seemed a TAD overcooked, but other than that, everything was delicious. Of course, expect small portions from the tasting menu. Service was phenomenal - we were greeted by Chef Bruno's lovely wife, who works the front of the house. Our party of four was always served in sync, and each course was described in full detail by our server. We also had the wonderful opportunity of taking a tour of their humble kitchen, led by Chef Bruno himself. Oh, I also have a renewed love for pearls, thanks to Baume. I could imagine someone in the kitchen dedicated to carefully concocting all these different types of fruit caviar. It all started with the Baumetini, their signature cocktail made with sparkling sake and passion fruit caviar. And throughout the meal, we'd find dishes topped with little balls full of flavor. Mmm... pop! I love that the menu wishes you an "enjoyable and zen evening with us"... and that I did.
seriously. woohoo! as good as it gets! 250 a person is out of my price range, so you d think id be passive aggresive. but these guys nailed it. they were even accessible in each excessive move. the story goes that the chez tj guy always wanted two michelin stars. so he cut this guy loose. he went cal ave, i guess just to keep it super undercover, and got two michelin stars. and i'd say it's underated. but i don't know much. the service was the best part. casual conversation flowed around a perfect ambiance
Molecular gastronomy is such a fun wave in fine dining, but I thought Moto from Chicago was a little wilder and edgier. I had expected something of the Charlie the Chocolate Factory but with food, however it was slightly tame. I suppose it's good because the crowd were much older. I had gone to Moto last year, and since I've moved out here, the closest thing to it would be Baume. The Ambiance was relaxing, not too many tables. Decor was minimal. It is a great place to have a long dinner, and chat. We got the 8 course, and thankfully we chose the 8 instead of 12, by the end we were stuffed, even though everything was small bite-sized portions. There is nothing more luxurious than eating a slow coursed meal, and every plate was a delightful surprise.  It's pretty exciting to wonder what will come out next, and what will it taste like. Most of the dishes were great except for a few that I thought was passable. I wasn't very phased by the 62 degree egg, but I was wowed by the truffle shaved over potatoes. Some of my favorite dishes, the carrot sponge right in the beginning with the 25 year old aged Balsamic Sauce was the spongiest bread I've ever had! It was fluffy, light, and simply delightful. The asparagus was cooked to perfection, and topped with these small flavor bubbles. The desert was by far the BEST desert I've had in the world! it was a plate of vanilla snow, that wasn't overbearingly sweet like most deserts. it had some cocoa in the middle, and paired with butter biscuits dipped in chocolate sauce. The entire meal takes about 3.5 hrs. So if you do decide to adventure there, be sure to take good company. Service was spectacular. We loved our server. Why do I love it, because majority of the plates are impossible to duplicate at home. I love cooking and am a pretty good chef..but some of the flavors and dishes require special techniques and equipment. Price: very expensive for what it is, but worth it because it's a great experience!
Okay, puns suck ass but Baume truly is da bomb in my neck of the woods. After reading about this place on my favorite food blogs (shout outs to http://www.bunrab.com and http://www.foodgal.com ), I was dying to try this place.  Plus, it's five minutes away (and I couldn't get into Coi, Manresa, or Commis). My Yelping has really taken a back seat since I got myself a Bodybugg.  We hardly go out now since I gotta log all the food I ingest.  However, the other night at Baume, I made a conscious decision to order the fifeen course tasting menu and screw logging my calories for the night! I won't go into all the details of what we had since the menu changes but we had a great meal and fantastic, well-orchestrated service.  The main differences between the ten and fifteen course menus are that the fifteen has additional desserts and (on this particular night) dishes with prawn, bergamot, salmon, uni, and caviar.  I've had molecular gastronomy before at Alinea and although I found our meal really interesting and unique, I didn't enjoy the taste of everything I ate.  Some stuff was too out there even for me, a self-proclaimed super adventurous eater.  How do you feel about soy sauce and chocolate in your dessert?  Me thinks it's kinda icky. Not the case at Baume.  I enjoyed everything I ate and wasn't too stuffed when I finished.  Instead of the molecular gastronomy taking center stage (e.g. Wow!  A sphere is exploding hot liquid in my mouth!), the natural ingredients are showcased and enhanced by the kitchen chemistry. I would definitely return in a heartbeat and order the fifteen course menu again.  I like Coi and Manresa a little bit more but I'd return here before going back to Gary Danko or the Dining Room at the Ritz Carlton. Yes, I've enjoyed meals at both places but the food's a bit dated and pedestrian compared to my new faves. I hope this place stays in business - I love having a yummy, high-end place in the area.  I can't tell you how many times I've said the disclaimer, "well, it's good for Palo Alto..." Baume is just great.  Period.
Close to home hidden Michelin starred spot that lived up to the hype. Main courses sang and staff was wonderful. 4.5 stars Food: 4.5, Service: 4.5, Atmosphere: 4.5 Return worthiness: yes Cost to worth it rating: 3 ($168 12 course tasting, $288 with standard wine pairing) Eve award: best use of foam, best egg nog Highlights: - Lobster: heaven on a plate. Delicate chunks of lobster covered by lemon foam and sitting beside the most delightful thick vanilla sauce sprinkled with coffee beans. So many flavors that worked together - Halibut: loved the light orange foam cloud of subtle curry it was lying in. The medallions of pumpkin used to mimic scales was fun. - Suckling pig: tender square topped with crispy skin seasoned just right so not too salty - Beet celery root drink: naturally a bit sweet and refreshing - Egg nog: cutest presentation within an egg shell and perfect flavoring forgoing the turn off of overspiced nog - Green apple palate cleanser: intense apple flavor with adorable green apple "sand" - Lychee coconut water float: creative pairing with dessert Ricky road - Staff: I always worry about pretentious condescending staff at these types of places and the servers here were none of that. They were delightful and chatted with us and laughed with us when we were excited and silly about certain plates. - Little touches: love that they gave each girl a purse hook for the table and when I asked for the menu didn't just give me the ingredient list that we saw but the entire menu signed! :-) - Atmosphere: small room segmented into halves. Simplistic but elegant decor with a dark orange wall next to a dark chocolate one Lowlights: - 2 vegetable salad plates: like the intention featuring veggies but having 2 seemed a bit redundant - Filled foccacia: bit overpowering fig filling so couldn't taste the bread or pistachio much Enjoyed the menu, staff, environment, and overall experience and I'd come back.
We were really excited to eat a two michelin star restaurant, but it wasn't to our liking. The service was good though.
Visited on their second night of service and felt that things were running quite smoothly.  The dining room is decorated with nice earthy browns and oranges, which is quite pleasant. For the next month or so, the only option on the menu is a 5-course tasting menu, which you can get with or without wine pairings.  Their plan is to work up to 10 and eventually 15 courses. They offer several aperitifs and we both opted for the Baumentini (what they are already calling their signature drink), which is sake with passion fruit caviar.  The caviar is really pearls of passion fruit that pop in your mouth and release bursts of flavor.  The drink could've easily done with three times the amount of pearls. Hopefully, all the photos I've posted will give people an idea of what their food is like.  All the courses were very good and plated beautifully.  One of the highlights for me was the goat cheese pearls that came with the beet salad.  Pearls were a running theme throughout the meal.  Like the pearls in the drinks, the goat cheese pearls burst open in your mouth.  They were delicious and fun.  Other highlights were the pumpkin soup, tempura bok choy with carrots, parsnips, and brown rice (the vegetarian option they provided us with when we opted out of a fish course), the balsamic vinegar and olive oil spread, and the green tea eclairs. Overall, the meal was very good, but not great.  I'm interested in seeing what a 10 or 15 course meal here would be like and in seeing how their service shapes up once they are fully staffed with the people they are planning to bring in. Minor quibbles about the service, which will probably improve on their own over time: 1.  The hostess spoke too quietly and couldn't get through her introduction without giggling and being vague as if she didn't really understand what the whole experience was intended to be like. 2.  Our server was very friendly, professional, and had a good sense of humor, but I often had trouble hearing everything he had to say, as well, which should not have been a problem given the low ambient noise level. 3.  The server across the way was far too loud - we could hear everything he had to say to his table even over our own conversation and it became quite unpleasant towards the end of the evening, especially because he had so many stories to tell them. The chef himself, Bruno Chemel, came out to serve dishes multiple times and even came to chat with us at the end of the meal.  It was definitely nice to have his attention for a few minutes. This place gets 3 stars for the overall experience and the very good, but not great food.  To me, it wasn't quite worth the price tag (and that was even with one of us not getting the wine pairings).  It's worth a visit if you're not quite sure what this molecular gastronomy thing is all about.
Now that I've read the other reviews, it's clear why Baume is so boring. It's by Chez TJ's former Bruno. The other Bruno, of course :) Let's just say Mr Chemel is no Ferran Adria. You can say "molecular" until you're blue in the face but if the food is boring, nothing will save the restaurant. Not even the great service, nice decor, awesome wine list, or two amuse-bouche offerings served on the just-so porcelain tray, placed in the absolute geometrical center of the table. Not a single dish in our 5-course dinner tasted good. It ranged between tasteless and very tasteless. Stay away.
Everything about this restaurant is exceptional: ambiance, service, food, presentation - a truly superb dining experience. My husband took me here for my birthday.  We both agreed to go with the ten-course dinner.  There's no 'menu' with the dinner, just the type of ingredients the chef use to prepare the food.  Since I'm a picky eater, I wasn't sure how flexible they would be, but they were extremely accommodating. Many people have commented about the food.  And since the ingredients are updated quite frequently, I will skip comments on each of the dishes.  All I can say is that they are unique, with distinctive flavors, and a little adventurous. My husband and I both thought this was one of the best meals we've had, almost comparable to Per Se in NYC.  I wouldn't at all be surprised if Micheline Guide awards this place a star or two this November.  What a gem.
We had dinner and ordered the Menu Gastronomique ($118) On the menu was the following: Bread basket: Lavender bun (good), baguette (good), and walnut bread (just ok) with homemade butter (good) and tofu parsley w/olive oil dip (not a big fan) 1. Asparagus topped with salmon roe with leek ashes - OK 2. 62 degrees egg with truffle - just OK 3. Foie gras with strawberry foam and roasted almonds (my favorite dish) 4. Spring soup (carrots, potatoes, onions, beets) - Very good & interesting to watch as they hydrated the broth under a candle 5. Halibut with olive tapenade - Good 6. Filet mignon w/red wine reduction - Good & loved the presentation 7. Cheese or Spring salad (substitute for the cheese) - Really good 8. Tiny madeleines with balls of fruits and chocolate (my favorite dessert) & warm berry sauce over liquid nitrogen with vanilla ice cream and toasted almonds Dessert was great and I'm glad I had room for it too. The mixture of chocolate and fruit balls were delicious. Also, the ice cream was hard to eat at first but good once you got to mix everything together with all the fruit and berry sauce. Overall the presentation of all the dishes were fabulous. The waiters were accommodating but couldn't tell if they were really genuine. The hostess was excellent - she was so kind and very pleasant. For those who want to experience with molecular gastronomy, here's the place to be. You can't miss this place - it was an orange door!
What a fun Valentine's Day dinner! So I'm kicking myself for not writing this earlier with the menu in front of me because I can't remember most of the dishes we had, but I can't look back to a lot of meals where I can categorize it as fun, delicious, and romantic all in one sentence. The following were a few of the lovely dishes we had: smoked brioche with caviar, soft boiled egg with a potato croquette (one of the best dishes I've ever had), fish with curry foam (the last time i had curry foam was at Manresa, which caused an unpleasant liquid experience shortly after...this time, Baume knocked it out of the ballpark), one of the best cuts of meat I've ever had, and a very creative freeze dried dessert that melted as it went into your mouth. This was my second brush with molecular gastronomy (the first at Moto in Chicago) and while this was not as artistic and "cutting edge" (flavored paper), the experience and follow through was more successful with portions that didn't overwhelm, wait staff that weren't pretentious, and combinations that didn't go well together.  The ambiance was just right with lighting that wasn't too dim so as to not see my lovely date and the tables weren't too closely packed to feel claustrophobic (though we did overhear some conversation at our adjacent tables). While the price may deter some, with other cheaper south bay Michelin rated restaurants options such as Plumed Horse and Village Pub, it's difficult to match the overall experience here. Given the option, I'd relive this dinner over and over again.
Last night was the soft launch and as such I'm obligated to revisit this review in a month or so. They're still working out the orchestration of service and ambiance. Given the pedigree of the staff I have no doubt they'll nail the details in short order. The usual pre-opening issues were evident. How does the temperature of the room change when it fills up? How should the lighting level adjust during the course of the evening? Timing/temperature of dishes. As far as the food, the flavors were clear and good. Wine selections were very good. All the pieces are there.
Wow.  Really, just wow.  This was a great post-graduation dinner.  I've never been to a restaurant before that used molecular gastronomy techniques, and I'm glad I now have.  I'm doubly glad that it wasn't just for show - everything seemed to be there for a reason. We did the 10 course menu - mostly because we wanted to try the famous egg and also I wanted to try things that were a little further afield than "classic French", as they described the 5 course menu.  Everybody played along since it was my graduation :-)  I also got the wine/drink pairings to go along with it, but the rest of the table split a very nice bottle of Chablis. Most of the courses have been written up here already, so I won't go into detail on those.  Other than a couple highlights and low-lights.  To be fair, the former was really the whole meal, and the low-lights were really more just things that didn't seem as awesome as the rest.  These folks did a great job of having me eat things I don't normally enjoy (i.e. olives, foie gras) and making them awesome.  From the olive tapenade "truffle" to the coup de gras double dessert, everything sang.  The dishes were well composed and full of flavour and everything had a purpose.  Without exception, every dish tasted best when everything on the plate was mixed together.  (A couple dissenters for the olive-based sauce on the fish course, but I disagree.) The biggest win was the foie gras and the famous egg.  I don't normally go in for foie gras - too gooey.  But the small pieces and the beautiful charring on them and coupled with the octopus (another ingredient I'm not normally a fan of) and the sauces was amazing.  The egg, it turns out, is famous for a reason.  It might also help that I love mushrooms, and the miatake/morrel combo between the egg and the peas just added the perfect kind of umami and flavour goodness. My least favourite course was the deconstructed bi-bim-bap (if that's what it was intended to be).  Probably because I didn't get everything mixed together the right way.  The yogurt was amazing, as was the raw shrimp and the mango (?) spheres.  I didn't care too much for the kaffir lime bubbles on their own, though.  I think mixed together it would have worked better. I was also a fan of how the palate cleanser towards the end was nearly visually identical to the scallop amuse bouche at the start of the extravaganza.  Definite points there! The only miss in the drink-food pairing (mostly wine, but 1 cocktail, and 1 plum soda/peach ice cream float) was the AOC Bourgogne with the cheese (Gruyere, I think) and fresh porcini plate.  It seemed like it should have been perfect, but it was the only one that didn't quite seem to complement it properly.  The rest were excellent, both as wines on their own (as was the Bourgogne) and as pairings. Impeccable service - i.e. setting down all 6 plates at the same time.  Excellent at accommodating food allergies - one of us needed gluten-free.  The wait staff was not pretentious and were quite helpful.  They also gave me some Madeira to sip at the end of the meal just because. I might need to save up a whole lot, but I plan to go back there one day.  I can't imagine this not getting a Michelin star or two.  Granted, it's the finest dining I've ever attended, but how could food get better than this?  The chef kept both my mind and my tastebuds happily occupied.  Bravo!
I'm completely blown away as this new joint is in par with the very contemporary micro-gastronomy style restaurants in San Sebastian (Spain).  My review is completely different from Judy D. who seems to want to give it no stars.  This is definitely a place for foodies and gourmands who want a new challenge and try different things.  Not for nit-picky folks or people with allergies who can't tolerate creativity.  It's a place where you come to have the chef entertain your taste buds and think "Wow, how did he make this?? What's in it??"  To me, Gary Danko, La Folie is totally old school and I feel they've forgotten how to re-invent.  So if you want Gary or Roland, stick with the traditional chefs as this is not the place to come for a traditional menu.  You are coming here for a full experience and that's why I love it. We had the 10 course meal and it was more than enough.  The portions are small but when you go through 10 plates you start to get full during the middle of the course.  An interesting mid-way course item was a lavender thing... it was like lavender dry ice and just melted in your mouth in a second.  A hint of lavender lingers on for a while and really hits your senses; quite an amusing experience. The place is quiet, gorgeous interior decor (orange/chocolate brown) and a great spot for a special occasion.
I really want to love this place.  My parents came out from New York City and they are true Foodies eating at the top NYC places.  In NorCal they enjoy Cyrus, Gary Danko and other places - I wanted to show them what the Peninsula has to offer.  Bad idea. The service was ridiculous - I felt like I was on "The Office" as the waiter recounting details of each course and then said the same words again and again at each table - even with the silly quirks and jokes.  The food was "interesting" with bubbles and spritz but not tasty and there was no liquor - at a restaurant of that price it would be nice to have more options. It felt really unsophisticated with people actually taking pictures of their food and pictures of themselves holding up their food. I would have given just one star as the food and service was wildly under-delivering - especially for the 10 course price -  but the desserts were fantastic. Bravo for those.
Good food! We had this restaurant catered for a company party in which I was a guest for. They are true artists. They come out in very creative fashion. Here's my feast: Pumpkin Macchiato, Nutmeg, Pepitas Pumpkin soup with nutmeg foam, served in a coffee cup - the pumpkin taste was not too strong. A good starter. Beets Coloriage, Goat Cheese, Balsamico Beets salad with goat cheese spheres, beet chips, balsamic caviar - nicely decorated, zesty flavors with every bite. Crispy Smoked Chicken, Preserved Lemon, Root Vegetable - we had the hardest time trying to figure out if this was duck or chicken. the people at my table voted that it was duck and then we asked the waitress to find out that we were all wrong. amazing how they can make chicken taste like the roasted duck! Atlantic Striped Bass "Vapeur", Daikon, Yuzu-Ginger, Dashi Broth Japanese-style broth, radish cake, steamed fish, ginger sorbet and puffed rice - split this with my date: you can never go wrong with fish. actually you can but they didn't. Mishima Ranch Beef Filet, Champignons Sauvages, Truffle Mushroom tart, baked mushroom and puree, beef roasted medium - split this with my date: excellently tender! perfectly roasted! It made me want another! Apple-Cinnamon/Apple-Caramel, Beignet, Tatin Caramel Panna Cotta, sour apple sorbet, fresh apple, doughnuts and caramel braised apple (tatin) - dessert was better than I expected. I'm not a fan of sorbet but this was pretty good. I marked 1 star down because of the portion size but otherwise, very good overall! Maybe I'll go try the 5 courses for $78 one day that everyone is raving about.
I've been to French Laundry, Cirrus, and Chez TJ .  I have to rate this restaurant a five. I never knew this caliber of restaurant could exist right near a Fed Ex Kinko store. It's hidden near an old dim sum place. We had the 10 course prix fixe option.  The presentation is full of  artful surprises of  textural and visual play. I won't tell you what happened because it'd ruin the surprise but there are definitely some textural and visual surprises throughout the meal.  I thoroughly enjoyed myself.  We decided to order and pair bottles of wine vs. the wine pairings... which were attentively suggested every few courses.  The sommelier was helpful, extremely knowledgeable and connected to the suppliers.  The sommelier has collected wine from Bone Creek., Saxum vineyards and rare wines from the Rhone region...in France which still linger in my mind..  This place is magical.
It was molecular gastronomy with super fresh seasonal ingredients, yet all packaged in a casual and non-pretentious setting. What is even better? It is right in our neighborhood! One of a kind in Palo Alto and usually you would think that it is the type of restaurant that you can only find in downtown San Francisco...! When You are a parent of a young baby who is at home while you go out for a few hours for dinner,  your dining options tend to be closer to home for practicality reasons! Read some people said...Oh wish it was in a more "serious" location like downtown palo alto- I don't agree! Being tucked away at the quiet end of California Avenue was actually a very down to earth location! PLenty of easy parking is just around the back! downtown Palo Alto, you will be circling in the parking lot for 10 mins (if lucky)? I struggle to understand why people want to be seen, and value that more importantly than the food and experience? Image matter to some and irrelevant to others. Back to the review. We ordered the 10 courses menu and was very pleased with every dish. our favorite was the 62 degree egg (almost like a poached egg" only it was cooked in 62 degrees celcius for an hour!) There was clearly Asian influence to Chef Chumel's creations. They are serious about their food but has a very laid-back attitude! Love it! All the wait staff could easily answer and explain our questions, their knowledge certainly added to the whole dining experience. The lavender infused liquid nitrogen dish as a palate cleanser was very well executed! You should see how my husband took that dish! His nostrils blew out the fumes!! We had their Baumetini and it was sake with passionfruit caviar.. We had 3 of those tonight!! Service was impeccable and chef chumel  even came out to talk to us at the end of our meal while we wAited for our coat check. We were also given a copy of the menu printed nicely in an envelope! Chef Chumel is enthusiastic professional, and we really want this establishment will make a name for itself enough to stay and grow! We came here for our wedding anniversary tonight and had an excellent time? Hoping to come back again many more years to come! Honestly, we like this place more than Alinea in a lot of ways.. Just not so stuck up and elaborate/ show off. Alinea is unique and one of a kind too, but for $500 a meal for two you are also paying for their architecture/ interior design and special designed customized silverware. At Baume, you are paying say $300 and food was just as good!
We just had a delightful dinner at Baume. I did not take notes, so I don't remember course details. They give the option of 5 ($78), 10 ($108), or 15 ($158) courses. The server described the 5-course as more conventional, the 10 as having more molecular gastronomy (MG) methods, and the 15 as a combination, plus more desserts. We opted for the 10 course, and also had a bottle of Page Mill 2007 Merlot. While the MG was used in many dishes, it was always an excellent addition to a complex dish. For example, a perfectly cooked asparagus spear had asparagus puree and spherified hollandaise, as well as several other components. A few dishes and a cocktail included passionfruit caviar, always to good effect. Each dish was complex, and was composed of elements reflecting lots of work and attention for flavor and texture. The 62C egg was topped with a dry sherry foam that complemented it perfectly, and also included a small medly of flavorful mushrooms. The sous vide fillet was accompanied by a wonderful citrus vinaigrette and a precious onion tart. The foie gras was a play with pineapple and vanilla, and was probably my favorite dish. Each dish was a work of art, both in visual appeal and in flavor. Baume is not as much theater or as innovative as El Bulli or the Fat Duck, but it is not trying to be. Many of the dishes would hold up well in comparison. Service was well paced and friendly. They gladly answered our many detailed questions about methods and ingredients. They were happy to let us have a look in the kitchen, and we had the chance to chat with chef Chemel, who was happy and excited. There is no question that the price is high, but it is a special occasion restaurant, and is not out of line with restaurants of similar level. It was clear that every ingredient was of top quality, and much work went into each plate. I just would have liked to have had slightly larger portions; I walked away satisfied, but not full. We will go back for special occasions.
Our dinner at Baume was simply excellent.  Chef Bruno Chemel was hitting it out of the park on every course for our first time there.  We had their 10 course menu (5, 10, or 15) which was just right for me and a little too much for my wife. We both enjoyed it more than Gary Danko in SF, and we place it on par or close to our experiences at Charlie Trotters (Chicago), Picasso (Las Vegas), Jean-Georges (NYC), and Per Se (NYC). Of course, we have to visit again to check on the consistency since that is difficult for most restaurants to maintain, especially with frequent menu rotations.
I really enjoyed me experience here one night with the 10 course $110? tasting menu. Everything was very good. I won't go into full details of each course, just highlights I recall. This place has only been open a couple months and I was impressed by how smoothly the service ran. The servers and Chef were all very nice, friendly, and professional. I was also very excited that the white napkins they use DON'T leave annoying white lint on your black clothes!! I almost asked for black when I sat down but didn't want to be a pain so I didn't. But I was so happily surprised during the meal that there wasn't a bunch of white stuff on my black clothes, yay! I really liked the Baumetini with the passion fruit tapioca in it, it tasted really good. The 62 degree egg was also interesting and enjoyable since I've never had one before. The fish course was a little fishy for me but I still ate it. The lavender nitro foam was really cool and entertaining. If you can get your video camera ready before they serve this course, try filming it cause you look like a dragon with smoke coming out of your nostrils. The whole thing is very quick so that's why I say get your camera ready before. The foie gras was also very good and I liked the pineapple wine it was paired with. My favorite dish was the grass fed filet with orange spring onion. The filet was cooked perfectly and I wished I had more of it. :( The desserts were also very good. I ate lots of it. I started my review off saying I enjoyed my experience here that night and it's cause it really was an experience, from the great food to the great servers to the nitro-foam fun, I had a very memorable dining experience here and I hope I have convinced you to go and book your table now. I wish I could go back soon again. Time to save money again.
My 2 girlfriends and I went to Baume this past Thursday evening to celebrate a birthday. We had the 5 courses for $78. At first, the waitress said that the 5 course meal would be "traditional French," so we were disappointed as we were hoping to try the "molecular gastronomy." However, we were pleasantly surprised to see that the 5 courses still involved Baume's art + science. We thoroughly enjoyed each of the following: -Amuse bouche of scallops with passion fruit pearls -Housemade nut bread with chocolive (green or black olive spread that was creatively shaped like a chocolate, served in a chocolate wrapper) -Leek soup with fried shallots and potato "ice cream" -Steamed wheat bun and toasted baguette, served with balsamic and olive oil emulsion and tofu parsley spread -Heirloom tomato salad with lavender foam and basil spread -Halibut with ratatouille pearls (basil, aioli, tomato, tomato water, and eggplant flavors) -Grass-fed filet mignon with black truffle shavings and mushrooms (the second most tender steak I've ever had, next to Kobe beef) -Amuse bouche of lychee with passion fruit pearls -Chocolate sponge cake with jasmine tea foam and passion fruit ice cream I have to say that this was one of the most creative and delicious meals that I've had in a long time. I also agree with other yelpers that Baume will get a Michelin star in the near future. I highly recommend dining here if you're looking for a special occasion restaurant!
We had our first ever @SoftTechvc Christmas party at Baume last week: amazing flavors, flawless execution and an inspiring wine list. Totally deserve their Michelin second star.
Enjoyable but not worth the price.  I have been to 4 molecular gastronomy restaurants and this was my least favorite and the most expensive.  I did find the items unique and creative but not so much as other places.  Also, there was only one course (beef) that I thought was truly amazing as the others were good to very good but at $170 for the tasting I found it way too steep.  Fun and good food but overpriced.
A lovely little restaurant tucked away on a quiet section of California Ave in Palo Alto. We dined here and found the food to be delicious and the service attentive without being intrusive. Servers did a good job describing the courses and the pacing of the meal was nice. Having dined at Manresa just a few months ago, the bar for us had been set quite high, but given that Baume is still in relative infancy, the food was quite nice. The caviar and smoked crostini was delightful, and the filet was cut-with-a-butter-knife tender. The molecular gastronomy techniques weren't over-the-top nor gimmicky. That said, they weren't wildly impressive but we appreciated the understated approach. The overall environment was relaxed, unpretentious and intimate. Given that the price point is about the same as Manresa, I would say that Manresa gives you more bang for the buck, purely from a food standpoint. However, Manresa is slightly more traditional in the atmosphere and so if you're looking for a change of pace and a more relaxed environment, give Baume a try.
My sugar momma took me to Baume to indulge me in molecular gastronomy. My understanding of the genre is this: do really crazy shit to food, and you'll make people feel like they're judging Top Chef. The menu is prix fixe, with the lowest being $78 for a five-course meal. If you want wine pairings, add another $50 on top. You can also get 10 or 15 course meals, but I left satisfied after five courses. I particularly loved the asparagus salad! I never imagined that asparagus could be so soft. I can't really describe all the food you get here, and your experience will probably be different anyway. I will leave you with one tip, however: if you get asked if you want a baguette or wheat bread, go with the wheat bread. Just trust me on that one. In short, Baume (pronounced boh-meh) gets five stars because everything was crazy delicious.
4.5/5 stars. I had the great pleasure of dining at Baume and was quite impressed by the food, service and ambiance.  Bravo to Chef Bruno Chemel for parting with Chez TJ in Mountain View and opening this refreshing and creative restaurant in Palo Alto. When we entered, we found the atmosphere to be intimate and cozy.  There is the main entrance/room and a dining room to the left, with some other tables set up behind a big curtain on the right.  The decor was fun and inviting, almost like being in someone's large, semi-fancy living/dining room. We got the 10 course meal. Our amuse bouche were two balls that looked like chocolate truffles but were actually made out of olives that were meant to be broken and spread across some bread. Second amuse bouche was a scallop served with soy sauce spheres (or something to that extent).  They were placed on spoons and meant to be eaten in one bite.  The scallop was not overpowered by the garnish or sauce. Wheat bread and small baguette with parsley spread and olive oil/vinegar spread.  Whole wheat bread was an odd texture, like way too fluffy, almost like angel food cake.  There was something a bit odd about it.  Anyway, the olive oil/vinegar spread was cool, it was whipped into a margarine like consistency so that you could spread it on the bread.  We liked this a lot and asked for a second serving of it. Asparagus salad: asparagus with shaved parmesan.  This was really yummy.  The asparagus was cooked perfectly, and the flavor of the other various ingredients went together well.  Very simple and unpretentious dish.  Nice start to the meal.  Presentation was very pretty. 62 degree egg: egg cooked at 62 degrees Celsius, with peas and mushroom and a pea sprout garnish.  This 62/64 degree cooked egg must be a fad within fine dining because I've had it at Gary Danko, Coi and The Dining Room.  In any case, you can't go wrong with a deliciously cooked egg.  It conjured up that homey, warm fuzzy feeling you get when you eat a good brunch. Yogurt, lemongrass bubble, prawn, shallot, mango sphere, cucumber, tarragon dish: I think this was supposed to be like a deconstructed Thai/Southeast Asian dish.  At first we were confused because everything was plated in different sections in the bowl and we didn't know how to really approach eating it.  At first we gingerly ate a little here and there; eventually my bf figured out to stir it all together and eat it that way.  The flavors melded together at that point and it became a discernible dish.  It was light and refreshing and a cool concept.  Very creative! Halibut: a filet of halibut atop...something.  Can't remember what.  It had a saffron broth and fennel garnish. Somewhat of a low point because the fish wasn't very firm and reminded me of frozen fish filets in taste.  I know it probably wasn't, but because it was soft, and it was atop something mushy, it just wasn't that appealing.  The saffron broth was good though. Foie gras: foie gras with pineapple cake, pineapple chip and curry (or red miso?).  Woah that was a cool dish!  Who would've thought that foie gras would be tasty with a pineapple cake?! This was truly a creative dish and a pleasant surprise.  The foie gras was cooked perfectly with a nice sear. Liquid nitrogen lavender: palate cleanser.  SO COOL.  Timing is of the essence, you're supposed to pop it into your mouth asap and while you chew and inhale/exhale, all this crazy smoke escapes from your nostrils.  You look like a dragon.  Molecular gastronomy and chemistry is fun, kids!  I think Chef Chemel came out to give it to us, or else it was his doppelganger in an apron that came to our table. Our server brought out another one on a very pretty plate because he said the chef was sending me another so I could take a pic of it!  :) Beef and onion tart: perfectly cooked, tender serving of beef accompanied by an onion tart.  Though they were placed on opposite parts of the plate, we found that they were tasty eaten together.  A solid dish. Cheese! A tete de moines made two ways with strawberry.  One was like a beignet and the other was somehow served to look like a mushroom.  Tasty, pungent cheese and I loved the presentation.  It was plated on top of a slab of some sort of rock/marble/granite (?). Peach: made to look like the scallops in the beginning.  Neat concept! Burnt almond ice cream, chocolate stick, strawberry: ice cream was delicious, I could've eaten a bowl of it.  Chocostick was like a delectable Kit-Kat and the strawberry element was fro...oh no running out of room in my review. Basically very yummy, creative, glad that the Bay Area has a place like this. Docked .5 stars bc though it's innovative, it's not as polished or at the level of Alinea in Chicago, and my bf's dessert actually missed a part of the ice cream. I wholeheartedly support Chef Chemel and this restaurant and hope it gets a Michelin star (or two, bc it's MUCH better than Coi in the city, which is 2 stars)
Glad to have gone and tried it,but I wouldn't recommend it. Some of the food from the degustation menu was good.  The beef was very good.  In fact,  the less that was done to the food the more I liked it. The sponge bread opener was not so good--the cheese overpowered everything else. Liked the dessert, though. Decor was miserable.  Walking into the place from a sunny day outside was like stepping into a crypt.  The overall look of the restaurant was a cross between bad spa and funeral parlor.  Lighten the place up and make everything happier.  It's food!
Baume is Bruno Chemel's new venture, after having split with the team running Chez TJ.  There are some other Chez TJ members behind the scenes, and apparently some Sent Sovi members are getting involved as well.   It is in a soft opening mode, and by the time we went, it had only been open for a mere 48 hours, on their second night of service.    They plan to eventually offer 10 and 15 course options, but for now, your only option is a 5 course tasting menu, with or without wine pairings. Not much flexibility in the menu, but the staff was great in catering to what we didn't want of the list of ingredients which were offered.  They do have a full vegetarian tasting menu as well, as would be expected for a Bay Area restaurant. The decor is modern and clean, fitting Chemel's cuisine style more than the rustic house of Chez TJ does.  Baume is clean and spartan, but still colorful and nicely lit.   They completely gutted the prior location and have turned the space into something completely theirs.   Service was excellent, and the constant stream of "Air" during dinner added to the French-ness. For a shot of the main dining room, check Flickr -http://www.flickr.com/photos/swnktstic/4315653483/ Courses.   Beet salad with goat cheese.   The goat cheese was molded into gelatinous spheres which exploded when put in your mouth.  An interesting sensation, although I'm not a huge beet fan, so the course was mainly a miss for me.   If you like beets, this course will be great though. Pumpkin soup.    Roasted pumpkin and pumpkin seeds, along with pumpkin ice cream.   Nice balance of textures and temperatures, definitely a satisfying dish.  Warm, delicious, and interesting. Carrot and turnip salad.   Mix of foams, rice, tempura battered vegetables mixed playfully together.  Every piece of this dish tasted great and it all worked really well together.  Typically this would be a fish course, but since we're not fish eaters, this was the substitute vegetarian course.  I'm very happy that we went this route. Beef and mushrooms.   Sous vide beef topped with black truffle, a mushroom sauce connected to a large chanterelle mushroom.  The beef was extremely tender and flavorful, and the sauces worked really well together.  Not a huge mushroom fan, but these were done quite well. For a shot of the beef dish, check Flickr - http://www.flickr.com/ph... Dessert was chocolate and orange.  Orange grenadine, milk chocolate panna cotta, various foams, and the most interesting bit was orange slices which had been thinly sliced and candied so they were solid.  Very cool.  Good dessert, although neither of us were fans of the grenadine. I'm definitely glad to see a place like this exist in Palo Alto, where there is a lack of unique, experimental restaurants.  Looking forward to seeing their 10/15 course options when they are available.   It's expensive, no doubt, but considering they are only on day two, they are off to a great start.
This was a 5-star dining experience.  One of the few I've had recently at a restaurant that was of 5-star quality (e.g., fancy). It's a cute location in Palo Alto and we had the 10 course prix fixe so we could try the molecular gastronomy courses as well. And it was delicious. The atmosphere is also very cute and the dining room isn't too big. The food: the portions for the 10 course were perfect so even though it sounds like a ton of food, it was just right. And for $108 you get a great array of food! The asparagus: delicious--absolutely perfect The 62 degree egg with caviar--perfect. delicious to the last bite A brown rice with veggies and foam dish--so good. it was so unique too. i don't know what it all was but it was tasty and something I've never had! I opted for tofu instead of fish and it was great: it was like tofu cutlets with some greens. perfectly cooked. The other option was the fish which I heard was pretty good. The lavendar palate cleanser: I could have eaten a pint of it! Soup: goodness. Meat: perfectly cooked and tender The cheese: tete de moine--it came out all carved/cut already but it was perfect and delicious. And I don't even like cheese The desserts: they were a little disappointing, but because they weren't bad, I didn't take off any stars: The donut thing--it was ok. nothing to write home about The chocolate thing--again ok. The meal ended with a bit of a thud, after such a great meal. Let's just say I love dessert so I was more sad that it ended like that then disappointed. It was still good but nothing that stands out. Definitely worth going to.  It's up there near the top of restaurants I've been to!!!!  (Ok, yes I wasn't impressed with dessert, but I still ate it. And what I'm starting to get is that great chefs are not all necessarily great at creating dessert dishes).
Amazing food, great service, wonderful wine pairing. Highly recommended.
Great ambience, great delicious and elegant food, great wine paring with the food. Totally worths... Read more 
If I can give this place no star, I would. We went last night with another couple, and got the 5-course meal. The menu just list the ingredients and not the preparation. You tell the server what you don't like. My husband doesn't eat seafood, our friends said no beef, hoping that the restaurant would do something creative for the main entree with fish, and I said no chocalate desserts. We all started with asparagus, which was fresh and fine, but really simple. We then all had a soup, which was quite delicious. 3 of us then got fish (some kind of snapper), which was not warm enough and had a really fishy saffron sauce. My husband and I got filet for the next course, which again was fine but nothing special. Worst part was our friends got fried rice for their main!! $78 and they got fried brown rice! In general, the service was very good, but while the food was not offensive, but certainly nothing special at all, and definitely NOT worth the money. No way does it compare with places like Gary Danko, Cyrus, La Folie, which charges comparable prices. There are literally hundreds of better restaurants to eat at in the Bay Area at half the price.
My wife and I went to this Wonderful restaurant , this so called molecular gastronomy entice us to go and try it.  It will be our first time trying this place and this unique process of preping food. Overall, we had a wonderful time!  We really like the hostess, she makes our night even more memorable.  One of the dish (Foie Gras Financier & grape with Burgandy Truffle), we have never eaten the truffle in our life and told the hostess.  So later, she brought the actual truffle to us and show us what it looks like.  We were able to weight it, smell it and touch it.  It was awesome!!! The waiter was nice and very professional; however, he didn't tell us everything.  For one, he missed the "Raspberry explosion" drink during the opening introduction of this restaurant.  They use liquid nitrogen pored into a cup full of raspberry, from a chemistry point of view, the raspberry exploded to pieces, then you top off with Sake.  2nd, different waiter who served us to food, talk very fast and missed out some of the ingredients.  I had to go back to ask a different waiter what's the ingredients. In the end, we asked for a menu to go, the hostess got us a menu, with a actual calendar date and a main chef's signature.  We love her and definitely we will go back.  She said that the best truffle, ABBA truffle will arrive and hope we can go back to try it because it's one of the best. If it's not her services, this restaurant will just be another typical Michelin restaurant found in the Bay Area, blend it in with Chef TJ or Manressa.  Meaning, all the waiters are very professional and due diligent on their delivery, in-sync with placing the food, but they just DON"T SMILE!  We are here to enjoy with food, quality of services, environments, being comfortable, and on top of it, able to communicate with the waiter without being felt like he is pushing us away. Ambient was subtle yet felt like home.  place is small yet your table and other tables around you weren't too close (unlike French Laundry). Here are the food we ate started from first dish to the end: *Watermenlon Grace, cucumber yogurt Olive *Deconstructed gazpacho, Couscous roll Caviar, grape, Sesame 63degree egg, artichoke, vermouth espuma(signature dish) *Salade D' Automne Foie gras financier & Grape, brandied gelee gelee Tomate farcie Tarragon lobster, Yu choy *Melo, Mint snow, prosciutto black mission figs, honey glazed duck suckling pig confit, balsamic calvados, apple cheese componsition framboise, port syrup *rocky road, orange gelee, huckleberry tarte green tea mochi, chocolate yuzu ganache Mignardises. * indicate they use liquid nitrogen to create it or parts of the dish. it is pricy, compare with other top notch restaurant, but because of molecular gastronomy technique of creating food, i over look the price.
So full disclosure: this was not my first molecular gastronomy restaurant. That mostly means that the experience wasn't quite as novel/exciting for me as it might be for someone new to the genre. Baume is a beautiful restaurant, and the service is fantastic. There are a few standout dishes, and the cocktails are very interesting. The problem is that it doesn't quite match up to the price tag. While the food was good, it wasn't stop-you-in-your-tracks amazing...which is what i expect for $200 a person. Another issue is that the 12 course menu isn't an expanded menu from the 8 course; it's a totally different menu. That might be neat if you were willing to come back and try both, but when you've paid for the big experience, you don't want to be envious of the people next to you who got the shorter meal. It boils down to this: if you haven't tried this style of restaurant before, and you have some extra cash, this is a good one time experience. But I won't be going back.
An outstanding dinner! We went with the full discovery menu and discover we did. The wonder of everything kept escalating throughout the meal like a well planned symphony. By the end we were laughing like school girls at the joy and surprise in each bite. Because of the approach to ingredient use, it's difficult to recommend a specific dish. Instead, trust the kitchen. The highlights of our meal were the halibut mousse and the suckling pig, but everything was delicious. There was a nice theme of white truffle that ran through the evening. I'm definitely anxious to come at a different time of year to taste that season's menu. Iimagine what they can do with strawberries and avocado! Also: get the wine pairing. The wines were all individually exquisite, but they also complemented the food very well. It would be a shame to miss out on that last bit of mouth delight. All delivered with excellent service and warmth. The presentation and overall story arc isn't as zanny as Moto in Chicago, but there's still plenty of flavor twisting. One of my favorite meals ever.
Baume offers a beautiful dining experience in the heart of Palo Alto. 5 Courses run $78, 10 courses $118, and 15 courses $168. With wine pairings, the cost is an additional ($50-$70). Had the 10 course with wine pairings. I was highly impressed with the presentation of each dish, however, I was expecting slightly larger portions for the price. In addition, the liquid nitrogen counts as 1 dish, and there are 2 dessert dishes. So I almost felt a little cheated in claiming that it was "10 Courses." They also seem to be very seasonal, which is great, however, 2-3 of our dishes incorporated tomato. In all honesty, I think that's a little too much emphasis on one ingredient, and I would have expect some meatier dishes... They have two amuse bouches, which were both great and offer bold flavors. My favorite dishes included a peanut/curry dish with an unfiltered sake/infused with mango pairing and the desserts! I also thought that the wine pairings were SUPERB! They picked some outstanding whites (from a variety of regions including Oregon, Sonoma, & Spain) to pair with the more refreshing/lighter dishes at the start of the evening and progressed into the bolder reds. I would suggest, go here and prepare yourself to have a great molecular gastronomy experience with a French flair. Don't expect to leave the restaurant full, maybe content/satisfied at most.
Baume has positioned itself as the king of molecular gastronomy.  Being curious, I went.  The place is new, fancy, schmancy.  Not too pretentious, but perhaps just a bit.   I went with the five course menu. My meal started with an amuse of olive tapenade with walnut bread.  This was OK but no better than olive bread you get as part of your meal in many restaurants. A second amuse of an astringent tiny scallop could be thought of as something to waken the palate. It succeeded and was nice. My first course was haricot vert, slivered almond and mushroom with a mustard aioli frozen in liquid nitrogen.   First and foremost this plate showed that they can prepare good food here.  The aioli brought a nice plate of perfectly prepared green beans together.  But I asked myself why make a point of liquid nitrogen if the pyrotechnics all take place in the kitchen?  They could just as well have cooled the aioli in a freezer, over dry ice or whatever.  I supposed that the molecular part of the deal is a selling point.  Something to bring the populace in. Anyway, next was corn soup with a pepper sorbet that melted into it.  Nice but no more than that.  Neither the soup nor the sorbet had a vibrant taste that commanded attention.  This was the weakest plate of the meal.  Muted tastes, muted response. Loch duarte salmon was perfectly seared and came with beans with a touch of pepper or chili or  something that was not sufficiently assertive to give the fish a jolt.  Nice but not memorable. My favorite part of the meal was filet mignon cooked sous vide.  The meat was remarkably tasty.  Great food.  The bells and whistles and foam that came with the meat were superfluous.  It was all about the good meat. Next a palate cleanser of a teeny tiny bit of lychee. My meal ended with deconstructed spumoni, which was nice. My verdict?  When they just cook and forget the bells and whistles they do very well.  Everything else is just beside the point and distracts from what they can actually do in the kitchen.  Anyway, that's just my opinion.  Try it for yourself and see what you think.
Exceptional experience.  The ambiance makes you forget you are in the heart of old town Palo Alto - but instead makes you feel like you are in hip downtown SF. Let me preface this by saying I am one of the pickiest eaters.  I don't like seafood.   I don't like/try odd cuts of meat outside the boundaries of chicken, beef, and pork.    This place changes taste buds and how you think about food.  The food is *amazing* and made me try so many things (in small doses) that I never would have tried.  I'm so glad my friend twisted my arm to get the 10 course meal (I wanted to go for the conservative 5).  10 or 15 courses may sound overwhelming, but it is truly an adventure.. and to my surprise, not an overstuffed one.  The portions are perfect so that you can pace yourself through every course (and I tend to fill up quickly if it isn't paced well). Next time: I'm going for FIFTEEN. Molecular gastronomical dessert = Can I please have 2???
A delight for all the senses...beutiful food tantalizes the eyes, the scents are subtle and tell a story of what you are about to taste, the tastes are sensations of balance, texture, surprising combinations!  Can I say more?  Oh yeah, the service was impeccable!  Sadly, the dining room kind of sucks for ambiance...so call a decorator already!  They certainly charge enough to take the place upscale with some nice paint, draperies and decor!
3.5 stars. J and I decided to come here to experience molecular gastronomy (and belatedly celebrate my birthday). We had essentially the same 10 course menu as JeanandFlo U. AMBIANCE: the dim lighting in combination with the distantly spaced tables made it feel like we were in our own little world. Nice. However, the tables weren't SO far apart that I couldn't sneak peeks at our neighbors' dishes. SERVICE: The timing of clearing/bringing dishes from/to the table was very good. J and I thought the presentation was a bit odd though-- not quite as polished as a truly fancy restaurant, yet at the price point, one would expect coordinated presentation and removal of dishes. Overall not bad, but I do wish that the waiters wouldn't just simply disappear once the dish was served/removed because I often had questions that I wanted to ask but no way to flag anyone down. FOOD: Hands down favorite of the night was the seared scallops + foie gras with shaved fennel + grape. OMG this dish was AMAZING. Each item on the plate could stand on their own both in flavor and preparation, but the combination of everything together was decadence personified. I would go back to Baume just for this one dish. My #2 was the salad exotique, which seemed to me to be the best representation of molecular gastronomy techniques (other than the use of foam, which J and I both agreed was way way overdone). In this dish, each ingredient on its own tasted like... building blocks. It wasn't until you put everything together that you got the full picture (it was pretty tasty). Unfortunately, the remaining courses fell flat. That's not to say that they were not good... just not great or interesting. The worst dish by far was the halibut, which was SO overcooked! It was pretty sad, as the flavors hinted that this dish could have been delicious. The second worst was the cheese course. Neither J nor I are huge fans of cheese, but we both agreed that they were fine (with the exception of the blue cheese, which to me tastes and smells like feet). However, lack of fandom aside, I found a HAIR hiding under the small pile of watercress on my plate! EW! The staff apologized and brought me a new plate (a waste for me)... but that was it. OVERALL: Not as interesting as an experience as I originally thought it would be... so a bit disappointing (although, I am STILL thinking about the scallops + foie gras, so they are definitely on the right track). And at the price point, I probably won't be returning. I'd still like to try more molecular gastronomy, so maybe I'll venture over to Coi sometime...
Hubby decided to treat me to a nice lunch and Baume once again, delivered! and delivered well!  We continue to be fans - in fact, I must say the food I had this time around was better than when we visited last time. Service was good - but as expected in any fancy restaurant - with some minor changes (more on this later). Finally, the dim lighting that would make anyone look fabulous was exactly as I remember.  So I would say, the ambiance is totally made for dates and special occasions.   Though when we were there, there were a few tables of people who were dining with their work friends - I guess sometimes, you just like hanging out with your colleagues that much :) In my last review, I evaluated my experienced based on three criteria and here's what I found memorable this time around: (1) Creativity (5 stars):  This was a memorable dining experience and creativity was part of it.  What I loved are the finger napkin that they hydrate at your table side - literally, they bring out this thing that's like the size of a nickel and then pour hot water on it - it was gimmicky but I loved it!  Then of course, all the different combination of flavors and interesting chemistry that was done on them.  However, what was different this time around was the lack of chemistry explanation (see service description) (2) Ambiance/Service (4 stars):  OK - the service was good, it was attentive and professional.  However, I must say as a nerd, I really missed the professorial lectures by the waiters on the chemistry that was done on the good - I need them to tell me all about liquid nitrogen, carb bonding.  I miss that and I hope they bring back the science. (3) Taste of food (4 stars):  We had the 8-course tasting menu and would say 80% of the dishes were great and the other 20% just ok. The meal started off with this airy broccoli bread which was nice and fluffy.  The breadbasket was just ok - walnut bread and baguett, not very memorable. Course 1: Asparagus topped with salmon roe with leek ashes - the leek ash had a very intense flavor and was very unique.  The warm asparagus with the cold salmon roe was a great combination - with the roe bursting in your mouth. Course 2: Next up was their signature dish - the 62 degree egg, it was awesome and one of my favorite dishes there.  The googy egg yolk overflowing from the center. Course 3: Foie gra with strawberry foam and roasted almond - loved that the foie gra was diced into small cubes and then seared, so there's a more surface area that was seared - and the combination with the sweet strawberry foan and almond flakes, perfect.  Definitely my favorite. Course 4: Vegetable soup prepared at table side - they pour the soup into your bowl at the table - prior to this, they had put these dehydrated looking vegetables into the soup pot - it reminded me of dehydrated vegetables that you get from ramen pack.  The soup was just ok - for me, this was the bottom 20%. Course 5: Halibut with olive -- the fish was ok but not memorable.  The olive tapenade was a bit too salty for my taste. Course 6:  Filet mignon for hubby and I had the lamb -- hubby really enjoyed the dish especially with the red wine reduction.  My lamb was encrusted with this herbs, it was good - a bit too raw for me but I thought it was tender and very well done (and I normally don't care for lamb) Course 7: Cheese course - miniature cheese - it was gone in two bites - I wish they gave you more - but it was ok, not very memorable. Course 8:  Dessert!! Two items - the berries, mixed with ice cream, mixed with some sort of nitrogen treatment with a hot berry sauce - it was just perfection.  Definitely one of the most delicious desserts I have ever had in my life.  Then there's the chocolate tart with gold leave and a small ball of ice cream - it was good but definitely not in the same awesomeness level as the berry dessert. I also had a yuzu lemonade, it was ok - not memorable. Overall - definitely an excellent dining experience and would absolutely go back!
"Is this a spa or a restaurant?" - I asked my hubby as we stepped into Baume.  Fair question... Read more 
My first and definitely not last visit to Baume was on 6/25/10.  They have certainly aimed high and have hit the mark - and considering this restaurant is in the South Bay I give it the 5th star in my rating.  Baume may one day rival the other 2 Michelin star restaurants I've enjoyed (Manresa and Cyrus). Refer to the review by Adam G. on 6/20/10 as he mirrors my comments and experience.  In summary, Baume may soon rival Manresa for top South Bay restaurant.  Both are excellent, fine-dining experiences that combine terrific service, beautiful decor, casually-elegant atmosphere plus fun and creative flavor combinations frequently prepared using molecular gastronomy techniques. Be prepared to spring for the 10-course menu (a set of ingredients that the chef varies depending on that days fresh ingredients) but consider skipping the wine pairing in favor of some wine recommendations by your server.  I am inspired to try the 15 course next visit. An A+ in the South Bay.
Dinner at Baume is a lot of fun, both innovative and amusing.  I'm giving it four stars instead of five because, while everything was creative and most were good, there are culinary heights you expect of a restaurant in this category and few dishes achieved them. We hadn't done a full molecular gastronomy meal before and, after a little while of being snarky, threw ourselves into the experience and really enjoyed it.  The food is prepared with great care and every plate was a wonder to look at.  The little egg yolk marbles in the asparagus were, for example, marvels. We had the fifteen course meal with one set of wine pairings, which was more than enough wine for the two of us.  The wait staff was great about splitting every glass.  Some of the pairings were quite nice, but nothing that we felt we needed to take note of and order again; a few were of the "it's terrible but we think it's cute so we'll make you try it" variety, such as the pineapple wine.  If you're going to do the wine pairings, skip the cocktails.  (We didn't and thought the too-sweet Baumetini was a waste.) The restaurant has two comfortable dining rooms; we were in the larger one, which seats about 15 people.  It's quiet and intimate, done in calming orange and brown tones.  The friendly, slightly quirky, service was always on top of what we needed, without being pushy. The menu appears to change slowly and I feel we've seen a lot of the chef's tricks by now, so I'd be happy to go back, but not for a season or two, when they're using a different set of ingredients. I don't remember everything we had-in addition to the nominal 15 courses, there were several amuse bouches - but here are some of the dishes (warning - some spoilers follow): Deconstructed pesto - Interesting concept, and the parmesan foam was wonderful by itself, but everything else felt dry and grainy until it was mixed up.  At which point, you were eating a good pesto, straight. Carrot ginger soup - bland and unexciting Breads - The epi baguette roll was underwhelming (you've had better baguettes), but the steamed dark bread was delicious - warm and comforting and everything you could ask for. Scallop sashimi - A nice tiny flavor, but I've had much better scallop sashimi and the sauce overpowered the scallop. Asparagus salad - The first stunning dish we had.  A wild-looking salad, perfectly in balance, organized around a single perfect piece of asparagus.  Sauce, cheese, egg yolks were all perfectly prepared. Artichoke soup - A out-of-this-world soup, with the savory ice cream adding a brightness to it.  The dehydrated artichoke chips floating in the soup were among the best innovations we had. Carbonated blackberry - Yes, you can make a blackberry fizzy.  Felt like something out of Willy Wonka's factory.  Not bad, but not something I feel compelled to seek out. Fennel lava rock - Served with the blackberry; I guess the two were meant to be a palate cleanser.  The fennel "ice cream" inside was great; I thought the blackberry coating was unnecessary, but the dish worked for me. Salad exotique - This south-east asian-inspired dish was great,  with the lemongrass bubbles and delicious grilled shrimp anchoring the other flavors. Loch Duarte salmon with creme fraiche bubbles - Delicious salmon, cooked perfectly.  The creme fraiche was a wonderful accompaniment and it was topped with just the right amount of caviar.  Not the most innovative dish, but everything blended together. Halibut under a translucent potato chip - The one real clunker of a dish in the whole evening.  The fish tasted of nothing but saffron.  Even the potato chip was off - soggy and missing any crispiness. Lavender flavored liquid nitrogen - The "smoke comes out of your nose" dish that everyone talks about.  It's a fun experience, but it doesn't count as food. Foie gras three ways - There was a relatively traditional presentation with fruit (pineapple in this case), which was sublime, but it was paired with foie gras in a dashi and on top of an apple chip and apple soda, both of which felt extraneous. Sous vide beef - Again, "perfectly prepared" is the phrase that comes to mind.  This was a remarkable piece of meat in an exquisite sauce. Cheese plate - One of the most clever dishes, this was a winner: Tete de Moine two ways, shaved in mushroom-like curls and panko fried. Lychee sashimi - Clearly meant to echo in presentation the scallop sashimi from the start of the meal.  Just a palate cleanser and, in this case, it worked. Dessert - This was a multi-part masterpiece of many forms of chocolate, a spiced bar with gelees, and a beignet.  Parts were excellent, parts merely good, but was less creative than the rest of the meal.  Other restaurants do their big flourishes at dessert, but, at Baume, it was more of a time to relax and take stock of the meal. Thai tea eclair - A little post-dessert sweet, which was a scale replica of an eclair, with the sweet flavor of thai tea.  I loved it.
My wife and I and 2 friends ate out there last weekend.  We like all the nice presentations and attention to detail on all our dishes.  The course meal was excellent and the portions just about right.  We were actually offered an extra dish but we were not told upfront that we would be charged for it, kinda of like a upsell tactic we don't like without being told upfront except when we asked.  The price was kinda of steep comparing to other 1 star restaurants in the bay area.  The location is easy to find with ample parking right on the street.  Reservation is simple and seems to be available even on the same day, business was rather slow but understandable given the price aspects.  Overall, I would rate this a 3 star. I saw the kitchen on the way to the restroom and it looked unkept and floor was dirty, not what you find in other 1 star restaurants.  The restroom was small and not clean as well.
since everyone's already raving about the food...there's no need to say more: they are fabulous! also great use of the space of the restaurant and  curtains to maximize seating and still maintain privacy between parties and the cozy waiting area. Services pay attention to details without being uptight. Remember to say hi to George the goldfish!
Excellent food, we had a party of 7 and did the longer ~15 course tasting menu. Every course was enjoyed and they accommodated one of our guests with picky food tastes quite well. Well worth the money for a special occasion.
I came here for my birthday and was definitely wow-ed. This is a welcome addition to the area. The food is mainly modern french with elements of molecular gastronomy. The menu simply lists ingredients and you can choose 5, 10 or 15 courses. The higher the number of the courses, the more MG techniques will be used. For example, for the 5 course: Haricot Vert | Curry | Shallots | Corn | bacon Striped bass | Scallop | Saffron | Fennel Pastis | Beef | Green Szechuan | Miso | Piquillo Pepper Lichee | Lilikoi | Griotte Cherry | Pistachio | Chocolate In addition to the above, the following ingredients are used for the 10-course menu: 62 Egg | Green Peas | Vermouth | Foie Gras | Pineapple | Cucumber Prawn | Apricot | Lime | Octopus | Mango | Yogurt Liquid Nitrogen | Fromage Blanc | Licorice | Peach | Framboise | Vanille We went with 10 courses. Everything we had was beautifu. Here are some of the highlights: Olive truffle - made completely of olive but looks like a chocolate truffle, prepared in the same way and has the same texture. very cleverly done The 62 degree egg  - from the pea puree at the base to the vermouth foam topping - it was a surprisingly amazing combination of flavors The fois gras and octopus was simply delicious. It was very light yet flavorful. prefectly cooked. Amuse Bouche of Scallop which was echoed toward the end of the meal with an Amuse Bouche of Lychee The filet of beef was cooked perfectly and melted in my mouth The striped bass was also cooked perfectly but I was not a fan of the saffron broth. There was a dish that looked like a play on bee bim bop which I felt did not really work well. The individual components were interesting like the mango spheres and the clear bubbles in the middle. The last 2 courses were presented together as dessert - very playful and fun. I was very full at this point but my husband was comfortably and happy full. I would definitely return for a special occasion or treat.
We got the 12 course tasting menu, which consisted of a few amuse and 12 plates of tiny food.  At first, I worried that I would still be hungry after the meal, but afterward, I was stuffed silly. The food is creative and unexpected.  A few standouts included the fois gras terrine which was paired with walnut bread, vanilla froth, and quince infused with vanilla.  It was absolutely delicious and definitely a revelation.  The squab was perfectly cooked sous vide, and the 65* egg with truffles also stood out.  I don't think I ate anything that I didn't enjoy.  The presentation was flawless, and the service and pacing of the meal was right on.  My only two complaints are that they could have come by to sweep the table for crumbs more often (it took away from the presentation), and that their bread wasn't all that great. I would definitely go back for a special occasion, and perhaps seasonally since it's only 5 minutes away from where I live.  I wouldn't put it on par with French Laundry or Manresa, per se, but I think it'd be on par with Gary Danko in terms of taste of the food.
I was a little disappointed and underwhelmed by the food.  I'm not an expert in molecular gastronomy, but if it means to encapsulate things in agar, freeze dry anything that can be freeze dried, add foam, pour liquid nitrogen over anything that should be cold, then this will be the last time I want anything to do with MG.  It didn't contribute to the food and really just felt like a gimmick.  It would've been nice if somehow the freeze dried powder interacted with another element in the dish and did something surprising.  Out of the 12 or so dishes, My wife and I could recite maybe 5.  Those 5 are nicely cooked, but really only 2 out of the five made me say "wow, that was really good and I've not had anything like that before."  Some of the earlier dishes (salads) were pretty to look at, but bland and not very good, for any restaurant. The service was good.  The wait staff was very friendly, unpretentious, knowledgeable, but the wait between courses were way too long.  We felt like we sat for close to 3 hours and talked, with food showing up intermittently, rather than sitting there for 3 hours with the food being the focus, filled with conversations (hopefully about the food).  Our water glasses were also empty for long periods of time which is unusual for restaurants that are Michelin worthy (to be fair, we drink a lot of water). Overall, I would not go back, which is too bad.  I was really hoping for something extraordinary outside of San Francisco, but unfortunately, I didn't find it.
Be prepared to have a foodie adventure that stimulates all the senses. The Chef shares ingredients on the menu instead of the entree. You choose the # of courses & it's a gastronomical chemistry experience artistically, beautiful presentation. At the time of this review, the restaurant is nearly 2 months old & had minor hiccup with the soup & 62 degree egg courses. Both were flavorful, but we didn't get to enjoy our own serving (prob ran out since last seating). Intimate environment that was comfortable & not stiff. Tastefully decorated to compliment while not take away from dining experience. Staff friendly, knowledgeable, and casual. We even had chance to chat with chef. Appreciated the special b-day touches. Will try again.
My roommate and I decided to get the degustation menu for lunch, which is "only" $58.  $58 gets you four minuscule (but surprisingly filling) courses, plus a couple of extras.  I think it's a pretty good deal, considering the complexity of some of these dishes and the amount of creativity that went into them. We got a couple of cocktails, declining the wine pairings, since we had to return to work afterwards.  I got the Kir Royale, which was Champagne with a "cassiscicle" (a frozen stick of blackcurrant).  It was tasty and looked awesome, but it wasn't really worth the $20. The service was mostly very good, except that they weren't very good about refilling my water cup. Decor was modern, sorta classy, and very bromantic. As for the food, we got: 0.  Tiny cubes of bread with anchovy and frozen olive oil 1.  Sticks of heirloom tomato with balsamic/vanilla sauce and leek ash bread.  Friggin' delicious. 2.  62-degree egg, with ratatouille and a slice of truffle.  Also pretty good. 3.  Two really tiny pieces of sous vide filet mignon.  Basically convinced me that I need to build a sous vide setup. 4.  Some sort of alternative spumoni, with pistachio foam and gel; cherries, cherry coulis, and freeze-dried cherry meringue; and chocolate ice cream.  Part 2 was a small slice of strawberry tart with really strong blueberry sorbet.  Tastewise, Part 1 didn't really do it for me, but Part 2 was excellent. After that they gave us some pineapple/macadamia nut mochi (basically Hawaii in a bite) and some house-made chocolates. Overall, I didn't think the food was quite as tasty as what I've had at similarly priced/1* restaurants.  But I think the creativity and use of unusual ingredients made up for that. I might come back someday for the dinner decouvert menu.
I rarely yelp, but often use yelp.  So take that as you will. I ate here for the first time last night, with my hubby telling me it was "well received" by "foodies". That simply wasn't sufficient preparation. I should  start by saying, the price wasn't worth it.  Except that it WAS, because I haven't been surprised by a meal in years. YEARS. Maybe I am jaded.  I attended and graduated from culinary school.  I have eaten in some of the most amazing French and Italian restaurants in the world. So nothing culinary surprises me. NOTHING. Except the steamed tomato, filled with fish mousseline and served on a splash of pistou.  To. Die. For.  And the filet mignon, even though it was a bit salty? And the wine pairings with said courses?  And the duck? The duck that I have never before and will never taste so deliciously again?  You get the picture.  But I must add:  the roasted suckling pig? The one they were breaking down AFTER I ate my meal, while was touring the kitchen?  SIGH. I will eat here again, if only to taste that which I have not yet tasted. Downsides:  the bread. Meh. I mean, **less** than meh.  Village Pub has better bread.  The desserts? How can one really judge after 9 wine pairings tasted with 11 courses (which were, nonetheless, perfectly portioned)?  Still, probably, meh. But the 62 degree egg?  Fab.  The acorn chips in the fall salad?  Swoon!!!  The Intermezzo of freeze-dried yogurt cup with mint, melon, and prosciutto? Nom, nom! (And I should mention that I generally DETEST melon). If you are able to afford it, please spend a night at this restaurant. I hope that you, too, will be as surprised as I was.
Molecular gastronomy in the Bay Area, worth a trip
We came to Baume to celebrate our anniversary.  Upon being seated, we are presented with the menus which took a second to comprehend.  When the server explained them, it became clear that this is a bit different from your standard prix fixe menu.  The top of the menu lists the different ingredients that will be used for your meal, and your only choice is in how many courses you wish to indulge in.  They do, however, ask you about any allergies or dietary restrictions.  They'll gladly adjust the courses around any limitations.  We decided to go with the Menu Gastronomique; the 10-course menu.  Our review: Ambience: 3.5 stars.  It's certainly clean and modernly decorated, however to us the restaurant appeared to be more bistro-like. Service: 4 stars.  Wait times were negligible, and the staff was courteous and efficient. They did a good job of explaining each course and providing us with a constant supply of delicious bread. Food: 4 stars.  Presentation was excellent and creative.  Some courses, although tasty, didn't quite achieve "gourmet" status.  There are too many here to comment, so we've listed only the remarkable dishes. Walnut bread and "chocolive" : Walnut bread served with a sort of olive pate shaped into a chocolate truffle.  The green olive was a bit salty, but the black olive quite tasty. 62 egg with Chanterelees: the chef's signature dish, a tasty poached egg served with garlic encrusted mushrooms and a tarragon vermouth. Foie Gras, scallops, fennel : served with slices of grapes and shaved fennel.  Delicious as usual, but slightly overdone (both the foie gras and scallops). Halibut Truffle-Grape : a filet of halibut served with lemon bubbles and shaved italian truffle -- which, we are assured, have not been delivered to our table at the expense of the lives of truffle-hunters. Grass fed filet mignon : served medium rare, juicy but a little towards the salty side. Trois fromages : a trio of excellent parmagiano-reggiano, yellow buck Camombert, and Point Reyes Bleu. As an intermezzo: rosemary foam served with liquid nitrogen.  Any interesting palette cleanser that when eaten, you snort mist from your nose -- pretty funny. Grab a video of it if you ever have a chance to eat here. For dessert, a dish of coconut and lime sorbet, with sliced melons.  This was accompanied by a cup of caramel panacotta, drizzled with chocolate ganache.  Delicious! Overall, a decent and certainly unique experience.  We would definitely recommend at least a first-time visit here.  Don't skimp, at least go for the 10-course menu.
***************** REVIEW 390 ****************** This Baume restaurant by chef Bruno Chemel, the smallest resto with only 22 seats in a very cozy, intimate, and elegant spot in Palo Alto. the smallest Michelin Star resto in the West Coast. But don't get that fool you, the place is gorgeous from the orange curtain, to the colorful plating; from fresh orchids, to the spacious between table; everything was lovely. Chef Bruno Chemel was  the Executive Chef at Chez TJ, the renowned Michelin starred resto. He got plenty experiences under his wings, from a Michelin two star Jean Pierre Billoux in Digoin, received Certificats De Travail at Michelin three star establishments such as Le Vivarois, Le Grand Vefour and Guy Savoy, and Joel Robuchon. There isn't another chef in the Bay Area this young and have this much French cuisine training and experiences from France! Chef Bruno Chemel is famously for his experience in  Molecular Gastronomy. I also got to see the kitchen with the canisters of liquid nitrogen.  We also decided to have additional course of Perigord Truffle, a MUST HAVE! There are 3 menus, we went with Menu Decouverte, this way we get the best of Chef Bruno Chemel technique in Molecular Gastronomy. Menu Decouverte: 1 - Mushroom - Miso 2 - Carrot - Citron Vert - Fresh bake bread, with frozen dipping creamy spread, delish! The citrus aroma is simply stunning to the nose! 3 - Trumpet Mushroom pate style, with miso, spread! 4 - Caviar, Smoked Brioche - I could have 10 of these! The smoke traps in the cup, then the caviar, the freezing little balls, explode in your mouth! 5 - Salade D'Hiver - colorful with purple potato, some crispy, and the lovely foam! Too pretty to eat! 6 - Mushroom Medley - amazing aroma broth to the nose! Sweet, tasty! 7 - 62 degree Egg, Sun Choke, Croquette - probably 1 of chef Bruno Chemel signature dish here - I broke it open, it was simply perfect! 8 - Duck Foie Au Naturel, Cognac Coral - perfect dish with the apple jam. 9 - Soup, perfect with 2 bubbles, that I tried to break it open, so much fun to play with it! 10 - Potato Risotto with Perigord Truffles - additional dish - I love all truffles, so I got to have this. 11 - Gigha Island Scottish Halibut, curry - leeks - stunning dish, texture, soft inside, tasty! 12 - Orange deguisee- sorbet for palate cleansing. 13 - Pigeon Pie - so unexpectedly plating on this beautiful glass bowl, with a crispy cracker on top, and a picture of the Pigeon, otherwise, I will have to guess. I love it much! 14 - Grass fed beef, Bergamot Saveur - with foam, lentils, and perfectly pink! This dish was so gorgeous that I didn't want to eat, I took a few photos of this dish, sniff it a few times, before I even ate it all! 15 - Warm Goat Tartine,  Watercress Grass - Warm goat cheese, how cool is that? Between 2 single bite crackers, crisp on the bite, love it! 16 - Mushroom - Yuzu 17 - Cappuccino Sphere 18 - Mignardises 19 - Mont blanc thaw, madeline, warm citrus - Amazing dish, explode in your month - I had the most fun with this dish! So unexpected, so perfect, it was popping in my mouth! 20 - Truffle Chocolate. WINES: - Bailly-Lapierre Cremant de Bourgogne Rose, Burgundy - Bursting with bright strawberry fruits and a clean, dry! - Louis Roederer Champagne Brut. - Chateau de Sancerre Sauvignon Blanc,Loire Valley, France -  nose with floral accents and smokey, flinty  nuances. - Chateau Fombrauge St-Emilion, France - Bordeaux - my bottle corkage fee is only $25. The service was impeccable. The sommelier was wonderful to recommended us some great wines to pair with. The wine list is not that extensive, but they have decent French wines, I was impressed with some vintage Bordeaux! Chef Bruno Chemel technique in Molecular Gastronomy was simply amazing, unexpected, fun to play with & eat with, surprisingly savory, and tasty!  I will definitely come back with my folks soon! Congrats on Baume team, a well-deserved Michelin Star on the first year they opened - amazing! Overall: 5 stars For value: 5 stars For Food: 5 stars For Service: 5 stars Ambiance: 5 stars For Location: Palo Alto, 35 minutes from San Francisco & 25 minutes from San Jose. No valet parking, but plenty parking on the street & there's a lot on the same lot.
Not impressed with Baume.  This is our third time to dine here, the other two were right around the time it opened.  From the opening round to the end, the dishes were well presented but the combination of flavors and textures left something to be desired. Molecular gastronomy can provide lots of wonderful surprises and flavor bursts and amazing combinations of flavors, but not this time.  Unfortunately, I recommend to save your money and fly to NYC to try WD-50.
I went on opening night and was blown away!  The food, presentation and wine paring were spot on!!!  Their singature drink...the Baumentini should not be missed!  Sparkling Sake with Passion fruit pearls!  How can you go wrong?  All dishes were an an incredible blend of flavors & textures. Chef Bruno, Terrina, Ryan did a fantastic job and I am looking forward to the expantion to 10 and 15 courses! The restaurant is warm and inviting, filled with warm colors.  Beautiful glass plates and amazing presentation. Looking forward to my next dining experince at Baume!
Meh. Wasn't impressed. I did enjoy the food, but I didn't think it was worth the cost or the hype. Especially the extra cost of the wine pairing. My friend and I both noticed that it seemed like they were always finishing bottles on our table...never once did they open a fresh bottle for our husbands, who both had the wine pairing. I did steal a few sips of the pairings and they did seem delicious and appropriate for each plate. I guess I just didn't understand what made the restaurant worth what it costs to dine there. Service was good...a little awkward but attentive. We have been to Manresa, Michael Mina's, Gary Danko, Plumed Horse and we were expecting Baume to be up there with those places. Meh. Just didn't blow me away like I was expecting it to.
I usually wait at least one night before yelping bad reviews.  I feel terrible yelping this out loud, because I've read that this chef is very well respected. I am still angry about the extraordinary amount we had to pay for food that was pretty good, but forgettable the next day (literally forgettable).  Here's the thing -- the food was prepared beautifully and tasted pretty good, but there's NO way that the tasting menu should be anywhere close to almost $170 per person.  Nothing made my tastebuds go "WOW, that's interesting." Our server was mediocre, at best.  She didn't get anything wrong, but she certainly didn't do anything more than run our plates back and forth and rattle off obscure food names which ultimately meant nothing to us. For "experience dining" as this place touts (and as we have experienced at other molecular gastronomy restaurants), you'd expect your server to familiarize you, first off, with the way the restaurant works and what foods you might expect.  That did not happen...we had to sheepishly ask a ton of questions, to the point that I felt compelled to take my questions to the bussers and water-fillers.  Second, when she did bring out our dishes, she hardly explained what we were eating...I couldn't figure out if maybe she couldn't remember herself...in any event, it was disappointing that my dining partner and I had to wade through each course trying to figure out what we were eating.  Some would call it "adventurous", I just call is LAZY. The one thing they did well was sick the bread girl on you everytime your bread plate fell empty; but seriously, I'm not coming to spend hundreds and hundreds of dollars on bread that is just OK. If you have never been here, and are considering it, do so at your own risk. The space is great and the tables spacious enough for comfort, but just a heads up so you are not surprised and sorely disappointed the way we were: 1.  If you want to experience molecular gastronomy at Baume, be prepared to spend close to $500 (WITHOUT DRINKS),  for two.  They offer 2 tasting menus, but the cheaper menu does not offer you that molecular gastronomy experience.  Surprise!  Drinks are airport-pricey -- think $15-$20 per drink. 2. You can't order off of a menu, as the courses are fixed and unknown.  This might be appealing to some, but be prepared to eat things that you may not like. 3.  Be prepared not to know what you are eating, unless you luck out and get a great server.  Someone will stand there and rattle off the name of what you are eating (and sometimes even the component parts), but clearly the servers are not part of the experience other than to run your food out. I guess at the end of the day, I would have been OK paying about $200 for this "experience".  We've been to many, many, many, many, better restaurants in the bay area, for less than 1/2 the price, drinks included. The saddest part about this meal was that we came here for a very big celebration, and left completely disappointed and really angry about the amount we had to spend based on the food we tasted and our overall "experience." If you're looking for an amazing molecular gastronomy experience where the food is fabulous and the prices on par with what you'd expect, we'd recommend The Bazaar in Los Angeles.
This was my 2nd time to Baume, and it was even better than the first.  Every dish was interesting, delicious, and perfectly prepared.  I did the premium wine pairing and the wines were excellent.  Great meal!
Congratulations, Chef Bruno Chemel, on your Michelin star!
Before dining at Baume, I'd never experienced molecular gastronomy firsthand. Yes, I've seen all the... Read more 
The hubby and I went to Baume to celebrate our wedding anniversary, and the meal was a celebration unto itself.  I made the reservation through OpenTable and mentioned my husband's nut allergy and that it was our anniversary. As we were seated, the hostess wished us a happy anniversary and wanted to confirm if the nut allergy was all nuts, tree nuts only, or peanut only.  When the waiter arrived, he also confirmed that none of the gentleman's dishes should contain nuts.  Already they get some points for everyone on staff noting the food allergy. We opted for the 10-course menu, which included some really fantastic dishes, both classic (day-boat scallops and seared foie gras in ver jus coulis) and innovative (red curry foam with caledonian prawns or halibut with ratatouille pearls).   For some of the dishes, the molecular gastronomy techniques outshone the actual dish when a more classic technique would have sufficed; our melon-mint foam frozen in liquid nitrogen was a tasty palette cleanser but left a little freezer burn on our tongue (it would have been equally yummy as a spoonful of sorbet).  But attention is lavished on every detail, down to the bread that they serve - their house-made walnut bread was divine, and their steamed wheat buns were a revelation. The wine pairings were stellar, and our waiter split our wine flight for us, another example of the great service.  The staff was attentive at changing plates and silverware, refilling water glasses, etc. without being so on-top-of-it that they intruded on our conversation.  Everyone is friendly yet professional. Dessert was equally delicious and modern: the first dessert course was layers of frozen and unfrozen caramel foam atop poached pineapple and roasted macadamia nuts with a chocolate ganache drizzle.  The second course was cubes of coconut sorbet and lime sorbet with mint bubbles and melon.  I am docking them one star for their one mis-step: the waiter forgot to check for nuts on the dessert course, and brought out a caramel cup that contained nuts.  He realized it before we started eating though and quickly brought out another one sans mac nuts.  I'd add half a star back if I could because he gave me the other nutty cup and I got to enjoy twice as much dessert. We will definitely keep Baume on our list of special occasion restaurants and look forward to our next opportunity to dine there.
I expected to have my mind blown by this experience.  Honestly, a couple of the courses were outstanding while others were really just okay.  For the amount of money -- every course should be memorable and breath taking. The filet was the best we've ever had and the exotic salad was memorable and unique (Thai flavors with powdered peanuts).  The other courses were forgettable.
I've been to Baume more times than I can count, and each time, it has been a transcendent experience. The decor is lovely, with dark woods and pops of color (orange), which Chef Bruno cleverly but tastefully carries through the meal in surprising and innovative ways.  Pay attention to how the amuse bouche and the mignardises look exactly the same but taste completely different.  Bi-winning! The service at Baume is unparalleled.  We are warmly welcomed as we walk through the door, and are graciously escorted to our table.  (Baume knows that I usually wear black when I go out to dinner, so without my needing to ask, they have carefully preset our table with black napkins, instead of white.) The staff takes careful notes about our preferences, likes, dislikes, and allergies, and without ever an issue, relays the information to Chef Bruno, who customizes a menu for us that balances taste, presentation, creativity, and his special flair.  Each meal is like a magic show -- and don't bother asking how the tricks are done.  That's for Chef Bruno to know, and for you to enjoy.  And enjoy you will... Every dish is a work of art, a sensory voyage to places that your eyes and palate have never been.  I'm not going to go through a description of each course, because my fellow Yelpers have done that.  Besides, Chef Bruno is constantly updating his menu, so you're not guaranteed to be served anything that is described in the other Yelp reviews.  Suffice it to say that if you've been to Baume once, the second time you go, they'll remember what you loved the first time, but they'll top it for round two.  There is no other restaurant around where the chef cares so much about exceeding your expectations time and time time again.  For this reason alone, he deserves (and has earned) my loyalty. Now, the meal is not inexpensive, but it's worth every penny. As to the people who claim that having lived in France somehow makes them an expert on food, well, perhaps Baume isn't for everyone, but neither is France, by the way.  (Remember, they eat snails there...enough said.) However, if you are looking for an extraordinary dining experience, where you are treated like royalty and served dishes that you cannot get anywhere else, prepared by a culinary genius, served by staff who truly enjoy being guides through your culinary journey, then Baume is for you.
Worth the $$$$. Service was fantastic, food tasty, and inventive.  A must go for foodies.  Their menu is pre-fixed and whatever is seasonal.
The chef signature 62 degree egg with serrano ham and artichoke puree is beyond divine.
We had the 8 course menu Gastrominique. Don't despair when you see how small the portions are, both of us girls felt quite full afterwards.  My favorite course, the only one that wowed me, was dessert.  Too bad... the small cozy but upscale atmosphere is soooo beautiful and relaxing.  I wonder... will they just serve me dessert????
Expensive? Yes, but worth every dime for the experience. Positively amazing to taste what someone pushing the food envelope can do. Chemel's play on food textures alone is simply stunning. Service gets extremely high marks. Not a place to go every week or month but twice a year to try the seasonal menu would be fun. Chemel seems well on his way to a second Michelin star ... here's hoping he gets it before his old boss at Chez TJ does ... I'm certain he could do wonders with a nice dish of crow.
A fairly new restaurant exists in the sea of restaurants in Palo Alto.  Some standout.  Baume is one that does.  Chef Bruno Chemel's stated style is a combination of French Modern and Zen.  I would describe it is the new highly popular preparation style where the textures, flavors, temperatures and experience changes from the moment a morsel enters your mouth and changes over your palate.  Amazing.  Perhaps the most excellent example of that was the desert that was a Hazel Nut Foam.  I will let you experience it on your own.  Amazing.  Light.  Outrageously good.  We opened with a bottle of 2002 Crystal Champagne and followed with a bottle of 2007 BV Private Reserve Cab.  A bit out of the downtown area and well worth the exploration.  Enjoy.
we came here for mothers day.  my mom wanted to try it even though her last visit to chez tj was not stellar. the interior design maybe had an off day as the colors here are black and orange.  halloween anyone?  we sat right next to the main door, separated by a curtain.  the flowers were wilting. haha sorry for the attention to detail ... the staff is very nice.  the guy who served us was very .. smiley.  i ordered tea at the end and for some reason, he left the tea pot on the servers station.  and never came back so i went and got it myself. onto the food.  we had a choice of 6 or 8 courses with wine pairing and the two extra courses were foie gras and cheese.  so we all got 6 course. first came the walnut bread with the olive spread that looked like a chocolate pebble.  then we got the scallop amuse.  i wish we got more of this.  i love scallop.  then bread.  the spreads were tofu parsley (yuck) and balsamic vinegarette emusified.  the spreads separated as we ate.  it looked disgusting.  haha i actually really liked the warm haricot jaune salad with freeze dried aioli and sliced mushroom.  next came the soup - red pepper ice cream, bacon,  floating island?  meringue thing.   i didnt  care for the meringue especially since it didnt taste like anything.  next came my favorite dish, i know it is mush but i liked the flavors!  it was the 62 degree egg sitting on pea puree, mushroom and some foam. ok the next one, i really wanted to send back - the sea bass.  the bouillabase was so fishy!  some people think fishy means flavorful, but it was SO fishy i couldnt take it.  and the fennel panna cotta was a nasty color.  the sea bass didnt have too much flavor.  but all of this with the broth was just ... ugh ... my mom didnt eat hers at all. the next filet mignon was good.  there was foam, white bean puree, fava bean, cara cara orange. dessert was deconstructed spumoni.  the chocolate cake looked like a brown sponge.  haha sorry .... i know im being mean.  but it did!!  i forgot to take a pic.  there were freeze dried cherry meringue sticks.  a pistachio ice stick.  chocolate mousse overall not bad .... i dont think id come back
We were impressed and will most definitely go back for more. That is all.
"Better stop and grab a burger on the way" Said a friend of mine when I told him I was going to Baume. I scoffed in disbelief at his comment, but after SPEEDING through the 10 course tasting I felt like I had just shared an appetizer with a friend. My biggest complaint about my experience at Baume was how rushed my wife and I felt throughout the 10 courses. They brought out a Olive "chocolate truffle" and some toast while we were looking over the menu. As soon as we placed our order they were snatching the bread/olive spread away from my wife before she could even enjoy it. Our entire dining experience was only an hour and a half. Very FAST for 10 courses. I guess they can go so quick because you do not need any time to digest because you don't get much.... As for the food... Over all it was good, but nothing blew me away and for the price, you better blow me away. (bubbles and liquid nitrogen does not impress me as much as a flavorful satisfying dish) Counting a bite of (liquid nitrogen) frozen ice shards that melt in your mouth with in a second is a little cheap and misleading for a full "course". The signature egg dish was delicious as was the 2 desserts. The grass fed beef tenderloin was good but I saw that the garnish accounts for 25-40% of the entire tasting price with a ton of summer truffles shaved on top. So much that I couldn't see my tiny tenderloin on my plate.  I wish I could of passed on the truffles in exchange for a additional course.  some of the other courses were prettier to look at than to actually eat. I don't think I will return anytime soon.
What an extraordinary restaurant! We went for the first time to Baume and were dazzled, not only by the food but by the total experience. The chef is an artist who thoroughly plans everything, from the first step one takes inside the restaurant to the end of the meal. The staff is enthusiastic; they seem happy and proud to work there, and it shows. Unlike at most restaurants, the tables have generous spaces between them, and you cannot hear the conversation at the next table; the carefully decorated dining room has a general air of comfort and elegance. It's worth mentioning that they have a very well designed lighting, which is rare in restaurants. I do not remember everything we ate, since there is really no dish-by-dish menu. The card mentions only two choices, a "menu decouverte" which has 8 courses, and an even more extensive 12-course "menu gastronomique." What I remember is that each course of our 8-course menu was truly a feast for both the eyes and the palate; each delightful surprise was followed by another until the very end of the meal. A good part of the dinner was the anticipation of the next surprise. Baume is very expensive, particularly if you combine the food menu with their superb wine pairing, but it is comparable to other high end restaurants. My only disappointment came with the last course. I do not drink , so only my three companions had the wine pairing. With the desert, they brought a pretty looking foamy liquid concoction, based on lime juice I think, but we were told it had no alcohol. Still, they considered it as part of their wine pairing and I was not given one. To top off our experience, at our request, they showed us the kitchen, where we met chef Chemel and the rest of his staff. The somewhat small kitchen was clean, efficient, and surprisingly quiet; everyone appeared to know exactly what they had to do, and when and how to do it. I even noticed a woman smiling - an unusual sight for a kitchen on a busy Saturday night. While the service was choreographed like a ballet and accompanied by beautiful plates, some of them looking more like pieces of art rather than dinnerware, the food was like a symphony. The textures, temperatures, flavors, aromas, and colors all were perfectly orchestrated to let each of them shine - and then to culminate in a luscious crescendo of a memorable gastronomical experience.
A really fantastic dinner. Just don't think about the price tag. Yowza. We had the 10 course meal with wine pairing. Don't be in a hurry if you're ordering this. Be prepared to stay about four hours. If you're parents of twin toddlers and are not used to staying up past 10 pm, I recommend the first seating of the evening. The place. A good space. Comfortable and pleasant. Dark wood, orange curtains, cherry blossom branches in vases, pretty furniture. The only weirdness was the strangely out-of-place cabinet in the dining room displaying wine glasses. The patrons. I felt like we (along with one adjacent couple) were the only ones not taking pictures of our plates with our iPhones or point-and-shoot digital cameras. The service. Attentive and pleasant. We arrived early in hopes that there was a bar to wait at...but with no bar, we were directed to a couch and ordered Baumetini's, delicious sparkling sake cocktails with passionfruit caviar. The wait staff were friendly and competent and knowledgeable about the food and wine.  We got a visit at the end of the evening from the chef Bruno Chemel, which was nice. The food. Delicious all around. Standouts in my book were the poached egg with chantrelle mushroom broth with truffles, the warm rosemary sourdough bread with salt and peppercorns, and the tete de moine cheese paired with the Martella Grenache. Oh, and the beef was great, too. And the asparagus salad; we loved that. Oh, and the foie gras...damn, that was yummy. Yeah, pretty much all of it was great. The wine. Wow. Superb. Even the pineapple wine from Hawaii was delicious, 'though I could only drink a few sips before it was enough. The pairings were, in many cases, just perfect and surprising and wonderful. The pours were generous, maybe a little too generous. Be prepared to take a taxi home. The bill. Just close your eyes and give them your AmEx. The hangover. Epic. Drink lots of water.
One of the most interesting dining experiences in recent years, though all the details are a blur.  Lots of foam, lots of half-bite size servings, lots of foods I put in my mouth out of sheer faith and curiosity because I had NO IDEA what they were.  Wonderful place to impress and be amused, but probably not a place to go to have your spirit lifted when feeling down (I go to Cupertino Village for that).  The extraordinary price tag is not for the faint of heart, and thankfully someone else flipped the bill for me.  Perhaps my palates are simply not sophisticated enough?  Then again, if high art has no audience, what good is it?  I say this without disrespect - go with the mentality of watching a Vegas show, not eating a Vegas buffet.
We celebrated our 10th wedding anniversary at Baume last month. I had heard some incredible things about the restaurant, so was totally looking fwd to our dinner there. I really liked the decor and the fact that they were extremely accommodating in terms of reservation times. However, we were fairly disappointed with the level of service on arrival. Our server forgot to ask us what drinks we wanted to get us started. After our 1st course, I had to actually ask our server for the drinks menu! Then our drinks saga continued, where we decided to get the food and wine tasting menu. BAD IDEA! The wine pairings were less than satisfactory for this level of restaurant, and really did nothing for the amazing food being served ! The other interesting part was that some courses did not have a "wine" pairing at all, but had some chef's (non alcoholic) drink creations. I for one missed a good dessert wine with the last course and was left with some badly executed soda drink instead. Now to the food. My husband and I LOVED the food. The presentation, the flavors, and just the entire molecular gastronomy experience was amazing! I would definitely recommend this place, but as I said before, stay away from the wine pairings!
Hands down, one of the best restaurants in the bay area. Food was excellent & service was professional. Probably the funnest dining experience in the bay.
I had a meal at Baume when it was open for a few months. I liked the surprises and thought it deserves to be classified in a "must" experience. My second experience was last year when I took my whole family there and found out it was nothing special anymore. I recognized Baume is heading down the hill in term of their quality but I wanted to give it a try one more time.  My third time was last night and very disappointed throughout the meal.  Firstly, the food portion was so small, unbelievable small that we all were still hungry when we got home. It is ridiculous small that we had to ask for more bread even though their bread was far from special.  We feel it is so inadequate for the price we paid. Second, since there was no menu for you to follow what was coming, you expect to have something extraordinary with the tasting menu but it was not. Service was also another disappointment, other than putting the dishes on the table, there was no service. If you are spending more than $200 per person, you want it to be worth the money and worth your time, neither was there for us.  Unless you have money to throw it out of the window, you want save it at some other restaurants. Baume is more than enough for me.
We came here today for a mini office Christmas celebration.  I was a bit hesitant as the basic non wine paired menu ends up being about $75 after gratuity and tax, but in the end, I was not disappointed :) I'd recommend this place to people who want a fancy meal out for important celebrations, and maybe hint at hubby for us to come here for our anniversary. (So he can try it out for himself, of course) Its a pretty neat you don't really choose dishes, and rather, just give any dietary restrictions and leave the rest to the chef.  Every dish that was a pleasant surprise.  The portions are small, but what lacks in quantity is definitely made up with quality - each bite was flavorful and I enjoyed each one. Each plate was presented nicely, the dishes were clean and simple.  Even the delivery of the plates to the table was synchronized between the servers. One hitch though - we were seated at a corner table so it was hard to get around to everyone.  For those of us seated close to a corner, the server would just reach over/in front of them in order to clear plates or put new silverware on the table after each course, this seems like an obvious no-no for such a fancy restaurant, perhaps it was just an oversight.
Was that B-A-U-M-E or B-O-M-B?  The 10 course meal was like a failed science experiment.! Starting strong with an asparagus dish that actually had flavor, the chef's lab project fizzled into a foamy failure. When did foam become an appealing thing to eat btw?  Confused flavors, lack of any logic to the dishes, a sterile room and service that felt rushed reminded us why "nuevo cuisine" almost always comes up short . A complete waste of $500! The only saving grace was the wine list  that does show some promise.
For a restaurant which relies on seasonal items, it is hard to compare experiences with other people.   This review is based on the 12 course tasting winter menu. Style/Comparison Definitely unique for CA.  The play on flavor is very zen and well balance but somehow I feel the play on flavor is very neutral.  Personally I find it too be a bit too simple because the lots of these dishes don't have the complexity (personal choice) that you would expect for a modern french place.  Incorporation of Japanese cues and technique is very prominent in lots of the dishes.  I believe  David Kinch from Manressa does a better job of focusing the favors and playing off of that.
My wife and I went to Baume recently with two other couples. We all live fairly nearby and thought it was funny that none of us had heard of Baume until about a week before we ate there (and we are pretty plugged in foodies!). We had the 10 course menu. Overall the food was pretty good (7.5 on a scale of 10). I wasn't blown away, but the courses were fun, beautifully displayed, and full of surprises. The courses were dainty in size, and I was still a bit hungry by the end (but then again I am a total hog). A few days before our meal, I had just seen a 60 Minutes show which featured Jose Andres, the Spanish chef known for Molecular Gastronomy. There is a scene when Anderson Cooper tries a dish that has been frozen with liquid nitrogen, and all of this smoky, frozen air comes out of his nose. Baume had a liquid nitrogen dish, some kind of licorice or something that dissolved in my mouth instantaneously. I was disappointed when smoky air didn't come out of my nose. If you are going to do liquid nitrogen, you got to have magic tricks. The restaurant itself is not fancy at all. It is in a very modest space, and I give the owner props for not spending too much money on his build-out or decor. The layout of the restaurant is well planned to maximize intimacy, privacy and space between tables. Some of the better things about Baume worth mentioning: 1) It has a low corkage fee ($25) for wine, and that fee gets waived for each bottle you buy from the restaurant. 2) The staff were incredibly nice and unpretentious. I hate haughty waiters who speak with affectations. 3) The sommelier was super duper nice, and really knew his stuff.
This place exceeded my expectations. It was my first time experiencing the whole molecular gastronomy thing and I was a bit skeptical it would live up to the hype. We dined there for a birthday celebration and went whole hog - the 12-course dinner with wine pairing. Every dish was beautiful and delicious. Outstanding plates? Sixty-two degree egg, squab with peas and spring salad with baby vegetables. The beverages that went with each dish were spectacular, really accentuating each course. I didn't think my palate would be able to discern that many flavors over that many courses but it was all truly memorable. The wine sommelier also gave our guys extra pours of their favorite wines at no charge. Also memorable - the bill. You have been warned. We arrived for a 6:30 seating and left four hours later full and with a truly unforgettable dining experience.
Excellent food (truly excellent). Nice decor. Superb service. Only negatives were that it was cold - could stand turning up the thermostat a few degrees, and they don't offer non-alcoholic drinks as a stand-alone option. My husband had the wine & drink pairings, which were excellent, but I couldn't just get the drink pairings.
Mucho expensive but worthed. Every single dish is a delight.
We went to Baume for the first time tonight for an early seating, were greeted warmly by the hostess and seated right away. The server, Colin, was great. Knew each dish and every ingredient as well as the wine pairings. He was smart, knowledgeable and enthusiastic. Always a great experience when you can connect with the staff at the restaurant. On the food side, we chose the 10-course meal with a split wine pairing. I've thought the whole 'molecular gastronomy' concept was a bit of a gimmick, but when combined in the right places it adds to the meal rather than detracts. Chef Chemel has the right balance, using it to add texture, temperature, flavor and depth to the dish rather than just for showmanship (although there is one nitrogen-based intermezzo that is primarily show). I won't go into detail on each course as it was very similar to the ones reported below, but will focus on two: the 62 degree egg and the beef fillet. Both were cooked sous vide and both were incredible. The egg with a slice of truffle, fresh peas and mushrooms was amazingly rich, but paired with a Sancerre Sauvignon Blanc to cut through that richness, just amazing. The fillet was tender and flavorful with a white bean puree, Szechuan pepper sauce and well paired with a local Santa Cruz Cabernet. The pacing of the courses was right-on. Nice pause between each but not too long. The table was marked promptly and all wines were served just before the dishes. We've been to multi-course tasting menus that drag on for 4+ hours but Baume's timing was perfect. Second, the portions were right on, we walked out of the restaurant satisfied, but not stuffed. Perfect. I'd say the only minor downside of the evening was the room decor. Don't expect French Laundry or The Dining Room. It is relatively small (10 tables), modern, functional and efficient with a few flourishes (there is a fish bowl with a Baume bobbing in it when you walk in). With excellent food and incredible service, we will be back to see what Chef Chemel can do with different seasonal ingredients and to try the 15-course menu.
I heard good things about this restaurant and wanted to take my wife for a nice French dinner on her birthday. But here is the sad and the disappointing summary of the night. We got the the menu gastronomique which was $118 per person: - On the second course, there was a huge (about 7 inches long) and disgusting hair within my food. After pointing that out to the waitress, we got only a very artificial and dry "ohh I am sorry" and were treated as it was completely normal. Of course, it already ruined the atmosphere of the night for us, since me and my wife were looking for hair pieces on the following courses and the waitresses attitude gave us the feeling that things like that happen all the time there. - We brought our nice bottle of wine since this was a celebration, and they neglected filling our wine glasses throughout the night if we didn't explicitly ask. Yes the wine was not theirs but they were happy to charge $25 corkoge fee for neglecting to serve it. - Waitress asked whether we would like to try truffles on one of the courses. We said yes and they grinded just a little truffle mushroom on one of the served courses. On the bill, I was really surprised to see $50 extra charge for that. I am glad that I didn't ask for balck pepper on my steak as they would probably charge another extra $50 for that... -And the biggest disappointment of all, most courses were dull and lacked flavor. Only 2 courses out of 8 were tasty and even the dessert was simply disappointing (come on really, how can you even screw up the dessert...). -After spending $400 (although we brought our own wine and just ordered the gastronomique option for $118/person), me and my wife agreed that the most delicious thing of the whole dinner experience was the wine, which we brought in to the restaurant. I rarely feel bad for spending money on food, but the price we paid and the quality/service we got was so disproportional that I almost felt robbed. We have been to many restaurants  and up to now our opinion was usually consistent with other yelpers. However, I really have hard time to believe that all this 5 star reviews are for the same restaurant that we visited today. If you really want to spend 0.5K, I suggest you try a better restaurant or donate the money to a charity and get yourself a hotdog. Trust me that both will make you feel better than spending it in this restaurant....
I don't think I need to go through the menu as many people have, as it was perfection!  As a customer at chez TJ during the tenure of Bruno, he could only go on to to bigger and better things.   We were there on the 2nd night of the 15 course tasting menu and it did not disappoint!  From the heavenly, pearly cocktail to start,until dessert, we were not denied pleasure! The service is spectacular and ambiance according.
Great experience, great service. I'm not a foodie so I have no idea if the food and wine are worth the outlay but they certainly impressed us. Although you should be prepared for a big hit to your wallet.
Baume is not just about the food, though the food is delicious. It's about the experience. People who are not familiar with molecular gastronomy and those who lack a sense of adventure will not get Baume. And from reading some of the negative reviews here, that is certainly the case. Since there are already many descriptions of the dishes in other reviews, no need to go into detail there, but highlights for me were the foie gras, the 62 deg. egg, and the desserts. Chef Bruno knows how to extract intense flavors from the fresh ingredients and highlight those flavors. Presentation is pretty and service is excellent. There are not many places in the Bay Area where you can experience this type of meal. Foodies will love Baume. Eat here with an open mind and enjoy the ride!
If you're curious about molecular gastronomy, this restaurant is one you should check out. Expect small portions, but interesting and playful textures and presentations. Flavor was on the milder side. The service is S-L-O-W though! Our reservation was at 8:30pm but we got in at around 8:12pm, and it was 12:02am by the time we got out, and that too because we dashed out with the chocolate dessert in our hand (had to pick up a rental car by 12:15am before the store closed)! Since we came early, they served us Parmesan Sponge  with pink peppercorns while we waited to be seated - warm and delicious! We were certainly excited for our actual food! We got the 5 course tasting menu with drink pairings, and I have to say they did get the pairings perfectly right. The drinks absolutely worked with the food (4 wines, 1 sake and 1 mixed drink with my vegetarian course menu). This was the lineup of the food: - House Flat Bread with Parsley Tofu spread: very thin and interesting - Amuse Bouche of baby radish and chocolate mousse: good! never thought radish would go well with chocolate! - Red and Orange Beets with pearled goat cheese: playful, good - Poached egg with black truffle in chanterelle mushroom broth: amazing! - Tempura'd greens, seaweed, bok choy, some foam over crispy brown rice: interesting - House wheat dinner rolls: a little chewy - Pumpkin soup, pumpkin seeds, vadovan, nutmeg foam, cubed curried pumpkins: soothing, nice - Celeriac puree frozen in liquid nitrogen: nice! - Tofu with two kinds of sauces, greens and puffed rice: really good! This was paired with an EXCELLENT sake which made it even better! - Cheese beignet with apricot jam, and shaved cheese in the form of a coral: nice - Freeze dried herb butter, freeze dried olives, pearls of balsamic vinegar over bread: nice - Chocolate sponge with mandarin orange, chocolate mousse, vanilla ice cream and a thin slice of candied orange wedge, mousse in a coffee cup with a thin slice of candied apple, and a mini donut, served with their house chocolate passion fruit drink: excellent! - Green tea eclairs: yummy! - Dark chocolate hearts with gold leaf and raspberry filling: ok In summary: Presentation: * * * * Ambiance: * * * * Service: * * * Taste: * * * Agree with P.K. and Rand L. This place gets 3 stars for the overall experience and the very good, but not great food.  It definitely wasn't worth the price tag. Trevese in Los Gatos was MUCH better. Too bad it closed down.
Same menu as kim n (except green tea eclairs instead of orange soda), but much less impressed. Beef with truffles was the best part, with the dessert coming in second. The rest was nicely constructed, but not much pleasure to eat, due to flavors being too mild (Asian influence taken too far ?). At this price point ($78 without wine, tax or tip), I expect better. Both servers seemed nervous, but no serious hiccups otherwise.
We went on opening night and were continuously amazed throughout the evening. The atmosphere is warm and inviting and at the same time modern and chic. I loved the burnt orange and brown hues. The staff is very friendly and helpful. I was surprised how smoothly everything ran, considering it was opening night. We had the 5 course with wine pairing and everything was delicious and the presentation of the dishes was beautiful. My favorites: the pumpkin soup, the baumetini (sake with passion fruit pearls that burst with flavor), the beet dish (I don't like beets, but tried it anyway and it was delicious), the beef with truffles (I'm not a beef fan either, but this simply melted in your mouth, outstanding), and of course the chocolate and orange was delightful. Congratulations to Chef Bruno and his superior staff. I can't wait to go back. It is well worth the price for such an elegant and unique dining experience.
Baume definitely has the "wow" factor. It's nice and cozy inside and though the location could be better, it's nice not having to search hard for parking (compared to nice restaurants in SF or even downtown Palo Alto on a busy night). I found this restaurant from Zagat and they called it Palo Alto's destination spot and it certainly is one of the best places I've eaten. I later discovered that Baume had 1 Michelin star and it certainly is deserving I feel - I haven't yet been to French Laundry but I have been to Cyrus (2 star place in Healdsburg) along with a few 3 star restaurants in other countries and I feel Baume is close to a 2 star in terms of quality and that aforementioned "wow" factor. If I was one of those sad Michelin star raters (at least I imagine they're miserable, not sure why...) I would give this place a 1.7 Michelin Star (as opposed to other 1 star places like Gary Danko which would only surmount to 1 if you rounded up!) I mentioned it twice already but it's really the biggest difference I noticed between a 1 and 2-3 star restaurant. Certainly the ingredients aren't that dramatically different - however the way the food is creatively prepared is what really stands out. At Baume I like how the chefs really play with the idea of different temperatures; an example would be the frozen olive oil that you think will break your molars but turn out to be simply incredible! I had the full 15 course menu here and I would recommend it a lot (especially if it's your first time; come hungry!) I'm not going to say every single course wowed me, but I will say the majority did and you'll notice after each course you'll think that was the best one say far. That's the sign of a good destination restaurant which is what I feel Baume is. By the time the "main protein" dishes start coming out, you'll already have a huge smile on your face and then just be floored with what's to come! I did not have the wine pairing but I'm sure they have an outstanding collection. It wasn't disappointing but a little surprising that they didn't have a full bar - perhaps they're still acquiring the license. They did have a few sake-styled cocktails and even more interestingly unique non-alcoholic drinks with fruits I can't even pronounce anymore. All in all Baume is a fun restaurant that will wow you with the way their really creative menu. The final sign of a great restaurant - they make what they want for you to eat. You just sit there and enjoy -- and that I definitely did!
Had the 15 course menu last night. 5 stars for interesting use of textures and molecular gastronomy cooking techniques. But only 2 stars for actual taste.  I thought the food was nifty, but not actually delicious. Every course had "spheres", or gelatinous balloons/balls filled with some kind of liquid.  Lemongrass balloons and mango spheres in the salad exotique, blueberry spheres in the dessert.  Lots of foam too. The most amusing course was a licorice foam frozen with liquid nitrogen.  The waiters instructed us to chew the foam and breath out through the nose, resulting in a cloud of white vapor emerging from your nostrils.  Pretty funny.
My boyfriend brought me here to celebrate my birthday and I'm delighted we could get in given Baume just earned a Michelin star. Tucked into non-descript South California Ave, the decor I can only describe as eating in the cozy interior of an Hermes box:  lush orange curtains separate small groupings of brown tables and create an intimate dining environment. The service was delightfully attentive with no pretension- our waiter guided us with confidence through the wine list and menu offerings. We chose the 8-course tasting menu that meandered artfully with touches like gold leaf, shaved truffles, celery foam, and my favorite- the 62-degree egg.  (Surprising given I don't usually enjoy poached egg!) The combination of texture and flavor felt like an adventure and each dish left us wondering "what will they bring out next?" It was a truly memorable dining experience and I recommend it for anyone seeking a special evening.
I only came here for lunch and had the 4 course since it was a business lunch. I thought it was fantastic. They were very creative and tasty too! But if you like this kind of food, I would recommend Moto in Chicago. That was an experience!
This restaurant has became one of my favorite French Restaurant in the bay area.  Every single dish WOWed me.  They incorporated Molecular Gastronomy in a lot of their dishes which is amazing.  Everything tasted great even the bread with the olive spread that I thought was a piece of chocolate in the beginning.  It was a fun experience and congrats to them making onto the Michelin Starred restaurant.  Service was great as well!  Will definitely come back to this place for special occasion!
15 course meal!  I was full by the 6th course!!!  I couldn't even finish my fish courses so I could save room for the meat and dessert course.  I liked most of the dishes, but the molecular gastronomy didn't work so well for me.  I'm sure it was executed perfectly, but to me, not all the flavors always melded perfectly.  It was a fun experience though.
I'm a total food snob, and the food here was delicious!  Not only that, it was an impressive and interesting experience. The one item that wasn't good, the chef replaced with an experimental item that was out of this world. Definitely pricey, but also a treat.
Our own molecular gastronomy in South Bay, foam, sous vide, liquid nitrogen, and caviars.  Bruno Chemel creates modern American cuisine with traditional Japanese techniques.   With Baume, Bruno's modern cuisine finally has a place it deserves.   See complete 10-course at Baume.
Holy moly.......my fav French place I've found in Palo Alto (or on the Peninsula for that matter). The food is top notch, The sauces were exceptionally rich yet balanced, which is a high compliment from a foodie like myself. 6 stars for accommodating my friend's gluten-free diet.....they let us bring out own pasta, which was very sweet especially for such an upscale restaurant. Go go go!!!!!!!! You won't regret it.
I am French, I was born and raised there and moved to the US in 1998, and I can tell you that this place is the real thing. Impeccable service, amazing cuisine, and a nice quiet atmosphere. Though the price may seem steep, it is absolutely worth the experience. This restaurant would not be out of place in Paris. Bravo!
This is fine dining at its finest.  Everything here is done to perfection - impeccable service, creative presentation of the dishes (not to mention the dish shapes), curtain drawn semi private setting, combinations of fresh ingredients and unique tastes -  all of this is an amazing experience.  Good things though come at a price.  There is no a la carte menu at Baume.  You have two choices - the 8 course winter tasting menu or the 12 course winter tasting menu.  The ingredients (in no particular order) are displayed on the side of the menu to give you an idea of what you might be sampling.  Part of the experience is the surprise.  You have no idea of what is going to come out of the kitchen next.  To not ruin the surprise for everyone, you really need to give the restaurant a try.  The one dish that is apparently on the menu year round is the 62 degree egg.  This egg is not like any other egg.  I would order this dish for breakfast, lunch, dinner and I wish I could figure out how to make it at home.  Overall, I am a huge fan of Baume and hope to come back soon.  Diner beware alert - 8 course tasting menu costs around $115 and the 12 course costs around $160.  You will not be disappointed though.
we went here on a whim last night and were blown away! the food is spectacular. every dish presented a fresh taste sensation, and the wine pairing a perfect accompaniment. the service is friendly, attentive and prompt, without any of stuffiness that you might expect from similar fine dining establishments. as we wrapped up the wonderful evening, we immediately started to plan our next visit.
What a pretentious place! "Molecular" - hey! EVERYTHING is made up of molecules and microwaves work by agitating molecules.  The next bit of idiocy is the "frozen nitrogen" whatever. Far TOO many waithelp, hovering, pouring frozen gases on the soup, etc. Mediocre Sancerre wine (we love that wine, this was very thin). When told one course would be steak, I said we don't eat steak. As a substitute, they offered tofu or broccolini! HUNH? How about an item comparable in price to a steak? This was our 25th anniversary dinner and it was a big nothing. We came home and ate a bowl of spaghetti because we were hungry (after spending $260 for two people). SKIP IT unless you enjoy efforts to bamboozle you into thinking it is all pretty special because the prices are high and everyone whispers while serving mediocre food in teensy portions.We have eaten in some pretty special, highly rated places and this was a terrible experience.
I had the unique and pleasurable opportunity to dine at Baume on the restaurant's opening night. Though they are still operating in a soft open mode, the experience was incredible. The restaurant's design and interior is simple, elegant, and pleasant. As you first walk in you immediately catch the french modern (Zen) feeling the place is exuding. The staff were polite and professional and added to the Zen ambiance, coupled with the soft, melodic musical tones that softly played while dining, it was indeed a exclamation point on the entire experience. My group was served the 5 course menu with the wine pairings. Personally, my favorite was the beet salad with goat cheese. Everyone in my group seemed to thoroughly enjoy the entire meal, along with the choco-orange float served with dessert. I look forward to dining at Baume again, especially once they began serving the full 10/15 course menu.
Just another amazing meal at Baume. Fish (forget which type, bass maybe?) fennel panna cotta with bouillabaisse is enlightening. I didn't know fish could taste that good. Another cool feature is the molecular gastronomy seamlessly combined with classic preparations and chef Bruno's own twist. If you're looking for fine dining, look no further than Baume.
Took my wife here for her birthday.  She enjoyed it because she weighs each component of the overall experience equally which includes decor, service and food. I only care for the food with a bit of interest in the service.  So, decor was tasteful and elegant; not overdone.  Service at the table was excellent. The food was so-so.  Of the 10 dishes I thought 2 were awesome including the oft mentioned eggs.  Another 3 were good.  The rest I didn't enjoy.  I think it is because in the process of experimenting, creating and just doing something different and interesting the dishes lost touch with the most important aspect which is the taste.  The two awesome dishes fired my synapses on contact and just made smile and happy.  The 5 I didn't like were well presented, interestingly prepared and certainly exotic, but just didn't taste that great. I've been to many of the best french restaurants around the world, Robuchon-Taillevant, L' Osier, French Laundry and I will hold Baume to those standards.  I don't know how it compares to other top restaurants in the area.
Baume was a lot of fun.  It is pricey tho.  Not sure I'd go back but it was worth going once I think.  It was kinda like being a kid and playing with food again. The fun things they do with liquid nitrogen & general titration chemistry are engaging for the nerd in me.  Or course they also do traditional french pretty well too so that doesn't hurt. I don't eat tons but I do have a healthy appetite.  I went for the 10 course and it was quite filling.  I can't imagine going the full 15.
This restaurant is absolutely fantastic. My fiance and I went here for her birthday and it was absolutely divine. We have been to chef tj, multiple michael mina restaurants, bouchon, etc... and this is by far the best there is....still trying to get into french laundry, but when that happens I may have to reconsider ;)
Absolutely fabulous!
Had dinner there last night.  Highly overpriced.  Bill for 4 came to $600 without tip and with $105 of corkage.  We choose the 9 course tasting.  Of the 9 courses truthfully only 4 would I ever want to eat again.  The rest were mundane.  Most annoying part of the night was the waiter who insisted on dropping the 3-5 French words he knew randomly.  I mean really? More annoying was the over the top seriousness in how the two waiter/servers would describe the food and then just walk away without any room to even ask a question.  Then their was the wine service.  I brought an older bordeaux (89 Ducru) and you would think for the corkage fee of $35 they might actually take the cork pieces out of the bottle of the cork they destroyed.  During the evening floating pieces of cork were scattered through the glasses.  Ambiance was ok.  Rather cold looking walls and floors.  Also walking out the door at the end of the evening and bumping into poor homeless with their shopping carts full of their life belongings after you just dumped $600 was a bit of a reality check.  Sorry but I'm just being real here.  On the positive side.  Presentation was very very nice and creative, speed of food service was pretty much perfect and the 4 courses that the table did like were really good.  I guess after trying several molecular gastronomy restaurants I'm convinced its just not my thing.
The ultimate french dining experience!  From the impeccable ambience to the attentive wait staff and the incredible food.  My favorite french dining experience ever!   Will definitely be back.
4.5 glad to have a place like this in Palo Alto.  as a michelin star chef (Chemal from Chez TJ), you can tell he has the fine dining ingredient and presentation mindset.  excellent service with many staff. there are only 3 menu choices: 5 course (French home cooking with a few modern twists), 10 course (sampling of everything), or 15 course (apparently every technique used).  the potential main ingredients listing leaves the menu as a surprise, and unfortunately i didn't take notes, so i won't have the typical nice descriptions 10 course: meal highlights a lot of foam started with crustless soft bread with red pepper? on pesto spread bread side throughout the meal was either sliced baguette or steamed soft wheat roll (which i recommend) with the 3 spreads -- 2 green 1 brown but i forget what they are (balsamic olive and parsley?) bread course started walnut bread with a spread of "chocolate" olive -- made to look like a bonbon (subtle playfulness) 1) amuse bouche of dayboat scallop bit with passion fruit pearls -- nice way to start, plus at the end he comes full circle and does the same to conclude the meal 2) trio of heirloom tomatoes with lavender mousse, pesto, bread crisp -- pretty good 3) 62 deg egg with garlic crumbs, chanterelle mushrooms, and espuma -- his signature dish, prepared well, tasty but not my fave 4) seared foie gras with scallop and kyoho grape over berry coulis -- perfectly seared foie in small bites, very tasty, one of the best dishes 5) fish with foam and grated mushroom -- sorry can't remember details 6) deconstructed pad thai without noodles -- just peanut, foam, cucumber, and shrimp pieces -- surprisingly interesting 7) interlude of liquid nitrogen mint -- blowing smoke out of your nose can be typical molecular gastronomy, with all show and little substance 8) beef -- tasty as expected 9) cheese course (parmesan, blue cheese) and honey lavender pearls -- those pearls are pretty good 10) amuse bouche of lychee with chocolate crunch pearls -- this was tasty and appreciate this because we started with an amuse bouche that looked the same but tasted different 11) loved the first dessert -- was a glass of foam filled with pineapple bits, macadamia and hazel nuts, caramel, etc. had the perfect elements of crunchy, smooth, sweet, savory 12) some molecular on the final dessert with the clear pillows, fruits, and air stick. 13) 3 candies to go i'm sure if the chef reads any of these descriptions, he would cringe hehe. is this place like the Bazaar Jose Andres playfullness? not exactly, but if you like foams and pearls and want to expand your dining, definitely worth coming here.
My boss took me here for lunch today..very enjoyable.  The food and service were great.   Broccoli sponge bread w/ carrot mouse...fabulous!!  Ambiance a little stuffy and not crazy about the liquid nitrogen dipped ice cream, but apprecaited the creativity.  Reminded me a little of the French Laundry.
Oh what a night! My husband very cleverly chose Baume for our anniversary dinner last night.  We'd been to this location in I believe all or most of its former incarnations:   Cafe Sophia, Cafe Silan (or its cousin), Nora, Basia.   When we walked in, we were astounded at the visual transformation that has happened.  We could tell we were in for an 'experience' and were hoping that this decorating genius would extend to the food. It did.  We had the 10-course 'Baume' meal.   Each of the dishes has been lovingly and very well described by my fellow Yelpers and I don't disagree.  They were all fantastic.....especially the two very different amuse bouches that bookended the meal that looked exactly the same but tasted oh-so-different.   And the olive tapenade disguised as  chocolates-in-a-box, which we crushed and spread onto the walnut bread.   And the nitrogen course that caused us to breath smoke.  Cool! Colin, our waiter, could not have been better.   An engaging, friendly manner, a great smile, and impeccable service. From now on, when our foodie friends from the East Coast visit, we're bringing them here! Bravo, Chef Chemel!!  And Colin.
Had the 15 course tasting menu with wine pairings last night, the food was excellent, creative, imaginative and most importantly delicious.  The service was fantastic too.  Cannot rate this place high enough.  Expensive?  Yes but I've paid less at other restaurants and felt let down, this was worth every penny.
I took my boyfriend here for Father's Day and it was absolutely disgusting !! It's the next morning and I'm still disgusted.I've eaten @ Guy Savoy& Joel Robuchon and it's embarassing to me that this chef claims he worked there;maybe it's embarassing to those chefs there.I've also been to WD-50 in NYC where Chef Dufresne actually knows how to incorporate molecular gastronomy into tasty edible food worth the exorbitant price..Trust me if you have been to Guy Savoy or Robuchon price is not the issue taste is always key. The food was neither cold when it should be nor hot either.Everything was luke warm room temperature.Who or why would you serve room temperature seared foie gras or medium rare filet mignon barely warm? The effort was there and appreciated but none of the ingredients & flavors worked together.Every dish had barely anything flavor but masked with overpoweringly tart accents .It was all gross and nauseating.I felt so bad that I could have made such an awful mistake & ruin my BF father's day dinner.Don't waste your money,time,taste buds nor next day indigestion!!
We are ardent food explorers and prefer experimental over traditional.  Baume fit our personalities perfectly. We went for the 15 course meal and thoroughly enjoyed it.  Preparations were thoughtful and inventive. Service was really fantastic and the sommelier was helpful and generous. My wife got the wine pairing but I ordered by the glass since I had to drive and I was given a complimentary glass of sauternes with the foie gras!  The wine pairing was very complete -- be careful if you are driving.  Congratulations to the chefs on the innovative food -- looking forward to going back. This is one of the most interesting meals we have had since  dining at several Michelin starred restaurants in Spain. The chef is clearly working for his stars as well and deserves them!
Baume bombed.  Big time boo-boo.  If the wine steward had waited 5 more minutes until we finished our tea, we would have walked out and told our foodie friends about the incredible, first class dining experience we had at Baume..  But no.......the minute we forked over $850 he approached the table and requested we move to another table because "other diners had specifically requested our table".  T he 4 of us sat in stunned silence.   The fact that he offered  post-dinner drinks & the hostess apologized as we walked out the door,  did not make up for the simple fact that in what is purported to be a "fine dining" establishment, you don't kick diners from their table.  Period.   .  We begrudgingly shuffled to another 4 top table, finished our drinks, did our best to pickup our conversation where it left off & departed with negative feelings on what could have been a "star" evening.   The 4 of us are not novice diners & have eaten at top restaurants all over the world.  We have never been kicked off of our table.  In fact, we have never been kicked off our table anywhere........even at Outback Steak House, Olive Garden or PF Changs!   How unfortunate that a restaurant deserving of acclaim for its innovative food, can't figure out the basics of timing reservations appropriately and not promising specific tables. PS:  In case you are wondering..."yes"....we were on time for our reservation!
Good food but $225 per head with only one modest bottle of wine shared by four of us?  The bubble economy is back.
Ok well the evening started off wonderfully.  It was my mother's birthday so we decided to get the 15-course to celebrate. Here it goes, the positives in order: Live Scallop Sashimi(Amuse Bouche)-delicious and creative Abalone Citron-Pomme (Second Course)-Tender thinly sliced abalone in a tangy citron pomme foam It was delicious, and I much prefered it to the huge one at the Dining Room. Kabocha Soup with Smoked Duck and Strips of Foie Gras (Third Course)-This one had many components, the smoky salty duck and foie gras at the bottom of the bowl, the slightly sweet liquid nitrogenized shiso ice cream, and the creamy hot kabocha puree. Foie Torchon with Pineapple (Fifth Course)-Delicious, it's foie gras, enough said. Matsuoke Trio (Sixth Course)-Dried Mushrooms with a mushroom consumee, Very umami and rich. At this point we had an intermezzo of frosty red wine gaspachio with scotch cream to top. Refreshing. Rosemary Nitro-Foam (Eighth Course)-As Rob.C. said cool, but no substance Trois Fromages, Honey Caviar, Watercress (Eleventh Course) -Cheese course, the honey lavendar caviar was delicious, and the blue cheese was actually good and not too pungent LIchee, Chocolat Lilikoi Pearls (Amuse Bouche) -Very cleverly made to look like 1st amuse bouthe, delicious passion-fruit lichee goodness. Trois Dessert: Figs, Caramel Foam Freeze, "Tete De Singe" (Twelth, Thirteenth, and Fourteenth Courses) -Very good, the standouts were the lychee passion fruit ice cream in the dried passion fruit shell, and the caramel foam freeze. Other Positives: They gave us signed menus at the end of the meal.  The waiter was very nice and personable. Now this sounds like a raving review but we encountered several problems. We only received Fourteen Courses. You may think its not a big deal but I mean its the principle of the matter. It wasn't a huge deal to us either but we were still curious. i'ts how they initially handled the situation that really peeves me. I was looking over the menus they gave us and noticed the Salad Exotique. I asked our waiter what it was and he started to describe it to which we informed him that we never recieved this course. He went to talk to his manager, and came back saying that this was on the menu last week and they forgot to take it off the menu but confidently ushered us that we still had fifteen courses citing the bread as a course. (What!?!?!) Our waiter handed us over to the manager. We counted the course menu with the manager a couple more times and he left to recitify the situation. But then Chef Bruno Chemel even came out and inquired what the issue was. We explained to him the miscrepancy with the number of courses and he counted with us. It was only fourteen but he insisted that the amuse bouches and the intermezzo  were also courses (!?!?!) and that we had actually seventeen courses. At this point I began to get fed up, and told him that the we had never had amuse bouches counted as courses and he finally agreed. It was a very bizarre experience. After the cirumlocution, the Chef fixed us up and we left somewhat satisfied. But thinking it over, it still bugs me a little how they clumsily tried to cover the mess up even though the food was delicious and innovative.
Trying to do the mo-gas thing in Mayfield is a risky venture. Baume has ventured into those deep waters, and while many of the dishes aren't to my personal taste (e.g., 62-degree egg), there's no denying the creativity in some of the work. Unfortunately, the whole does not gel as well as others in the Bay Area.
Mostly small amounts of elaborate but boring food, served with extreme pretense. If the conversation is the important, choose another place, else, you will be interrupted with pretentious blather every few minutes. Choices are very limited -- the $118 programme (I use this spelling ironically) (8 "tastes") or the $162(??) programme.   In all, there were three tiny -- really small --  bites of compellingly delicious fois gras (with pointless garnishes), and a tiny piece of perfectly cooked halibut with a boring sauce and pointless garnishes, two little nuggets  of beef that were tender and pleasingly rare but without garlic or juice or ...??? and more pointless garnishes. Even the bread (kind of dry) and bread annointments were not that interesting.  Acme and some good olive oil would be lots better.  About $160 per person for the shorter programme tout compris.
Ate here on April 10th for a friend's birthday (ladies night out!) and we ordered the 10 course meal. I think I scared the waiter, asking him tons of technique questions, ingredients, and recipes! Overall, pretty presentations, but the food was just mediocre for the price. The faux "caviar", while one of the hallmark signs of molecular gastronomy but it shouldn't be in almost every dish. Also, not all of the flavors on the plate necessarily complemented each other. I really wanted to be wowed by this place but like WD50, it was a bit disappointing - like trying to do a different technique just for the sake of doing a different technique. I wonder how i can incorporate  MG techniques into my cooking so it transcends the dish! Notes on specific dishes are below: - Baumetini - sparkling sake with lilikoi caviar - liked this! - Epi or steamed wheat bread with parsnip tofu spread and a tan balsamic spread (both ick) - Amuse bouche of scallop sashimi with lilikoi and yuzu and soy caviar. Tasty! - Asparagus wit parmesan and hollandaise caviar. Hollandaise should be served warm IMHO. - *62 degree egg! With pea puree and morel mushrooms. My favorite dish of the night. *so* have to try this!!! - Terra (brown rice) aqua (seawed) air (carrot ginger foam). Can u say Chinese veggie fried rice?? - Striped bass saffron bouillibaise, fennel panna cotta, ginger caviar . Very fishy in a bad way - Lavender foam frozen with liquid nitrogen. Good, but glad i took a minute to snap a photo since everyone got freezer burn from the liquid nitro - Foie with apricot miso and pineapple - I guess you can make bad  foie. - *Grass fed beef with black truffle bergamot jus, baby leek, cippolini onion tart, orange sauce and pineapple. One of the better dishes. Beef is super tender but it has that sous vide nonjuicy texture that i get. The 2 sides of the plate don't seem to relate to each other. - Tete de moine raw and panko crusted and strawberry cardammon compote. Love the straight up version of the cheese. - Amuse bouche of lychee, chocolate crisps, basil - interesting - *Chocolate tarragon ganche on chocolate crisp with strawberry sorbet frozen in liquid nitrogen and more caviar pearls. Liquid nitrogen frozen almond ice cream. Strawberry jello with cream ball center and donut.- i enjoyed this dish - reminded me of the recipe I've been working in from Dessert Foreplay. Liked all the flavors. -Strawberry Soda with Creme -Thai Ice Tea Eclairs - gross - Assortment of chocolate truffles
Excellent address, both very original and excellent food ! To be visited if you are staying anywhere in the valley.
good service, friendly waiters/waitress.  food is great, I like that fusion of Asian ingredients. the white tea is good as well, they use the Teavana teapot and keeps the tea really hot throughout the meal. me and my wife had a good anniversary dinner there!  Thanks Baume!
Creative and inspiring. Hard to use those words for a restaurant. Food was outstanding. Service was not at the level of the food. Would go again...make sure that you are hungry!
$325 for the basic 5 course tasting menu was way too much. Was the place bad - no. Was it great - no. It's just that for that kind of price for two people you really want a wow experience and Baume does not deliver. The best part was in fact the service. They served 3 white wines as first pairings. By the third we were craving a red wine and some red meat. When it came in the 4th course it was too little too late. And I need a killer desert at this price. Instead we got some excuse for a chocolate ganache with fancy rock pieces on the side which was a major let down. Next time I'm on California ave looking for an exceptional meal I'll head up the street to Bistro Elan and get a meal twice as good for half the price. Bottom line - Baume needs to improve the decor and atmosphere. They need better wine pairings with the food and the food itself needs to be a bit more special. I felt like I paid $125 more than I should have for the experience we had.
